CHAPTER 8 Life at the Turn of the 20th Century 1877-1917
UNIT PROJECT
This unit describes how the United States transformed itself from a rural, agricultural society to an urban, industrial one. Use your knowledge of historical eras, the unit’s content, and the major characteristics of history to identify the eras in this unit. Then create a webpage that describes the defining characteristics of each era.
Champions of the Mississippi by Currier and Ives
a
198
Bridge to the 20th Century
1877—1917

•75
’ii

:y
' r* i**






UICTADV
Sitting Bull: Chief of nidlUKT the Lakota Nation 7i hmhsocialstudies.com
VIDEO
\	'•’p-	**

Essential Question
How did westward migration after the Civil War affect the United States?
J
* • w*
myNotebook
Sjjg) Texas Essential Knowledge I” and Skills (TEKS)
3A, 3B, 5C, 12A, 13A, 15A, 26B, 27B, 29H, 31B
SECTION 1: Cultures Clash on the Prairie
Main Idea The cattle industry boomed in the late 1800s, as the culture of the Plains Indians declined.
SECTION 2: Settling on the Great Plains
Main Idea Settlers on the Great Plains transformed the land despite great hardships.
SECTION 3: Farmers and the Populist Movement
Main Idea Farmers united to address their economic problems, giving rise to the Populist movement.






usa;
WORLD 1
1869 Suez Canal is opened.
NTERACT
WITH HISTORY
Until the 1860s, the migratory Indians of Montana—including the Blackfeet shown here—followed the buffalo herds and traded peacefully with whites in the region.
: 1870 Red Cloud, : chief of the Oglala : Sioux, states his : people's case in : Washington, D.C.
1870


J11881)
Garfield is : assassinated. : Chester Arthur
: [18801 James : Garfield is
: elected	• becomes president,
president. ...........................
1880

ImW

<	A-



1


It is the late 1890s. The American West is the last frontier. Ranchers, cowboys, and miners have changed forever the lives of the Native Americans who hunted on the Western plains. Now westward fever intensifies as "boomers" rush to grab "free" farm land with the government's blessing. As you read the chapter and explore the issues below, use the annotation tools in your eBook to record your thoughts.
Explore the Issues
•	What might be some ways to make a living on the Western frontier?
•	If native peoples already live in your intended home, how will you co-exist?
•	How might settlers and Native Americans differ regarding use of the land?



1872 Secret : ballot is : adopted in Britain.
: 1881 French • occupy : Tunisia.
11884 Grover Cleveland is elected president
		: 1893
1889 Oklahoma	' 1890 Sioux	: Diminished U.S.
opened for	: are massacred	- gold reserve
settlement; the	: at Wounded	: triggers the
land rush begins.	: Knee.	: panic of 1893.

1890


1893
: France takes : over
: Indochina.
[18961 William McKinley is elected president.
1896 William Jennings Bryan runs for president.
1900	
1899 Berlin Conference	1900 Boxer
divides Africa among	• Rebellion takes
European nations.	: place in China.
Changes on the Western Frontier 201
200 Chapter 5

Cultures Clash on the Prairie
MAIN IDEA
The cattle industry boomed in the late 1800s, as the culture of the Plains Indians declined.
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Today, ranchers and Plains Indians work to preserve their cultural traditions.
Terms & Names
•Great Plains •Treaty of Fort Laramie •Sitting Bull •George A. Custer •assimilation
•	Dawes Act •Battle of
Wounded Knee
•	longhorn •Chisholm Trail •long drive

TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on cultures in the American West.
One American’s Story-
Zitkala-Sa was born a Sioux in 1876. As she grew up on the Great Plains, she learned the ways of her people. When Zitkala-Sa was eight years old she was sent to a Quaker school in Indiana. Though her mother warned her of the "white men's lies," Zitkala-Sa was not prepared for the loss of dignity and identity she experienced, which was symbolized by the cutting of her hair.
A
Personal Voice zitkala-sa “ I cried aloud .. . and heard them gnaw off one of my thick braids. Then I lost my spirit. Since the day I was taken from my mother I had suffered extreme indignities. .. . And now my long hair was shingled like a coward’s! In my anguish I moaned for my mother, but no one came. . . . Now I was only one of many little animals driven by a herder. ”
—The School Days of an Indian Girl
Zitkala-Sa experienced firsthand the clash of two very different cultures that occurred as ever-growing numbers of white settlers moved onto the Great Plains. In the resulting struggle, the Native American way of life was changed forever.
The Culture of the Plains Indians
Zitkala-Sa knew very little about the world east of the Mississippi River. Most Easterners knew equally little about the West, picturing a vast desert occupied by savage tribes. That view could not have been more inaccurate. In fact, distinctive and highly developed Native American ways of life existed on the Great Plains the grassland extending through the west-central portion of the United States' (See map on page 205.)
Chapter 5
Vocabulary coup: a feat of bravery performed in battle
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
How did the horse influence Native American life on the Great Plains?
To the east, near the lower Missouri River, tribes such as the Osage and Iowa had, for more than a century, hunted and planted crops and settled in small villages. Farther west, nomadic tribes such as the Sioux and Cheyenne gathered wild foods and hunted buffalo. Peoples of the Plains, abiding by tribal law, traded and produced beautifully crafted tools and clothing.
THE HORSE AND THE BUFFALO
After the Spanish brought horses to New Mexico in 1598, the Native American way of life began to change. As the native peoples acquired horses—and then guns—they were able to travel farther and hunt more efficiently. By the mid-1700s, almost all the tribes on the Great Plains had left their farms to roam the plains and hunt buffalo. Their increased mobility often led to war when hunters in one tribe trespassed on other tribes' hunting grounds. For the young men of a tribe, taking part in war parties and raids was a way to win prestige. A Plains warrior gained honor by killing his enemies, as well as by "counting coup" This practice involved touching a live enemy with a coup stick and escaping unharmed. And sometimes warring tribes would call a truce so that they could trade goods, share news, or enjoy harvest festivals. Native Americans made tepees from buffalo hides and also used the skins for clothing, shoes, and blankets. Buffalo meat was dried into jerky or mixed with berries and fat to make a staple food called pemmican. While the horse gave Native Americans speed and mobility, the buffalo provided many of their basic needs and was central to life on the Plains. (See chart on page 207.)
A portrait of a Sioux man and woman in the late 19th century.
FAMILY LIFE
Native Americans on the plains usually lived in small extended family groups with ties to other bands that spoke the same language. Young men trained to become hunters and warriors. The women helped butcher the game and prepared the hides that the men brought back to the camp; young women sometimes chose their own husbands. The Plains Indian tribes believed that powerful spirits controlled events in the natural world. Men or women who showed particular sensitivity to the spirits became medicine men or women, or shamans. Children learned proper behavior and culture through stories and myths, games, and good examples. Despite their communal way of life, however, no individual was allowed to dominate the group. The leaders of a tribe ruled by counsel rather than by force, and land was held in common for the use of the whole tribe.
Settlers Push Westward
The culture of the white settlers differed in many ways from that of the Native Americans on the plains. Unlike Native Americans, who believed that land could not be owned, the settlers believed that owning land, making a mining claim, or starting a business would give them a stake in the country. They argued that the Native Americans had forfeited their rights to the land because they hadn't settled down to "improve" it. Concluding that the plains were "unsettled," migrants streamed westward along railroad and wagon trails to claim the land.
THE LURE OF SILVER AND GOLD
The prospect of striking it rich was one powerful attraction of the West. The discovery of gold in Colorado in 1858 drew tens of thousands of miners to the region. This Yankton Sioux coup stick was used by warriors.
▼
HISTORY
VIDEO
Sitting Bull: Chief of the
Lakota Nation
71 hmhsocialstudies.com
Most mining camps and tiny frontier towns had filthy, ramshackle quarters. Rows of tents and shacks with dirt "streets" and wooden sidewalks had replaced unspoiled picturesque landscapes. Fortune seekers of every description —including Irish, German, Polish, Chinese, and African-American men—crowded the camps and boomtowns. A few hardy, business-minded women tried their luck too, working as laundresses, freight haulers, or miners. Cities such as Virginia City, Nevada, and Helena, Montana, originated as mining camps on Native American land.
The Government Restricts Native Americans
While allowing more settlers to move westward, the arrival of the railroads also influenced the government's policy toward the Native Americans who lived on the plains. In 1834, the federal government had passed an act that designated the entire Great Plains as one enormous reservation, or land set aside for Native American tribes. In the 1850s, however, the government changed its policy and created treaties that defined specific boundaries for each tribe. Most Native Americans spurned the government treaties and continued to hunt on their traditional lands, clashing with settlers and miners—with tragic results.
MASSACRE AT SAND CREEK
One of the most tragic events occurred in 1864. Most of the Cheyenne, assuming they were under the protection of the U.S. government, had peacefully returned to Colorado's Sand Creek Reserve for the winter. Yet General S. R. Curtis, U.S. Army commander in the West, sent a telegram to militia colonel John Chivington that read, "I want no peace till the Indians suffer more.” In response, Chivington and his troops descended on the Cheyenne and Arapaho—about 200 warriors and 500 women and children—camped at Sand Creek. The attack at dawn on November 29, 1864 killed over 150 inhabitants, mostly women and children. DEATH ON THE BOZEMAN TRAIL
The Bozeman Trail ran directly through Sioux hunting grounds in the Bighorn Mountains. The Sioux chief, Red Cloud (Mahpiua Luta), had unsuccessfully appealed to the government to end white settlement on the trail. In December 1866, the warrior Crazy Horse ambushed Captain William J. Fetterman and his company at Lodge Trail Ridge. Over 80 soldiers were killed. Native Americans called this fight the Battle of the Hundred Slain. Whites called it the Fetterman Massacre. Skirmishes continued until the government agreed to close the Bozeman Trail. In return, the Treaty of Fort Laramie, in which the Sioux agreed to live on a reservation along the Missouri River, was forced on the leaders of the Sioux in 1868. Sitting Bull (Tatanka Iyotanka), leader of the Hunkpapa Sioux, had never signed it. Although the Ogala and Brule Sioux did sign the treaty, they expected to continue using their traditional hunting grounds.
PLAYER
SITTING BULL 1831-1890
As a child, Sitting Bull was known as Hunkesni, or Slow; he earned the name Tatanka Iyotanka (Sitting Bull) after a fight with the Crow, a traditional enemy of the Sioux.
Sitting Bull led his people by the strength of his character and purpose. He was a warrior, spiritual leader, and medicine man, and he was determined that whites should leave Sioux territory. His most famous fight was at the Little Bighorn River. About his opponent, George Armstrong Custer, he said, “They tell me I murdered Custer. It is a lie. . . . He was a fool and rode to his death.”
After Sitting Bull’s surrender to the federal government in 1881, his dislike of whites did not change. He was killed by Native American police at Standing Rock Reservation in December 1890.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
jj) What was the government’s policy toward Native American land?
104 Chapter 5
Shrinking Native American Lands, and Battle Sites
	/ J		2000	
	} \		(v	" {
	K			

‘ :ij!

Bloody Battles Continue
Colonel George Armstrong Custer, 1865
▼
The Treaty of Fort Laramie provided only a temporary halt to warfare.
The conflict between the two cultures continued as settlers moved westward and Native American nations resisted the restrictions imposed upon them. A Sioux warrior explained why.
A
Personal Voice gall, a hunkpapa sioux “ [We] have been taught to hunt and live on the game. You tell us that we must learn to farm, live in one house, and take on your ways. Suppose the people living beyond the great sea should come and tell you that you must stop farming, and kill your cattle, and take your, houses and lands, what would you do? Would you not fight them?
—quoted in Bury My Heart at Wounded Knee
RED RIVER WAR
In late 1868, war broke out yet again as the Kiowa and Comanche engaged in six years of raiding that finally led to the Red River War of 1874-1875. The U.S. Army responded by herding the people of friendly tribes onto reservations while opening fire on all others. General Philip Sheridan, a Union Army veteran, gave orders "to destroy their villages and ponies, to kill and hang all warriors, and to bring back all women and children." With such tactics, the army crushed resistance on the southern plains. GOLD RUSH
Within four years of the Treaty of Fort Laramie, miners began searching the Black Hills for gold. The Sioux, Cheyenne, and Arapaho protested the encroachment on their lands to no avail. In 1874, when Colonel George A. Custer reported that the Black Hills had gold "from the grass roots down," a gold rush was on. Red Cloud and Spotted Tail, another Sioux chief, vainly appealed again to government officials.
CUSTER’S LAST STAND
In early June 1876, the Sioux and Cheyenne held a sun dance, during which Sitting Bull had a vision of soldiers and some Native Americans falling from their horses. When Colonel Custer and his troops reached the Little Bighorn River, the Native Americans were ready for them. Led by Crazy Horse, Gall, and Sitting Bull, the warriors—with raised spears and rifles—outflanked and crushed Custer's troops. Within an hour, Custer and all of the men of the Seventh Cavalry were dead. By late 1876, however, the Sioux were beaten. Sitting Bull and a few followers took refuge in Canada, where they remained until 1881. Eventually, to prevent his people's starvation, Sitting Bull was forced to surrender. Later, in 1885, he appeared in William F. "Buffalo Bill" Cody's Wild West Show.
The Government Supports Assimilation
' iU
The Winchester ’76 rifle used by government troops, and a Sioux war bow.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
£) What were the results of Custer’s last stand?
3
. z » n.	,	y	,
Around 1870, the government's Indian policy changed again. Most government officials and reformers came to support assimilation, a plan under which Native Americans would give up their way of life and become Americanized This movement entailed a wholesale attack on Native American beliefs and practices starting with tribal identity. The Bureau of Indian Affairs established boarding schools where Native American children were sent to learn about white culture.
D*WES ACT
In 1887' Congress passed the Dawes Act, a significant step in he Americanization process. The act broke up the reservations and gave some reservation land to individual Native Americans-160 acres to each head of >6 Chapter 5
household and 80 acres to each unmarried adult. The government would sell the remainder of the reservations to settlers, and the resulting income would be used by Native Americans to buy farm implements. By 1932, whites had taken about two-thirds of the territory that had been set aside for Native Americans. In the end, the Native Americans received no money from the sale of these lands.
THE DESTRUCTION OF THE BUFFALO
Perhaps the most significant blow to tribal life on the plains was the destruction of the buffalo. Tourists and fur traders shot buffalo for sport. U.S. General Sheridan noted with approval that buffalo hunters were destroying the Plains Indians' main source of food, clothing, shelter, and fuel. In 1800, approximately 65 million buffalo roamed the plains; by 1890, fewer than 1000 remained. In 1900, the United States sheltered, in Yellowstone National Park, a single wild herd of buffalo. The Battle of Wounded Knee
The Sioux continued to suffer poverty and disease. In desperation, they turned to a Paiute prophet who promised that if the Sioux performed a ritual called the Ghost Dance, Native American lands and way of life would be restored.
The Ghost Dance movement spread rapidly among the 25,000 Sioux on the Dakota reservation. Alarmed military leaders ordered the arrest of Sitting Bull. In December 1890, about 40 Native American police were sent to arrest him. Sitting Bull's friend and bodyguard, Catch-the-Bear, shot one of them. The police then killed Sitting Bull. In the aftermath, Chief Big Foot led the fearful Sioux away.
WOUNDED KNEE
On December 28, 1890, the Seventh Cavalry—Custer's old regiment—rounded up about 350 starving and freezing Sioux and took them to a camp at Wounded Knee Creek in South Dakota. The next day, the soldiers demanded that the Native Americans give up all their weapons. A shot was fired; from which side, it was not clear. The soldiers opened fire with deadly cannon. 
Importance of the Buffalo
The buffalo provided the Plains Indians with more than just a high-protein food
of the buffalo
was considered sacred and
, was used in many Native	.
American rituals.
n
i1 - *	< vh
American rituals.
1	A'	t

were, carved into bowls , ,
Qnnnnct	\


of' the buffatb'

/	were made
; ~	/ -W'wk hoe pjacJes Yhe hoofs
,	ground up and used as glue.


Was by far the most . ..precious part of the buffalo.
NatiyeAmerican clothing, tepees,
and evervarrow shields were .	jfca
made from btiffafo hide. WjfKUfl

NEZ PERCE IN OREGON
Forced off their tribal lands in Wallowa County, Oregon, in 1877, the Nez Perce are returning almost 120 years later. 1999 figures put the number of Nez Perce in the Oregon area at around 3,000.
In 1997, Wallowa community leaders obtained a grant to develop the Wallowa Band Nez Perce Trail Interpretive Center—a cultural center that hosts powwows and other activities to draw tourists.
“I never thought I’d see the day,” said Earl (Taz) Conner, a direct descendant of Chief Joseph, the best known of the Nez Perce. And, in the words of Soy Redthunder, another tribe member, “[We] look at it as homecoming.”
Within minutes, the Seventh Cavalry slaughtered as many as 300 mostly unarmed Native Americans, including several children. The soldiers left the corpses to freeze on the ground. This event, the Battle of Wounded Knee, brought the Indian wars—and an entire era—to a bitter end.
The events of this period changed the demographic composition of the American West. Lured by economic opportunities and supported by government policies that sought to move Native Americans onto reservations and to convince them to abandon their traditional culture, new settlers seeking a better life moved in and took over these lands. As you can see on the map on page 205, the land occupied by Native Americans decreased dramatically. For the most part, they were replaced by individuals from three major groups: white Americans from the East, African Americans from the South, and immigrants.
Cattle Becomes Big Business
As the great herds of buffalo disappeared, and Native Americans were forced onto smaller and less desirable reserver-ations, horses and cattle flourished on the plains. As cattle ranchers opened up the Great Plains to big business, ranching from Texas to Kansas became a profitable investment.
VAQUEROS AND COWBOYS
American settlers had never managed large herds on the open range, and they learned from their Mexican neighbors how to round up, rope, brand, and care for the animals. The animals themselves, the Texas longhorns, were sturdy, short-tempered breeds accustomed to the dry grasslands of southern Spain. Spanish settlers raised longhorns for food and brought horses to use as work animals and for transportation. As American as the cowboy seems today, his way of life stemmed directly from that of those first Spanish ranchers in Mexico. The cowboy's clothes, food, and vocabulary were heavily influenced by the Mexican vaquero, who was the first to wear spurs, which he attached with straps to his bare feet and used to control his horse. His chaparreras, or leather overalls, became known as chaps. He ate charqui, or "jerky"—dried strips of meat. The Spanish bronco caballo, or "rough horse" that ran wild, became known as a bronco or bronc. The strays, or mestenos, were the same mustangs that the American cowboy tamed and prized. The Mexican rancho became the American ranch. Finally, the English words corral and
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
What events led to the Battle of Wounded Knee?
!
MAIN IDEA
Drawing
Conclusions
U
What does the American cowboy tradition owe to the Mexican vaquero? MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
$ What developments led to the rapid growth of the cattle industry?
rodeo were borrowed from Spanish. In his skills, dress, and speech, the Mexican vaquero was the true forerunner of the American "buckaroo" or cowboy.
Despite the plentiful herds of Western cattle, cowboys were not in great demand until the railroads reached the Great Plains. Before the Civil War, ranchers for the most part didn't stray far from their homesteads with their cattle. There were, of course, some exceptions. During the California gold rush in 1849, some hardy cattlemen on horseback braved a long trek, or drive, through Apache territory and across the desert to collect $25 to $125 a head for their cattle. In 1854, two ranchers drove their cattle 700 miles to Muncie, Indiana, where they put them on stock cars bound for New York City. When the cattle were unloaded in New York, the stampede that followed caused a panic on Third Avenue. Parts of the country were not ready for the mass transportation of animals.
GROWING DEMAND FOR BEEF
After the Civil War, the demand for beef skyrocketed, partly due to the rapidly growing cities. The Chicago Union Stock Yards opened in 1865, and by spring 1866, the railroads were running regularly through Sedalia, Missouri. From Sedalia, Texas ranchers could ship their cattle to Chicago and markets throughout the East. They found, however, that the route to Sedalia presented several obstacles: including thunderstorms and rain-swollen rivers. Also, in 1866, farmers angry about trampled crops blockaded cattle in Baxter Springs, Kansas, preventing them from reaching Sedalia. Some herds then had to be sold at cut-rate prices, others died of starvation. JP) THE COW TOWN
The next year, cattlemen found a more convenient route. Illinois cattle dealer Joseph McCoy approached several Western towns with plans to create a shipping yard where the trails and rail lines came together. The tiny Kansas town of Abilene enthusiastically agreed to the plan. McCoy built cattle pens, a three-story hotel, and helped survey the Chisholm Trail—the major cattle route from San Antonio, Texas, through Oklahoma to Kansas. Thirty-five thousand head of cattle were shipped out of the yard in Abilene during its first HISTORY
VIDEO
Wild West: Cattle Drive
no w
90°W
209
History Through

STAMPEDED BY LIGHTNING
(1908) Painter and sculptor Frederic Remington is best known for his romantic and spirited depictions of the Western frontier. Remington liked to paint in a single dominant color. Native Americans, cowboys at work, and other familiar Western scenes were all subjects of Remington’s work.
What do you learn about the work of the cowboy in this painting?
year in operation. The following year, business more than doubled, to 75,000 head. Soon ranchers were hiring cowboys to drive their cattle to Abilene. Within a few years, the Chisholm Trail had worn wide and deep.
! ir
I
! 1
A
Day in the Life of a Cowboy The meeting of the Chisholm Trail and the railroad in Abilene ushered in the heyday of the cowboy. As many as 55,000 worked the plains between 1866 and 1885. Although folklore and postcards depicted the cowboy as Anglo-American, about 25 percent of them were African American, and at least 12 percent were Mexican. The romanticized American cowboy of myth rode the open range, herding cattle and fighting villains. Meanwhile, the real-life cowboy was doing nonstop work.
A DAY’S WORK A
cowboy worked 10 to 14 hours a day on a ranch and 14 or more on the trail, alert at all times for dangers that might harm or upset the herds. Some cowboys were as young as 15; most were broken-down by the time they were 40. A cowboy might own his saddle, but his trail horse usually belonged to his boss. He was an expert rider and roper. His gun might be used to protect the herd from wild or diseased animals rather than to hurt or chase outlaws. ROUNDUP
The cowboy's season began with a spring roundup, in which he and other hands from the ranch herded all the longhorns they could find on the open range into a large corral. They kept the herd penned there for several days, until the cattle were so hungry that they preferred grazing to running away. Then the cowboys sorted through the herd, claiming the cattle that were marked with the brand of their ranch and calves that still needed to be branded. After the herd was gathered and branded, the trail boss chose a crew for the long drive. THE LONG DRIVE
This overland transport, or long drive, of the animals often lasted about three months. A typical drive included one cowboy for every 250 to 300 head of cattle; a cook who also drove the chuck wagon and set up camp- and a wrangler who cared for the extra horses. A trail boss earned $100 or more a month for supervising the drive and negotiating with settlers and Native Americans Chapter 5
MAIN IDEA
Comparing
£ How did the cowboy’s life differ from the myth about it?
During the long drive, the cowboy was in the saddle from dawn to dusk. He slept on the ground and bathed in rivers. He risked death and loss every day of the drive, especially at river crossings, where cattle often hesitated and were swept away. Because lightning was a constant danger, cowboys piled their spurs, buckles, and other metal objects at the edge of their camp to avoid attracting lightning bolts. Thunder, or even a sneeze, could cause a stampede. 3#
LEGENDS OF THE WEST
Legendary figures like James Butler "Wild Bill" Hickok and Martha Jane Burke (Calamity Jane) actually never dealt with cows. Hickok served as a scout and a spy during the Civil War and, later, as a marshal in Abilene, Kansas. He was a violent man who was shot and killed while holding a pair of aces and a pair of eights in a poker game, a hand still known as the "dead man's hand." Calamity Jane was an expert sharpshooter who dressed as a man. She may have been a scout for Colonel George Custer. THE WILD WEST SHOW
In the 1880s, William F. Cody toured the country with a show called Buffalo Bill’s Wild West.
The show featured trick riding and roping exhibitions. It thrilled audiences with mock battles between cowboys and Indians.
Wild Bill Hickok, Annie Oakley, Calamity Jane (shown here), and even Sitting Bull toured in Wild West shows. Their performances helped make Western life a part of American mythology.
The End of the Open Range
Almost as quickly as cattle herds multiplied and ranching became big business, the cattle frontier met its end. Overgrazing of the land, extended bad weather, and the invention of barbed wire were largely responsible.
Between 1883 and 1887 alternating patterns of dry summers and harsh winters wiped out whole herds. Most ranchers then turned to smaller herds of high-grade stock that would yield more meat per animal. Ranchers fenced the land with barbed wire, invented by Illinois farmer Joseph F. Glidden. It was cheap and easy to use and helped to turn the open plains into a series of fenced-in ranches. The era of the wide-open West was over.
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance. •Great Plains	’George A. Custer	’Battle of Wounded Knee
•Treaty of Fort Laramie	‘assimilation	’longhorn
•Sitting Bull	*Dawes Act
•Chisholm Trail • long drive
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Fill in supporting details about the culture of the Plains Indians.
Culture of the Plains Indians
Buffalo and Horse
Family Life
-----1
Beliefs
CRITICAL THINKING
MAKING INFERENCES
Why do you think the assimilation policy failed? In small groups, discuss the Americanization movement.
Think About:
•	the experience of Native Americans such as Zitkala-Sa
•	the attitudes of many white leaders toward Native Americans
•	the merits of owning property
•	the importance of cultural heritage
ANALYZING CAUSES
What economic opportunities drew large numbers of people to the Great Plains beginning in the mid-1800s?
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
Identify the reasons for the rise and the decline of the cattle industry.
Changes on the Western Frontier 211
GEOGRAPHY SPOTLIGHT
The Klondike Gold Rush
"Gold! Gold! Gold!" shouted the headline of the Seattle Post Intelligencer on July 17, 1897. A huge gold strike had been made along the Klondike River in Canada's remote Yukon Territory near the Alaska border. Soon gold was discovered on the Alaska side of the border as well. As word reached Seattle and spread, the lure of gold inspired thousands of people to rush to the West. Over the next year, about 100,000 Americans stampeded to the Klondike in search of fortune. The region's physical geography and its human geographic factors, such as communication and transportation networks, human-environment interaction, and economic development, had a significant impact on the Klondike Gold Rush.
RU
I S
'I
•^0.
At,
			v			
	■1 Klondike goldfields □ Other goldfields — Principal routes of the Klondike Gold Rush 	
Alaska
u.0*




TWriiei

Bering
Sea
N A
’^1

di
/ k
&



PACIFIC OCFAN
500 Miles
1,000 Kilometers
170°W
I
160°W
I
150°W
140°W
130°W
COMMUNICATION AND TRANSPORTATION
Once gold was discovered, it took time for word to spread. In July 1897, the steamer Portland docked in Seattle with a group of successful Klondike gold miners and their riches aboard. Newspapers and telegraphs carried word of their success around the world. About 10,000 Seattle residents headed for Alaska to try their luck. People from elsewhere began to flock to Seattle, hoping to make it north to the goldfields before winter. From Seattle, there were two main routes: one mostly by water, through the Bering Sea to the Yukon River, and one primarily over land, involving a boat to Skagwav Alaska followed by a trek along the Dyea Trail over Chilkoot Pass or the White Pass Trail over White Pass. Unfortunately, the water route was expensive, so many mfoers were forced to use the grueling overland routes. The trip was long, cold, and difficult. For examSe at a certain point the Dyea Trail became too steep for pack animals, and miners had to lug their supplies up a steep snow staircase, often making several trips. Conditions were
arsh, and starvation, malnutrition, and exposure to cold were serious problems Manv gave up, and several died.	piuuiems. iviany
[HAPTER 5
jji
to


k»
J*,' >
v 5'
F F F F
'tf F F F F F 100,000 people set out for the Klondike.
FFFF
40,000 people make it.
Sr Sr
20,000 stake claims.
F
4,000 prospectors find gold.
200 become rich.
HUMAN-ENVIRONMENT INTERACTION
Miners’ efforts to reach the Klondike goldfields were further complicated by the supplies they had to bring with them. Canadian officials required that miners bring enough provisions for a year, or nearly a ton of goods. Prospectors brought groceries, clothing, hardware, tents, and sleds. Prospectors made slow progress on their journeys north, having to move a year’s worth of supplies over rough terrain. The image at left shows men with their supplies preparing to tackle Chilkoot Pass around 1898.
Those who reached the goldfields still had to deal with the issue of how to find and extract gold. Some gold could be found in creeks, but most was in the soil around the creeks. In the winter, miners used fires to heat the frozen ground, which allowed them to haul out mounds of frozen gravel. Then, during the summer, they would shovel the gravel into a sluice, a trough through which water flowed, and the water would carry off lightweight materials, leaving the gold to sink to the bottom. The mother-and-son prospecting team shown above are using a sluice in Fairbanks, Alaska.
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND
POPULATION SHIFTS
Unfortunately, the odds of striking it rich were not good, as the graphic above shows. Most of the prospectors who reached the Klondike came away disappointed. The best gold-bearing creeks had already been claimed, and the reports of “gold for the taking” had been greatly exaggerated. The greatest economic impact was on the towns in the region. For instance, as many as three-fourths of the prospectors passed through Seattle, and the money from the supplies they purchased there boosted the economy considerably. Cities also developed near the goldfields. About 30,000 people settled in Dawson City in the Yukon Territory. The population of Vancouver doubled, and in Edmonton, it tripled.
Changes on the Western Frontier 213
TEKS 12A,15A,27B
Settling on the Great Plains
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
Settlers on the Great Plains transformed the land despite great hardships.
The Great Plains region remains the breadbasket of the United States.
•	Homestead Act	• Morrill Act
•	exoduster	• bonanza farm
•soddy
American'sStory
hmhsocialstudies.com
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes about settling the Great Plains.
When Esther Clark Hill was a girl on the Kansas prairie in the 1800s, her father often left the family to go on hunting or trading expeditions. His trips left Esther's mother, Aliena Clark, alone on the farm.
Esther remembered her mother holding on to the reins of a runaway mule team, "her black hair tumbling out of its pins and over her shoulders, her face set and white, while one small girl clung with chattering teeth to the sides of the rocking wagon." The men in the settlement spoke admiringly about "Leny's nerve," and Esther thought that daily life presented a challenge even greater than driving a runaway team.
A
Personal Voice Esther clark hill “ I think, as much courage as It took to hang onto the reins that day, It took more to live twenty-four hours at a time, month in and out, on the lonely and lovely prairie, without giving up to the loneliness. ”
—quoted in Pioneer Women
As the railroads penetrated the frontier and the days of the free-ranging cowboy ended, hundreds of thousands of families migrated west, lured by vast tracts of cheap, fertile land. In their effort to establish a new life, they endured extreme hardships and loneliness.
▲
Plains settlers, like this woman depicted in Harvey Dunn’s painting Pioneer Woman, had to be strong and self-reliant.
Settlers Move Westward to Farm
It took over 250 years—from the first settlement at Jamestown until 1870—to turn 400 million acres of forests and prairies into flourishing farms. Settling the second 400 million acres took only 30 years, from 1870 to 1900. Human geographic factors such as federal land policy and the completion of transcontinental railroad lines made this rapid settlement possible.
RAILROADS OPEN THE WEST
From 1850 to 1871, the federal government made huge land grants to the railroads—170 million acres, worth half a billion .4 Chapter 5
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
A^
How did the railroads help open the West? Vocabulary speculator: a
person who buys or sells something that involves a risk on the chance of making a profit
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
In what ways did government policies encourage settlement of the West?
dollars for laying track in the West. In one grant, both the Union Pacific and the Central Pacific received 10 square miles of public land for every mile of track laid in a state and 20 square miles of land for every mile of track laid in a territory.
In the 1860s, the two companies began a race to lay track. The Central Pacific moved eastward from Sacramento, and the Union Pacific moved westward from Omaha. Civil War veterans, Irish and Chinese immigrants, African Americans, and Mexican Americans did most of the grueling labor. In late 1868, workers for the Union Pacific cut their way through the solid rock of the mountains, laying up to eight miles of track a day. Both companies had reached Utah by the spring of 1869. Fifteen years later, the country boasted five transcontinental railroads. The rails to the East and West Coasts were forever linked.
The railroad companies sold some of their land to farmers for two to ten dollars an acre. Some companies successfully sent agents to Europe to recruit buyers. By 1880, 44 percent of the settlers in Nebraska and more than 70 percent of those in Minnesota and Wisconsin were immigrants. /y
GOVERNMENT SUPPORT FOR SETTLEMENT
Another powerful attraction of the West was the land itself. In 1862, Congress passed the Homestead Act, offering 160 acres of land free to any citizen or intended citizen who was head of the household. From 1862 to 1900, up to 600,000 families took advantage of the government's offer. Several thousand settlers were exodusters—African Americans who moved from the post-Reconstruction South to Kansas. Despite the massive response by homesteaders, or settlers on this free land, private speculators and railroad and state government agents sometimes used the law for their own gain. Cattlemen fenced open lands, while miners and woodcutters claimed national resources. Only about 10 percent of the land was actually settled by the families for whom it was intended. In addition, not all plots of land were of equal value. Although 160 acres could provide a decent living in the fertile soil of Iowa or Minnesota, settlers on drier Western land
required larger plots to make farming worthwhile.
Eventually, the government strengthened the Homestead Act and passed more legislation to encourage settlers. In 1889, a major land giveaway in what is now Oklahoma attracted thousands of people. In less than a day, land-hungry settlers claimed 2 million acres in a massive land rush. Some took possession of the land before the government officially declared it open. Because these settlers claimed land sooner than they were supposed to, Oklahoma came to be known as the Sooner State. .By

Posters like the one shown here drew hundreds of thousands of settlers to the West. Among the settlers were thousands of exodusters—freed slaves who had left the South.
St fartas!
Brethren, Friends,iFellowCitizens:
I feel thankful to inform you that the
REAL ESTATE
AND
Homestead Association,
Will Leave Here the
15th ol April, O,
In pursuit of Homes in the Southwestern
Lands of America, at Transportation Rates, cheaper than ever
was known before.	i
For full information inquire of
Benj. Singleton, better known as old Pap, IO: zero, e 3sro»T3a; eu&oitt stzrbeii?.
Beware of Speculators and Adventnrere, as it is a dangerous thin'- ? to fall in their hands.	“
Nashville, Tcnn., March 18, 1878.
THE CLOSING OF THE FRONTIER
These federal policies provided significant economic incentives that changed the country forever as settlers gobbled up western land. The transcontinental railroad made it easier than ever for settlers to reach points further west. It also presented a source of land as railroads sold their federal allotments to settlers. The Homestead Act, with its offer of free land, also had a huge economic impact as nearly 2 million people applied for claims. For decades the U.S. Census Bureau had monitored the extent of American settlement. The frontier, according to the bureau, existed at the point where the population totaled fewer than 2 people per square mile. In 1890, the Census Bureau declared that the country no longer had a continuous frontier line—the frontier no longer existed. To many, the frontier was what had made America unique. In an 1893 essay entitled "The Significance of the Frontier in American History," the historian Frederick Jackson Turner agreed.
A
Personal Voice Frederick jackson turner “American social development has been continually beginning over again on the frontier. This perennial rebirth, this fluidity of American life, this expansion westward with its new opportunities, its continuous touch with the simplicity of primitive society, furnish the forces dominating American character. ”
—“The Significance of the Frontier in American History"
Today many historians question Turner's view. They think he gave too much importance to the frontier in the nation's development and in shaping a special American character. &
Settlers Meet the Challenges of the Plains
While the physical geography of the Plains included the fertile land that lured settlers, it also caused extreme hardships such as droughts, floods, fires, blizzards, and locust plagues. Still, settlers found ways to adapt and the number of people living west of the Mississippi River grew from 1 to almost 30 percent of the nation's population between 1850 and 1900.
DUGOUTS AND SODDIES
Since trees were scarce, most settlers built their homes from the land itself. Many pioneers dug their homes into the sides of ravines or small hills. A stovepipe jutting from the ground was often the only clear sign of such a dugout home. Those who moved to the broad, flat plains often made freestanding houses by stacking blocks of prairie turf. Like a dugout, a sod home, or soddy, was warm in
A pioneer family stands in front of their soddy near Coburg, Nebraska in 1887.
Background
The U.S. Census Bureau is the permanent collector of timely, relevant data about the people and economy of the United States.
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
Q
What was Turner’s view of the role of the American frontier in 1893? Vocabulary locust: any of
numerous grasshoppers that travel in large swarms, often doing great damage to crops
,6
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
JJ^How did new inventions change farming in the West?
winter and cool in summer. Soddies were small, however, and offered little light or air. They were havens for snakes, insects, and other pests. Although they were fireproof, they leaked continuously when it rained.
WOMEN’S WORK
Virtually alone on the flat, endless prairie, homesteaders had to be almost superhumanly self-sufficient. Women often worked beside the men in the fields, plowing the land and planting and harvesting the predominant crop, wheat. They sheared the sheep and carded wool to make clothes for their families. They hauled water from wells that they had helped to dig, and made soap and candles from tallow. At harvest time, they canned fruits and vegetables. They were skilled in doctoring—from snakebites to crushed limbs. Women also sponsored schools and churches in an effort to build strong communities. TECHNICAL SUPPORT FOR FARMERS
Establishing a homestead was challenging. Once accomplished, it was farming the prairie, year in and year out, that became an overwhelming task. In 1837, John Deere had invented a steel plow that could slice through heavy soil. In 1847, Cyrus McCormick began to mass-produce a reaping machine. But a mass market for these devices didn't fully develop until the late 1800s with the migration of farmers onto the plains. Other new and improved devices made farm work speedier—the spring-tooth harrow to prepare the soil (1869), the grain drill to plant the seed (1841), barbed wire to fence the land (1874), and the corn binder (1878). Then came a reaper that could cut and thresh wheat in one pass. By 1890, there were more than 900 manufacturers of farm equipment. In 1830, producing a bushel of grain took about 183 minutes. By 1900, with the use of these machines, it took only 10 minutes. These inventions made more grain available for a wider market.
AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION
The federal government supported farmers by financing agricultural education. The Morrill Act of 1862 and 1890 gave federal land to the states to help finance agricultural colleges, and the Hatch Act of 1887 established agricultural experiment stations to inform farmers of new developments. Agricultural researchers developed grains for arid soil and techniques for dry farming, which helped the land to retain moisture. These innovations enabled the dry eastern plains to flourish and become "the breadbasket of the nation." Science
Technology
INVENTIONS THAT
TAfKDfTHE PRAIRIE On the Great Plains, treeless expanses, root-filled soil, and unpredictable weather presented challenges to farming.

I

Bm^eiefficjenjluSSSiS
:P/ ;Wire;p,rey(erited
from trampling crops and "	weather,
wandering off.
fj^^e^peEsaVed^rops7 fromnnclement
by bringing up underground water for irrigation.
Changes on the Western Frontier 217
Bonanza farms like this one required the labor of hundreds of farm hands and horses.
FARMERS IN DEBT
Elaborate machinery was expensive, and farmers often had to borrow money to buy it. When prices for wheat were higher, farmers could usually repay their loans. When wheat prices fell, however, farmers needed to raise more crops to make ends meet. This situation gave rise to a new type of farming in the late 1870s. Railroad companies and investors created bonanza farms, enormous single-crop spreads of 15,000-50,000 acres. The Cass-Cheney-Dalrymple farm near Cassleton, North Dakota, for example, covered 24 square miles. By 1900, the average farmer had nearly 150 acres under cultivation. Some farmers mortgaged their land to buy more property, and as farms grew bigger, so did farmers' debts. Between 1885 and 1890, much of the plains experienced drought, and the large single-crop operations couldn't compete with smaller farms, which could be more flexible in the crops they grew. The bonanza farms slowly folded into bankruptcy. Farmers also felt pressure from the rising cost of shipping grain. Railroads charged Western farmers a higher fee than they did farmers in the East. Also, the railroads sometimes charged more for short hauls, for which there was no competing transportation, than for long hauls. The railroads claimed that they were merely doing business, but farmers resented being taken advantage of. "No other system of taxation has borne as heavily on the people as those extortions and inequalities of railroad charges" wrote Henry Demarest Lloyd in an article in the March 1881 edition of Atlantic Monthly.
Many farmers found themselves growing as much grain as they could grow, on as much land as they could acquire, which resulted in going further into debt. But they were not defeated by these conditions. Instead, these challenging conditions drew farmers together in a common cause.
Vocabulary mortgage: to
legally pledge property to a creditor as security for the payment of a loan or debt
Vocabulary extortion: illegal use of one’s official position or powers to obtain property or funds
ASSESSMENT

1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•Homestead Act •exoduster
•soddy •Morrill Act
bonanza farm
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Create a time line of four events that shaped the settling of the Great Plains.__________
| event two~[ [ event four~|
| event one | [event three]
How might history be different if one of these events hadn’t happened?
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	EVALUATING
How successful were government efforts to promote settlement of the Great Plains? How did the economic impact of these efforts contribute to the close of the frontier? Think About:
•	the growth in population on the Great Plains
•	the role of railroads
•	the Homestead Act
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
Review the changes in technology that influenced the life of settlers on the Great Plains in the late 1800s. Explain how specific needs of settlers in the region led to these technological innovations.
IDENTIFYING PROBLEMS
How did the railroads take advantage of farmers?
218 Chapter 5
Farmers and the Populist Movement
MAIN IDEA | WHY IT MATTERS NOW |
i Terms & Names Farmers united to address their economic problems, giving rise to the Populist movement.	Many of the Populist reform issues, such as income tax and legally protected rights of workers, are now taken for granted.	•Oliver Hudson Kelley •Grange •Farmers’ Alliances • Populism	•bimetallism •gold standard •William McKinlej •William Jennings Bryan
One American's Story

TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes about the Populist Party.
As a young adult in the early 1870s, Mary Elizabeth Lease left home to teach school on the Kansas plains. After marrying farmer Charles Lease, she joined the growing Farmers' Alliance movement and began speaking on issues of concern to farmers. Lease joked that her tongue was "loose at both ends and hung on a swivel," but her golden voice and deep blue eyes hypnotized her listeners.
A
Personal Voice mary Elizabeth lease “What you farmers need to do is to raise less corn and more Hell! We want the accursed foreclosure system wiped out. . . . We will stand by our homes and stay by our firesides by force if necessary, and we will not pay our debts to the loan-shark companies until the Government pays its debts to us. ” —quoted in “The Populist Uprising”
Farmers had endured great hardships in helping to transform the plains from the "Great American Desert" into the "breadbasket of the nation," yet every year they reaped less and less of the bounty they had sowed with their sweat.
Farmers Unite to Address Common Problems
In the late 1800s, many farmers were trapped in a vicious economic cycle. Prices for crops were falling, and farmers often mortgaged their farms so that they could buy more land and produce more crops. Good farming land was becoming scarce, though, and banks were foreclosing on the mortgages of increasing numbers of farmers who couldn't make payments on their loans. Moreover, the railroads were taking advantage of farmers by charging excessive prices for shipping and storage.
Mary Elizabeth Lease, the daughter of Irish immigrants, was a leader of the Populist Party.
Changes on the Western Frontier 219
Analyzing
Political Cartoons J
THE PLIGHT OF THE FARMERS
Farmers were particularly hard hit in the decades leading to the financial panic of 1893. They regarded big business interests as insurmountable enemies who were bringing them to their knees and leaving them with debts at every turn. This cartoon is a warning of the dangers confronting not only the farmers but the entire nation.
SKILLBUILDER
Analyzing Political Cartoons 1.	How does this cartoon depict the plight of the farmers?
2.	Who does the cartoonist suggest is responsible for the farmers’ plight?
ECONOMIC DISTRESS
The troubles of the farmers were part of a larger economic problem affecting the entire nation. During the Civil War, the United States had issued almost $500 million in paper money, called greenbacks. Greenbacks could not be exchanged for silver or gold money. They were worth less than hard money of the same face value. Hard money included both coins and paper money printed in yellow ink that could be exchanged for gold. After the war, the government began to take the greenbacks out of circulation.
Retiring the greenbacks caused some discontent. It increased the value of the money that stayed in circulation. It meant that farmers who had borrowed money had to pay back their loans in dollars that were worth more than the dollars they had borrowed. At the same time they were receiving less money for their crops. Between 1867 and 1887, for example, the price of a bushel of wheat fell from $2.00 to 68 cents. In effect, farmers lost money at every turn.
Throughout the 1870s, the farmers and other debtors pushed the government to issue more money into circulation. Those tactics failed—although the Bland-Allison Act of 1878 required the government to buy and coin at least $2 million to $4 million worth of silver each month. It wasn't enough to support the increase in the money supply that the farmers wanted.
PROBLEMS WITH THE RAILROADS
Meanwhile, farmers paid outrageously high prices to transport grain. Lack of competition among the railroads meant that it might cost more to ship grain from the Dakotas to Minneapolis by rail than from Chicago to England by boat. Also, railroads made secret agreements with middlemen grain brokers and merchants—that allowed the railroads to control grain storage prices and to influence the market price of crops. Many farmers mortgaged their farms for credit with which to buy seed and supplies. Suppliers charged high rates of interest, sometimes charging more for items bought on credit than they did for cash purchases. Farmers got caught in a cycle of credit that meant longer hours and more debt every year. It was time for reform. &
THE FARMERS’ ALLIANCES
To push effectively for reforms, however farmers needed to organize. In 1867, Oliver Hudson Kelley started the Patrons of MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
Why did
farmers think that an increased money supply would help solve their economic problems?
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
& What were some of the causes of farmers’ economic problems?
120 Chapter 5
Vocabulary regulate: to
control or direct according to a rule or law
Husbandry, an organization for farmers that became popularly known as the Grange. Its original purpose was to provide a social outlet and an educational forum for isolated farm families. By the 1870s, however, Grange members spent most of their time and energy fighting the railroads. The Grange's battle plan included teaching its members how to organize, how to set up farmers' cooperatives, and how to sponsor state legislation to regulate railroads.
The Grange gave rise to other organizations, such as Farmers' Alliances. These groups included many others who sympathized with farmers. Alliances sent lecturers from town to town to educate people about topics such as lower interest rates on loans and government control over railroads and banks. Spellbinding speakers such as Mary Elizabeth Lease helped get the message across.
Membership grew to more than 4 million—mostly in the South and the West. The Southern Alliance, made up of white Southern farmers, was the largest. About 250,000 African Americans belonged to the Colored Farmers' National Alliance. Some alliance members promoted cooperation between black and white alliances, but most members accepted the separation of the organizations.
HISTORICAL
SPOTLIGHT
THE COLORED FARMERS’ NATIONAL ALLIANCE
A white Baptist missionary, R. M. Humphrey, organized the Colored Farmers’ National Alliance in 1886 in Houston, Texas. Like their counterparts in the white alliances, members of the local colored farmers’ alliances promoted cooperative buying and selling. Unlike white organizations, however, the black alliances had to work mostly in secret to avoid racially motivated violence at the hands of angry landowners and suppliers.
The Rise and Fall of Populism
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
Q
What was the Populist Party platform? Leaders of the alliance movement realized that to make far-reaching changes, they would need to build a base of political power. Populism—the movement of the people—was born with the founding of the Populist, or People's, Party, in
1892.	On July 2, 1892, a Populist Party convention in Omaha, Nebraska, demanded reforms to lift the burden of debt from farmers and other workers and to give the people a greater voice in their government.
THE POPULIST PARTY PLATFORM
The economic reforms proposed by the Populists included an increase in the money supply, which would produce a rise in prices received for goods and services; a graduated income tax; and a federal loan program. The proposed governmental reforms included the election of U.S. senators by popular vote, single terms for the president and the vice-president, and a secret ballot to end vote fraud. Finally, the Populists called for an eight-hour workday and restrictions on immigration. The proposed changes were so attractive to struggling farmers and desperate laborers that in 1892 the Populist presidential candidate won almost 10 percent of the total vote. In the West, the People's Party elected five senators, three governors, and about 1,500 state legislators. The Populists' programs eventually became the platform of the Democratic Party and kept alive the concept that the government is responsible for reforming social injustices.
THE PANIC OF 1893
During the 1880s, farmers were overextended with debts and loans. Railroad construction had expanded faster than markets. In February 1893,	the Philadelphia and Reading Railroad went bankrupt, followed by the Erie, the Northern Pacific, the Union Pacific, and the Santa Fe. The government's gold supply had worn thin, partly due to its obligation to purchase silver. People panicked and traded paper money for gold. The panic also spread to Wall Street, where the prices of stocks fell rapidly. The price of silver then plunged, causing silver mines to close. By the end of the year, over 15,000 businesses and 500 banks had collapsed.

h.
i!
{
!
Changes on the Western Frontier 221
yi.V PLAYER
WILLIAM JENNINGS BRYAN 1860-1925
William Jennings Bryan might be considered a patron saint of lost causes, largely because he let beliefs, not politics, guide his actions. He resigned his position as secretary of state (1913-1915) under Woodrow Wilson, for example, to protest the president’s movement away from neutrality regarding the war in Europe.
Near the end of his life, he went to Tennessee to assist the prosecution in the Scopes “monkey trial,” contesting the teaching of evolution in public schools. He is perhaps best characterized by a quote from his own “Cross of Gold” speech: “The humblest citizen in all the land, when clad in the armor of a righteous cause, is stronger than all the hosts of error.”
Investments declined, and consumer purchases, wages, and prices also fell. Panic deepened into depression as 3 million people lost their jobs. By December 1894, a fifth of the work force was unemployed. Many farm families suffered both hunger and unemployment.
SILVER OR GOLD
Populists watched as the two major political parties became deeply divided in a struggle between different regions and economic interests. Business owners and bankers of the industrialized Northeast were Republicans; the farmers and laborers of the agrarian South and West were Democrats. The central issue of the campaign was which metal would be the basis of the nation's monetary system. On one side were the "silverites," who favored bimetallism, a monetary system in which the government would give citizens either gold or silver in exchange for paper currency or checks. On the other side were President Cleveland and the "gold bugs," who favored the gold standard—backing dollars solely with gold.
The backing of currency was an important campaign issue because people regarded paper money as worthless if it could not be turned in for gold or silver. Because silver was more plentiful than gold, backing currency with both metals, as the silverites advocated, would make more currency (with less value per dollar) available. Supporters of bimetallism hoped that this measure would stimulate the stagnant economy. Retaining the gold standard would provide a more stable, but expensive, currency.
BRYAN AND THE “CROSS OF GOLD”
Stepping into the debate, the Populist Party called for bimetallism and free coinage of silver. Yet their strategy was undecided: should they join forces with sympathetic candidates in the major parties and risk losing their political identity, or should they nominate their own candidates and risk losing the election? As the 1896 campaign progressed, the Republican Party stated its firm commitment to the gold standard and nominated Ohioan William McKinley for president. After much debate, the Democratic Party came out in favor of a combined gold and silver standard, including unlimited coinage of silver. At the Democratic convention, former Nebraska congressman William Jennings Bryan, editor of the Omaha World-Herald, delivered an impassioned address to the assembled MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
What caused the panic of 1893?
Gold Bugs and Silverites		
	told Bug®	Silverites
Who They Were	bankers and businessmen	farmers and laborers
What They Wanted	gold standard less money in circulation	bimetallism more money in circulation
Why	Loans would be repaid in stable money.	Products would be sold at higher prices.
Effects	DEFLATION •	Prices fall. •	Value of money increases. •	Fewer people have money.	INFLATION'. •	Prices rise. •	Value of money decreases. •	More people have money.
222 Chapter 5

MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
Why was the metal that backed paper currency such an important issue in the 1896 presidential campaign?
delegates. An excerpt of what has become known as the "Cross of Gold" speech follows.
A
Personal Voice william jennings bryan “ Having behind us the producing masses of this nation and the world, supported by the commercial interests, the laboring interests, and the toilers everywhere, we will answer their demand for a gold standard by saying to them: You shall not press down upon the brow of labor this crown of thorns, you shall not crucify mankind upon a cross of gold. ” —Democratic convention speech, Chicago, July 8, 1896
Bryan won the Democratic nomination. When the Populist convention met two weeks later, the delegates were both pleased and frustrated. They liked Bryan and the Democratic platform, but
they detested the Democratic vice-presidential candidate, Maine banker Arthur Sewall. Nor did they like giving up their identity as a party. They compromised by endorsing Bryan, nominating their own candidate, Thomas Watson of Georgia, for vice-president, and keeping their party organization intact.
THE END OF POPULISM
Bryan faced a difficult campaign. His free-silver stand had led gold bug Democrats to nominate their own candidate. It also weakened his support in cities, where consumers feared inflation because it would make goods more expensive. In addition, Bryan's meager funds could not match the millions backing McKinley. Bryan tried to make up for lack of funds by campaigning in 27 states and sometimes making 20 speeches a day. McKinley, on the other hand, campaigned from his front porch, while thousands of well-known people toured the country speaking on his behalf. McKinley got approximately 7 million votes and Bryan about 6.5 million. As expected, McKinley carried the East, while Bryan carried the South and the farm vote of the Middle West. The voters of the industrial Middle West, with their fear of inflation, brought McKinley into office.
With McKinley's election, Populism collapsed, burying the hopes of the farmers. The movement left two powerful legacies, however: a message that the downtrodden could organize and have political impact, and an agenda of reforms, many of which would be enacted in the 20th century.
William Jennings Bryan’s “Cross of Gold” speech inspired many cartoonists.
1.	TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•Oliver Hudson Kelley	•Farmers’ Alliances	•bimetallism
•Grange	•Populism	.gold standard
•William McKinley •William Jennings Bryan
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Identify the causes of the rise of the Populist Party and the effects the party had.
Causes
------->
------->
------->
Effects
Which effect has the most impact today? Explain.
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	HYPOTHESIZING
What do you think were the most significant factors in bringing an end to the Populist Party? Think about:
•	monetary policy
•	third-party status
•	source of popular support
•	popular participation policy
MAKING INFERENCES
How did the Grange and the Farmers’ Alliances pave the way for the Populist Party?
5.	EVALUATING
How effective was the Populist Party in achieving its goals as a third party?
Changes on the Western Frontier 223
AMERICAN LITERATURE
(1850-1900) Literature of the West
After gold was discovered in California, Americans came to view the West as a region of unlimited possibility. Those who could not venture there in person enjoyed reading about the West in colorful tales by writers such as Mark Twain (Samuel Clemens) and Bret Harte. Dime novels, cheaply bound adventure stories that sold for a dime, were also enormously popular in the second half of the 19th century.
Since much of the West was Spanish-dominated for centuries, Western literature includes legends and songs of Hispanic heroes and villains. It also includes the haunting words of Native Americans whose lands were taken and cultures threatened as white pioneers moved west.
a	December r.f,
A
Mark Twain THE CELEBRATED JUMPING FROG OF CALAVERAS COUNTY
The American humorist Samuel Clemens—better known as Mark Twain—was a would-be gold and silver miner who penned tales of frontier life. “The Celebrated Jumping Frog of Calaveras County” is set in a California mining camp. Most of the tale is told by Simon Wheeler, an old-timer given to exaggeration.
"Well, Smiley kep' the beast in a little lattice box, and he used to fetch him downtown sometimes and lay for a bet. One day a feller—a stranger in the camp, he was—come acrost him with his box, and says:
'"What might it be that you've got in the box?'
"And Smiley says, sorter indifferent-like, 'It might be a parrot,
or it might be a canary, maybe, but it ain't—it's only just a frog.'
"And the feller took it, and looked at it careful, and turned it round this way and that, and says, 'H'm—so 'tis. Well, what's
he good for?'
"'Well,' Smiley says, easy and careless, 'he's good enough for one thing, I should judge—he can out jump any frog in Calaveras County.'
The feller took the box again, and took another long, particular look, and give it back to Smiley, and says, very deliberate, 'Well,' he says, 'I don't see no p'ints about that frog that's any better'n any other frog.'
Maybe you don't,' Smiley says. 'Maybe you understand frogs and maybe you don't understand 'em; maybe you've had experience, and maybe you ain't only a amature, as it were. Anyways, I've got my opinion, and I'll resk forty dollars that he can out jump any frog in Calaveras County.'"
-Mark Twain, "The Celebrated Jumping Frog of Calaveras County" (1865)
224 Chapter 5
I
TEXAS TYPES—THE COWBOY
William Lawrence “Larry" Chittenden left his home in New Jersey in 1883 and made his way to Texas. Once there, he partnered with his uncle to establish a ranch near Anson in Jones County. He eventually became known as the poet-ranchman of Texas after the 1893 publication of Ranch Verses, a collection of his poems about ranch life in Texas.
He wears a big hat and big spurs and all that,
And leggins of fancy fringed leather;
He takes pride in his boots and the pistol he shoots,
And he's happy in all kinds of weather.
He is fond of his horse—'t is a bronco, of course,
For, oh, he can ride like the Devil;
He is old for his years, and he always appears To be foremost at round-up or revel.
—William Lawrence Chittenden, "Texas Types—The Cowboy" (1893)

Vaquero (modeled 1980/cast 1990), Luis Jimenez. National Museum of American Art/Art Resource,
New York.



* W '
1

A
Chief Satanta CHIEF SATANTA’S SPEECH AT THE MEDICINE LODGE CREEK COUNCIL
Known as the Orator of the Plains, Chief Satanta represented the Kiowa people in the 1867 Medicine Lodge Creek negotiations with the U.S. government. The speech from which this excerpt is taken was delivered by Satanta in Spanish but was translated into English and widely published in leading newspapers of the day.
All the land south of the Arkansas belongs to the Kiowas and Comanches, and I don’t want to give away any of it. I love the land and the buffalo and will not part with it. I want you to understand well what I say. Write it on paper. Let the Great Father [U.S. president] see it, and let me hear what he has to say. I want you to understand also, that the Kiowas and Comanches don’t want to fight, and have not been fighting since we made the treaty. I hear a great deal of good talk from the gentlemen whom the Great Father sends us, but they never do what they say. I don’t want any of the medicine lodges [schools and churches] within the country. I want the children raised as I was. When I make peace, it is a long and lasting one—there is no end to it. ... A long time ago this land belonged to our fathers; but when I go up to the river I see camps of soldiers on its banks. These soldiers cut down my timber; they kill my buffalo; and when I see that, my heart feels like bursting; I feel sorry. I have spoken.
—Chief Satanta, speech at the Medicine Lodge Creek Council (1867)
Comparing and Contrasting Compare and contrast the views these selections give of the American frontier in the second half of the 19th century. Use details from the selections to help explain your answer.
2.
X hmhsocialstudies.com
INTERNET ACTIVITY

From the gauchos of the Argentine pampas to the workers on Australian sheep stations, many nations have had their own versions of the cowboys of the American West. Use the links for American Literature to research one such nation. Prepare a bulletin-board display that shows the similarities and differences between Western cowboys and their counterparts in that country.
Changes on the Western Frontier 225
CHAPTER
ASSESSMENT
TERMS & NAMES
For each term or name below, write a sentence explaining its connection to changes on the Great Plains.
1.	Homestead Act 6.	George	A. Custer
2.	Sitting Buil	7.	William	Jennings Bryan
3.	assimilation	8.	William	McKinley
4.	Morrill Act	9.	Populism
5.	exoduster	10.	Grange
MAIN IDEAS
Use your notes and the information in the chapter to answer the following questions.
Cultures Clash on the Prairie (pages 202-211)
1.	Identify three differences between the culture of the Native Americans and the culture of the white settlers on the Great Plains.
2.	How effective was the Dawes Act in promoting the assimilation of Native Americans into white culture?
3.	Why did the cattle industry become a big business in the late 1800s?
4.	What were the causes of westward expansion? How did westward expansion affect U.S. demographic patterns?
Settling on the Great Plains (pages 214-218)
5.	What measures did the government take to support settlement of the frontier?
6.	How did settlers overcome the challenges of living on the Great Plains?
Farmers and the Populist Movement
(pages 219-223)
7.	What economic problems confronted American farmers in the 1890s?
8.	According to farmers and other supporters of free silver, how would bimetallism help the economy?
CRITICAL THINKING
USING YOUR NOTES
Create a diagram analyzing the impact of physical and human geographic factors on the settlement of the Great Plains. ANALYZING MOTIVES
In 1877, Nez Perce Chief Joseph said, “My people have always been the friends of white men. Why are you in such a hurry?” Why do you think white people hurried to settle the West, with so little regard for Native Americans? Give evidence from the chapter to support your position. MAKING GENERALIZATIONS
Look at the Geography Spotlight feature on pages 212-213. How did physical and human geographic factors impact the Klondike Gold Rush? VISUAL SUMMARY CHANGES ON THE WESTERN FRONTIER
NATIVE AMERICANS
Native Americans of the plains hunted, farmed, and traded in traditional ways. Plains peoples relied on the buffalo for a variety of survival needs.
RANCHERS AND COWHANDS
Ranchers and cowboys ushered in the era of the long drive and the roundup. Texas longhorn cattle took the place of the buffalo as the dominant animal on the Great Plains.
MINERS
Discoveries of gold and other precious metals led to the growth of mining camps and boomtowns in the Rocky Mountains and to the west.
FARMERS AND THE POPULIST MOVEMENT
New settlement, barbed wire, and bad weather ended the cattle boom. Farmers across the South, Midwest, and West organized to address their common economic problems.
Chapter 5
&

TEXAS TEST PRACTICE
Use the flowchart and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 1.
Rise and Fall of the Farm Economy, Late 1800s
New mechanized farm tools lead to increased production.
Crop output rises steadily from 1870-1900.
1. Which effect accurately completes the flowchart?
A
Farmers have less money to repay loans, and many lose their farms. B
Small farmers live off the land, so are not affected by the economy. C
Wealthy farmers hoard gold, rather than depend on paper money. D
The government subsidizes farmers to help them pay their bills. Use the quotation and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 2.
“ [We] have been taught to hunt and live on the game. You tell us that we must learn to farm, live in one house, and take on your ways. Suppose the people living beyond the great sea should come and tell you that you must stop farming, and kill your cattle, and take your houses and lands, what would you do? Would you not fight them?”
—Gall, a Hunkpapa Sioux, quoted in Bury My Heart at Wounded Knee
2.	What was Gall’s view of future relations between the Plains Indians and the settlers?
F peaceful coexistence G further conflict H mutual respect J equality before the law
3.	How did the invention of barbed wire change the look of the Western frontier?
A
It endangered wildlife. B
It ended the cattle frontier. C
It increased cattle stocks. D
It enriched the cow towns. 71 hmhsocialstudies.com
TEST PRACTICE
For additional test practice, go online for:
• Diagnostic tests • Tutorials
INTERACT WITH HISTORY
"VWriteSmart COLLABORATIVE LEARNI Think about the issues you recorded in myNotebook as you read the chapter. Suppose you are a frontier settler. Write a letter to the family members you left behind describing your journey west and how you are living now. Use information from the chapter to provide some vivid impressions of life on the frontier. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your letter.
XSgjnjitY
Work in pairs to research federal policy
toward Native Americans between 1830 and 1890. Then work together to create a time line identifying key events that shaped the policy and the relationships between whites and Native Americans during the time period. Begin your time line with the passage of the Indian Removal Act in 1830 and end it with the Battle of Wounded Knee in 1890.
!' I
"’J'WriteSmart
You are a historian studying the development of the American West. Write an essay explaining how Americans settled the West in the late 1800s and how the region changed as a result. Use specific examples to support your main idea. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your essay.
Changes on the Western Frontier 227
End-of-Chapter Skill Activity
Interpreting Historical Maps
DEFINING THE SKILL
A map is a representation of features on Earth's surface. Historians use different types of maps to locate historical events, to demonstrate how geography has influenced history, and to illustrate human interaction with the environment. A historical map provides information about a place at a certain time in history. It can illustrate information such as population density, economic activity, political alliances, battles, and movement of people and goods. Knowing how to use historical maps can help you see how places have changed over time. For example, these historical maps show current state boundaries and differences in western migration and settlement in 1850 and 1890.
UNDERSTANDING THE SKILL
STRATEGY: COMPARE INFORMATION ON MAPS
Use information from multiple sources to pose and answer questions about geographic distribution and patterns at different time periods. The maps below show westward migration in 1850 and 1890. Together, they show the effects of western migration over time. Read the title of the maps. The title will help you identify the subject and purpose of each map. Here the maos show western migration between 1850 and 1890. Pose a historical question about the subject of the map such as What present-day state not settled by 1850 was completely settled by 1890?” or “Why do you think peoDle settled the West Coast before they settled the interior of the United States?”	P
©
©
0
use the legend to interpret the map in order to answer your historical question. The legend explains the symbols and colors on the map. Use this information to determine how places have changed over time.
Look at the scale and compass rose. The scale shows you what distances are represented The shows you which direction on the map is west and where the West Coast is located.
compass rose
Find where the map area is located on Earth.
east of 120° W.
These maps span the area primarily above 30° N and on or
7 SKI
STRATEGY. MAKE A CHART A
chart can help you understand historical maps. Relate the map to the five geographic themes by making a chart. The five themes are described on page xv. In your chart, analyze distributions and find patterns. Location	Place	Region	Movement	Human- Environment Interaction
The midwestern to western United States; Below 20° N and primarily east of 120° W.	An area that is primarily landlocked but the western area and southeastern area border water. There are rivers that cross many states. There are mountainous areas.	The maps show contemporary state boundaries in the western, southwestern, mid western, and northwestern regions of the United States.	People migrated west and settled throughout the area between the Midwest and California. Areas now known as MN, IA, TX, KS, NE, SP, NP, CO, NM, and CA saw the biggest growth during this time.	The pattern shows the population largely distributed in areas off the map or on the eastern edge in 1350. The population distribution became more dense in the west by 1390. There are still large areas with less settlement in 1390, but many of these seem to be located near mountainous areas.
APPLYING THE SKILL
Turn to Chapter 5, Section 1, page 205 in your book. Use the maps to pose and answer historical questions and interpret social studies information, including geographic patterns and distributions shown on maps. Use the information shown on the maps to make a table or chart that records your answers to the questions that you posed about Native American lands in 1819 and 1894.
1.	Read the title of the map.
Look at the title of the big map as well as the labels on the smaller inset maps. What dates are covered on each map? What does this information tell you about the subject and purpose of these maps? What historical question can you ask about Native American lands and reservations?
2.	Use the legend to Interpret the map in order to answer your historical question.
What information can help answer your historical question? Compare and contrast the small inset maps. How have geographic patterns and distributions changed over time? What has stayed the same?
3.	Look at the scale and compass rose.
Look at the compass rose. What area of the United States had the most Indian reservations in 1819?
4.	Find where the map area is located on Earth.
Are there specific coordinates that help you explain the changes you see happening over time on the maps?
.V
\ \
Essential Question
What impact did scientific discoveries and manufacturing processes have on the nature of work, the American labor movement, and American businesses?

• 3877] Munn v. Illinois : establishes government : regulation of railroads.
: Mother Jones : supports the Great J Strike of 1877.
L1879]
Thomas A. Edison invents a workable light bulb. ' 1882 United States restricts Chinese immigration.
• 1883. Germany becomes the first nation to provide national health insurance.
:I1890J
: Colonization of • sub-Saharan : Africa peaks.

■ ■
Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills (TEKS)
3B, 3C, 15B, 24A, 24B, 26A, 27A, 29B, 29F
SECTION 1: The Expansion of Industry Main Idea At the end of the 19th century, natural resources, creative ideas, and growing markets fueled an industrial boom.
SECTION 2: The Age of the Railroads Main Idea The growth and consolidation of railroads benefited the nation but also led to corruption and required government regulation.
SECTION 3: Big Business and Labor Main Idea The expansion of industry resulted in the growth of big business and prompted laborers to form unions to better their lives.

USA
WORLD
Laborers blasted tunnels and constructed bridges to send the railroad through the rugged Sierra Nevada mountains.
118691 Central Pacific and Union Pacific complete the transcontinental railroad.
: f18761 Alexander : Graham Bell : invents the : telephone.

1870
[l870j Franco-Prussian War breaks out.
3875] British labor unions win right to strike.
TEKS3B,24A, 24B, 27A
The Expansion of Industry
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms A Names
At the end of the 19th century, natural resources, creative ideas, and growing markets fueled an industrial boom.
Technological developments of the late 19th century paved the way for the continued growth of American industry.
Edwin L. Drake Bessemer process Thomas Alva Edison
•Christopher
Sholes
•Alexander
Graham Bell
r One Americ^rt’s Stbry j5
hmhsocialstudies.com!
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the causes of the industrial boom and their impact on industrialization.
One day, Pattillo Higgins noticed bubbles in the springs around Spindletop, a hill near Beaumont in southeastern Texas. This and other signs convinced him that oil was underground. If Higgins found oil, it could serve as a fuel source around which a vibrant industrial city would develop.
Higgins, who had been a mechanic and a lumber merchant, couldn't convince geologists or investors that oil was present, but he didn't give up. A magazine ad seeking investors got one response—from Captain Anthony F. Lucas, an experienced prospector who also believed that there was oil at Spindletop. When other investors were slow to send money, Higgins kept his faith, not only in Spindletop, but in Lucas.
A
Personal Voice pattillo higgins “Captain Lucas,. . . these experts come and tell you this or that can’t happen because it has never happened before. You believe there Is oil here,. . . and I think you are right. I know there is oil here In greater quantities than man has ever found before. ”
▲
Pattillo Higgins
—quoted in Spindletop
In 1900, the two men found investors, and they began to drill that autumn. After months of difficult, frustrating work, on the morning of January 10, 1901, oil gushed from their well. The Texas oil boom had begun.
Natural Resources Fuel Industrialization
After the Civil War, the United States was still largely anTgric7l7mTnIti7~By the 1920s—a mere 60 years later-it had become the leading industrial power in the world. This immense industrial boom was due to several factors including- a wealth of natural resources, government support for business, and a growing urban population that provided both cheap labor and markets for new products
10 Chapter 6
i
i
Vocabulary
entrepreneur:
a person who organizes, operates, and assumes the risk for a business venture
BLACK GOLD
Oil became a key commodity in the late 1800s, valued as a fuel source and an industrial lubricant. Though Native Americans had made fuel and medicine from crude oil, early settlers had little use for it. Then, in the 1840s, Americans began using kerosene to light lamps after the Canadian geologist Abraham Gesner discovered how to distill the fuel from oil or coal. It wasn't until 1859, however, when Edwin L. Drake successfully used a steam engine to drill for oil near Titusville, Pennsylvania, that removing oil from beneath the earth's surface became practical. This breakthrough started an oil boom that spread to Kentucky, Ohio, Illinois, Indiana, and, eventually, Texas. Petroleum-refining industries arose in Cleveland and Pittsburgh as entrepreneurs rushed to transform the oil into kerosene. Gasoline, a byproduct of the refining process, originally was thrown away. But after the automobile became popular, gasoline became the most important form of oil.
BESSEMER STEEL PROCESS
Oil was not the only natural resource that was plentiful in the United States. There were also abundant deposits of coal and iron. In 1887, prospectors discovered iron ore deposits more than 100 miles long and up to 3 miles wide in the Mesabi Range of Minnesota. At the same time, coal production skyrocketed—from 33 million tons in 1870 to more than 250 million tons in 1900. Iron is a dense metal, but it is soft and tends to break and rust. It also usually contains other elements, such as carbon. Removing the carbon from iron produces a lighter, more flexible, and rust-resistant metal—steel. The raw materials needed to make steel were readily available; all that was needed was a cheap and efficient manufacturing process. The Bessemer process, developed independently by the British manufacturer Henry Bessemer and American ironmaker William Kelly around 1850, soon became widely used. This technique involved injecting air into molten iron to remove the carbon and other impurities. By 1880, American manufacturers were using the new method to produce more than 90 percent of the nation's steel. In this age of rapid change and innovation, even
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1.	Region Which state had the most steel-producing areas?
2.	Human-Environment Interaction What connection can you draw between natural resources (including water) and steel production in Pittsburgh?
Natural Resources and the Birth of a Steel Town, 1886-1906
o Steel mills, 1886 • Steel mills, 1906
The Technological Explosion, 1826-1903
1826 1831
1846 •Sewing Machine
I860	1867
Dynamite •
1873	1877
1876 1879
1895
1903
1837
• Telegraph
* Reaper * Photography
Internal-iTypewriter’ Combustion
Engine
• Light Bulb • Phonograph
• Telephone Electric Motor
•	Radio • Airplane
•	Motion Pictures
•	X-Ray
the successful Bessemer process was bettered by the 1860s. It was eventually replaced by the open-hearth process, enabling manufacturers to produce quality steel from scrap metal as well as from raw materials.
NEW USES FOR STEEL
The railroads, with thousands of miles of track, became the biggest customers for steel, but inventors soon found additional uses for it. Joseph r.HHHpn'c harhpti wire and McCormick's and Deere's farm MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
What natural resources were most important for industrialization?
HISTORICAL
SPOTLIGHT-
ILLUMINATING THE LIGHT BULB
Shortly after moving into a long wooden shed at Menlo Park, Thomas Alva Edison and his associates set to work to develop the perfect incandescent bulb.
Arc lamps already lit some city streets and shops, using an electric current passing between two sticks of carbon, but they were glaring and inefficient.
Edison hoped to create a long-lasting lamp with a soft glow, and began searching for a filament that would burn slowly and stay lit. Edison tried wires, sticks, blades of grass, and even hairs from his assistants’ beards. Finally, a piece of carbonized bamboo from Japan did the trick. Edison's company used bamboo filaments until 1911, when it began using tungsten filaments, which are still used today.
machines helped transform the plains into the food pro-ducer of the nation.
Steel changed the face of the nation as well, as it made innovative construction possible. One of the most remarkable structures was the Brooklyn Bridge. Completed in 1883, it spanned 1,595 feet of the East River in New York City. Its steel cables were supported by towers higher than any man-made and weight-bearing structure except the pyramids of Egypt. Like those ancient marvels, the completed bridge was called a wonder of the world.
Around this time, setting the stage for a new era of expansion upward as well as outward, William Le Baron Jenney designed the first skyscraper with a steel frame—the Home Insurance Building in Chicago. Before Jenney had his pioneering idea, the weight of large buildings was supported entirely by their walls or by iron frames, which limited the buildings' height. With a steel frame to support the weight, however, architects could build as high as they wanted. As structures soared into the air, not even the sky seemed to limit what Americans could achieve.
Inventions Promote Change
By capitalizing on natural resources and their own ingenuity, inventors changed more than the landscape. Their inventions affected the very way people lived and worked.
THE POWER OF ELECTRICITY
In 1876, Thomas Alva Edison became a pioneer on the new industrial frontier when he established the world's first research laboratory in Menlo Park, New Jersey. There Edison perfected the incandescent light bulb—patented in 1880—and later invented an entire system for producing and distributing electrical power. Another inventor, George Westinghouse, along with Edison, added innovations that made electricity safer and less expensive. The harnessing of electricity completely changed the nature of business in America. By 1890, electric power ran numerous machines, from fans to printing presses. This inexpensive, convenient source of energy soon became available in homes and spurred the invention of time-saving appliances. Electric streetcars made urban travel cheap and efficient and also promoted the outward spread of cities
More important, electricity allowed manufacturers to locate their plants
Vocabulary
Incandescent:
giving off visible light as a result of being heated
Chapter 6
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
$ How did electricity change American life?
wherever they wanted—not just near sources of power, such as rivers. This enabled industry to grow as never before. Huge operations, such as the Armour and Swift meatpacking plants, and the efficient processes that they used became the models for new consumer industries. JEy
INVENTIONS CHANGE LIFESTYLES
Edison's light bulb was only one of several revolutionary inventions. Christopher Sholes invented the typewriter in 1867 and changed the world of work. Next to the light bulb, however, perhaps the most dramatic invention was the telephone, unveiled by Alexander Graham Bell and Thomas Watson in 1876. It opened the way for a worldwide communications network. The typewriter and the telephone particularly affected office work and created new jobs for women. Although women made up less than 5 percent of all office workers in 1870, by 1910 they accounted for nearly 40 percent of the clerical work force. New inventions also had a tremendous impact on factory work, as well as on jobs that traditionally had been done at home. For example, women had previously sewn clothing by hand for their families. With industrialization, clothing could be mass-produced in factories, creating a need for garment workers, many of whom were women.
Industrialization freed some factory workers from backbreaking labor and helped
improve workers' standard of living. By 1890, the average workweek had been reduced by about ten hours. However, many laborers felt that the mechanization of so many tasks reduced human workers' worth. As consumers, though, workers regained some of their lost power in the marketplace. The country's expanding urban population provided a vast potential market for the new inventions and products of the late 1800s.
▲
The typewriter shown here dates from around 1890.
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•	Edwin L. Drake	• Thomas Alva Edison	• Alexander Graham Bell
•	Bessemer process	• Christopher Sholes
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
In a chart like the one below, list resources, ideas, and markets that affected the industrial boom of the 19th century. In the second column, note how each item contributed to industrialization.
Resources, Ideas, Markets	Impact
	
CRITICAL THINKING
MAKING INFERENCES
Do you think that consumers gained power as industry expanded in the late 19th century? Why or why not?
4.	HYPOTHESIZING
If the U.S. had been poor in natural resources, how would industrialization have been affected?
ANALYZING EFFECTS
How did scientific discoveries and technological innovations affect the economic development of the United States? Think About:
•	the discoveries and inventions of the period
•	the impact of inventions on people’s daily lives
•	the effect of inventions on the workplace
A
New Industrial Age 233 CITIZENSHIP SPOTLIGHT
Qualities of Effective Leadership
Leadership matters. In many instances, a team or organization is only as good as its leader. By influencing people to work toward common goals, effective leaders are able to accomplish important tasks and effect change in the world. There is no list of characteristics that a good leader must possess. In fact, good leadership can depend on the situation; different leaders might behave in different ways depending on their position, their goals, their personalities and those of their followers. However, there are some qualities that can help an individual be an effective leader.
A DESIRE TO LEAD
Perhaps the most important quality is the desire to lead. In order to lead effectively, an individual must be committed to his or her cause and feel confident enough to advance that cause. Billy Graham (shown at left) is a good example of an individual with a desire to lead. He believes his purpose in life is to help people find a personal relationship with God. Since beginning his ministry in 1950, Graham has worked tirelessly to accomplish that mission and share his faith with others. He has written 31 books and conducted events in 185 countries. He has even served as a spiritual adviser to presidents, including Dwight D. Eisenhower and Richard Nixon. Part of what enabled Graham to reach so many people with his message was that he was committed to his cause.
JUDGMENT AND DECISIVENESS
Another important characteristic is the ability to act decisively and with good judgment. In the face of complex issues with many factors, a strong leader needs to determine an appropriate course of action to pursue. By demonstrating these leadership qualities, Sonia Sotomayor earned a place as a U.S. Supreme Court justice. She is the only current member of the Court with experience as a trial judge. In that position, she was required to hand down decisions on a variety of complex legal and constitutional issues, and she earned a reputation as an able judge as a result of her thoughtful opinions. She continues to employ her skills of judgment and decisiveness from the Supreme Court bench.
11 11 ill
! I i
i
I1
: f i
'll
i 1

4 Chapter 6

u
STRONG SOCIAL SKILLS
An effective leader must be able to work well with others. A leader must be able to listen to the opinions of others and to use tact and diplomacy when interacting with team members to ensure achievement of common goals. Good leaders are able to use their strong social skills to communicate about their mission and to inspire others to follow them. One of the best examples of a leader who used language to inspire a movement is Martin Luther King, Jr. A Baptist minister from Atlanta, King delivered his most famous speech, known as the “I Have a Dream” speech, at the March on Washington on August 28, 1963, in front of a crowd of more than 200,000 people. In his speech, King drew from patriotic and religious texts of the past to review African Americans’ long struggle for freedom. His rhetoric drew in his listeners and reached beyond them to communicate a moral basis for the civil rights movement to a vast national audience. The speech inspired African Americans to continue to work for change within their communities. Through this speech and his other writings, King became a powerful voice of the African American civil rights movement. His leadership helped the movement make significant progress toward achieving its goal of equality.
PERSEVERANCE
Even the best leaders will face challenges. When challenges arise, the most important thing is how a leader deals with them. Perseverance involves persistence in the face of obstacles. It requires tenacity and commitment to a belief or purpose. Great leaders do not give up in the face of difficulty; instead, they find a way to keep going. Andrew Carnegie’s path to financial success required perseverance. Born in Scotland to parents who hit tough economic times, Carnegie immigrated to the United States with his family at the age of 12. He began working in a factory, but through talent and persistence he advanced quickly to other, more rewarding jobs. Carnegie began invest-
ing his earnings in the iron, oil, railroad, and telegraph industries. He was soon able to use the money from his investments to found his own company, the Carnegie Steel Company. He used the business experience that he had gained to build his company up until it dominated the steel industry in the United States. Carnegie’s success can be attributed in part to his perseverance, as he worked hard to overcome the challenges of his humble beginnings.
1.	Making Generalizations What are some qualities of effective leadership? What other qualities do you think might also be helpful for leaders to possess? Explain.
2.	Researching a Leader Choose one of the leaders discussed in this textbook. Do research to identify the qualities that made this leader effective. Did he or she excel in some areas but not in others? Write an essay explaining what your selected leader accomplished and which qualities helped him or her do so.
/T hmhsocialstudies.com
RESEARCH WEB LINKS
A
New Industrial Age 23S TEKS3B, 1SB
The Age of the Railroads
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
The growth and consolidation Railroads made possible the of railroads benefited the	expansion of industry across
nation but also led to	the United States,
corruption and required
government regulation.
transcontinental railroad George M. Pullman
•Credit Mobllier • Munn v. Illinois •Interstate Commerce Act
hmhsocialstudies.com
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the effects of the rapid growth of the railroads.
^^^^One American's
In October 1884, the economist Richard Ely visited the town of Pullman, Illinois, to write about it for Harper's magazine. At first, Ely was impressed with the atmosphere of order, planning, and well-being in the town George M. Pullman had designed for the employees of his railroad-car factory. But after talking at length with a dissatisfied company officer, Ely concluded the town had a fatal flaw: it too greatly restricted its residents. Pullman employees were compelled to obey rules in which they had no say. Ely concluded that "the idea of Pullman is un-American."
A
Personal Voice richard t. ely “It Is benevolent, well-wishing feudalism [a medieval social system], which desires the happiness of the people, but in such way as shall please the authorities. ... If free American institutions are to be preserved, we want no race of men reared as underlings.”
A
Social Study" The town of Pullman was carefully laid out and strictly controlled.
136 Chapter 6
As the railroads grew, they came to influence many facets of American life, including, as in the town of Pullman, the personal lives of the country's citizens. They caused the standard time and time zones to be set and influenced the growth of towns and communities. However, the unchecked power of railroad companies led to widespread abuses that spurred citizens to demand federal regulation of the industry.
Railroads Span Time and Space
Rails made local transit reliable and westward expansion possible for business as well as for people. Realizing how important railroads were for settling the West and developing the country, the government made huge land grants and loans to the railroad companies.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
A^
What were the effects of railroad expansion? A NATIONAL NETWORK
By 1856, the railroads extended west to the Mississippi River, and three years later, they crossed the Missouri. Just over a decade later, crowds across the United States cheered as the Central Pacific and Union Pacific Railroads met at Promontory, Utah, on May 10, 1869. A golden spike marked the spanning of the nation by the first transcontinental railroad. Other transcontinental lines followed, and regional lines multiplied as well. At the start of the Civil War, the nation had had about 30,000 miles of track. By 1890, that figure was nearly six times greater. ROMANCE AND REALITY
The railroads brought the dreams of available land, adventure, and a fresh start within the grasp of many Americans. This romance was made possible, however, only by the harsh lives of railroad workers. The Central Pacific Railroad employed thousands of Chinese immigrants. The Union Pacific hired Irish immigrants and desperate, out-of-work Civil War veterans to lay track across treacherous terrain while enduring attacks by Native Americans. Accidents and diseases disabled and killed thousands of men each year. In 1888, when the first railroad statistics were published, the casualties totaled more than 2,000 employees killed and 20,000 injured.
RAILROAD TIME
In spite of these difficult working conditions, the railroad laborers helped to transform the diverse regions of the country into a united nation. Though linked in space, each community still operated on its own time, with noon when the sun was directly overhead. Noon in Boston, for example, was almost 12 minutes later than noon in New York. Travelers riding from Maine to California might reset their watches 20 times.
In 1869, to remedy this problem, Professor C. F. Dowd proposed that the earth's surface be divided into 24 time zones, one for each hour of the day. Under his plan, the United States would contain four zones: the Eastern, Central, Mountain, and Pacific time zones. The railroad companies endorsed Dowd's plan enthusiastically, and many towns followed suit.
Finally, on November 18, 1883, railroad crews and towns across the country synchronized their watches. In 1884, an international conference set worldwide time zones that incorporated railroad time. The U.S. Congress, however, didn't officially adopt railroad time as the standard for the nation until 1918. As strong a unifying force as the railroads were, however, they also opened the way for abuses that led to social and economic unrest. &
SPOTLIGHT
HISTORICAL
CHINESE IMMIGRANTS AND THE RAILROADS
Although the railroads paid all their employees poorly, Asians usually earned less than whites. The average pay for whites working a ten-hour day was $40 to $60 a month plus free meals. Chinese immigrants hired by the Central Pacific performed similar tasks from dawn to dusk for about $35 a month—and they had to supply their own food.
The immigrants’ working conditions were miserable. In 1866, for example, the railroad hired them to dig a tunnel through a granite mountain. For five months of that year, the Chinese lived and worked in camps surrounded by banks of snow. The total snowfall reached over 40 feet. Hundreds of the men were buried in avalanches or later found frozen, still clutching their shovels or picks.
Opportunities and Opportunists
The growth of the railroads influenced the industries and businesses in which Americans worked. Iron, coal, steel, lumber, and glass industries grew rapidly as they tried to keep pace with the railroads' demand for materials and parts. The rapid spread of railroad lines also fostered the growth of towns, helped establish new markets and offered rich opportunities for both visionaries and profiteers.
A
New Industrial Age 237 ON THE WRONG TRACK
While the railroads captured the imagination of most 19th-century Americans, there were those who didn’t get on the bandwagon. The writer Herman Melville raged against the smoke-belching iron horse and the waves of change it set in motion as vehemently as his character Captain Ahab raged against the white whale and the sea in Moby-Dick. "Hark! here comes that old dragon again— that gigantic gadfly . . . snort! puff! scream! Great improvements of the age,” Melville fumed. "Who wants to travel so fast? My grandfather did not, and he was no fool.”
NEW TOWNS AND MARKETS
By linking previously isolated cities, towns, and settlements, the railroads promoted trade and interdependence. As part of a nationwide network of suppliers and markets, individual towns began to specialize in particular products. Chicago soon became known for its stockyards and Minneapolis for its grain industries. These cities prospered by selling large quantities of their products to the entire country. New towns and communities also grew up along the railroad lines. Cities as diverse as Abilene, Kansas; Flagstaff, Arizona; Denver, Colorado; and Seattle, Washington, owed their prosperity, if not their very existence, to the railroads. PULLMAN
The railroads helped cities not only grow up but branch out. In 1880, for example, George M. Pullman built a factory for manufacturing sleepers and other railroad cars on the Illinois prairie. The nearby town that Pullman built for his employees followed in part the models of earlier industrial experiments in Europe. Whereas New England textile manufacturers had traditionally provided housing for their workers, the town of Pullman provided for almost all of workers' basic needs. Pullman residents lived in clean, well-constructed brick houses and apartment buildings with at least one window in every room—a luxury for city dwellers. In addition, the town offered services and facilities such as doctors' offices, shops, and an athletic field. As Richard Ely observed, however, the town of Pullman remained firmly under company control. Residents were not allowed to loiter on their front steps or to drink alcohol. Pullman hoped that his tightly controlled environment would ensure a stable work force. However, Pullman's refusal to lower rents after cutting his employees' pay led to a violent strike in 1894.
CREDIT MOBILIER
Pullman created his company town out of the desire for control and profit. In some other railroad magnates, or powerful and influential industrialists, these desires turned into self-serving corruption. In one of the most infamous schemes, stockholders in the Union Pacific Railroad formed, in 1864, a construction company called Credit Mobilier (kred'Tt mo-beUyer). The stockholders gave this company a contract to lay track at two to three times the actual cost—and pocketed the profits. They donated shares of stock to about 20 representatives in Congress in 1867. A congressional investigation of the company, spurred by reports in the New York Sun, eventually found that the officers of the Union Pacific had taken up to $23 million in stocks, bonds, and cash. Testimony implicated such well-known and respected federal officials as Vice-President Schuyler Colfax and Congressman James Garfield, who later became president. Although these public figures kept their profits and received little more than a slap on the wrist, the reputation of the Republican Party was tarnished.
The Grange and the Railroads
Farmers were especially disturbed by what they viewed as railroad corruption. The Grangers-members of the Grange a farmers' organization founded in 1867—began demanding governmental control over the railroad industry.
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
How did the railroads affect cities?
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
How did railroad owners use Credit Mobilier to make huge, undeserved profits?
Chapter 6
©
Portia
■SO'
TA ■ ,
Los Art
|	1	Eastern time
1	|	Central time
|	|	Mountain time
[	|	Pacific time
----- Railroads by 1870
----- Railroads by 1890
0	150 300	miles
0 150 300 kilometers
Tucson.
[Denver
/Albuquerque
YE I
Paso Major Railroad Lines, 1870-1890
©>
L.
OntarioA tBdston
~L)maha\
Topek
Kansa
City
St. Louis.
TYork ' Philadelphia Kimore nington, DC
iRiqlynond ^Norfolk
Fort Worth 1
ew Orleans
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1.	Human-Environment Interaction What factor led to rapid growth in Chicago, Minneapolis, and Denver?
2.	Movement Why was rail construction concentrated in the East before 1870 and in the West after 1870?
Wilmington
ATLANTIC OCEAN
/Savannah	30°N
§ >
so°w


©
0

$ y '	/ V " ^°**MERN PM»Bc
,--^3*^altLakeCir
N
L	•


©




Background
Price fixing occurs when companies within an industry all agree to charge the same price for a given service, rather than competing to offer the lowest price.
j MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
JgJ How did the Grangers, who were largely poor farmers, do battle with the giant railroad companies?
RAILROAD ABUSES
Farmers were angry with railroad companies. They were upset by misuse of government land grants, which the railroads sold to other businesses rather than to settlers. The railroads also entered into formal agreements to fix prices, which helped keep farmers in their debt. In addition, they charged different customers different rates, often demanding more for short than for long hauls. GRANGER LAWS
In response to these abuses by the railroads, the Grangers took political action. They sponsored state and local political candidates, elected legislators, and successfully pressed for laws to protect their interests. In 1871 Illinois authorized a commission "to establish maximum freight and passenger rates and prohibit discrimination." Grangers throughout the West, Midwest, and Southeast convinced state legislators to pass similar laws, called Granger laws. The railroads fought back, challenging the constitutionality of the regulatory laws. In 1877, however, in the case of Munn v. Illinois, the Supreme Court upheld the Granger laws by a vote of seven to two. The states thus won the right to regulate the railroads for the benefit of farmers and consumers. The Grangers also helped establish an important principle—the federal government's right to regulate private industry to serve the public interest. D;
INTERSTATE COMMERCE ACT
The Grangers' triumph was short-lived, however. In 1886, the Supreme Court ruled that a state could not regulate railroad traffic moving across state boundaries. In response to public outrage, Congress passed the Interstate Commerce Act in 1887. Its objective was to make railroad rates fair for all customers by requiring rates to be "fair and reasonable." To oversee the railroads, the act established a five-member Interstate Commerce Commission (ICC). Unfortunately, Congress did not give the ICC the power to enforce the provisions of the law. Due to poorly defined language in the act and resistance from the railroads, the ICC had difficulty regulating rates. Several court cases challenged the act, costing government resources as most went in favor of the railroads. A
New Industrial Age 239 Vocabulary consolidation: the
act of uniting or combining
Analyzing
Political Cartoonsj-
MODERN COLOSSUS OF (RAIL) ROADS”
Joseph Keppler drew this cartoon in 1879, featuring the railroad “giants” William Vanderbilt (top), Jay Gould (bottom right), and Cyrus W. Fields (bottom left). The three magnates formed a railroad trust out of their Union Pacific, New York Central, and Lake Shore & Dependence lines.
SKILLBUILDER
Analyzing Political Cartoons 1.	The title of this cartoon is a pun on the Colossus of Rhodes, a statue erected in 282 b.c. on an island near Greece. According to legend, the 100-foot-tall statue straddled Rhodes’s harbor entrance. Do you think the artist means the comparison as a compliment or a criticism? Why?
2.	The reins held by the railroad magnates attach not only to the trains but also to the tracks and the railroad station. What does this convey about the magnates' control of the railroads?
The law had the most success in preventing the railroads from arranging special rates among themselves, which offered consumers some protection. Not until 1906, under President Theodore Roosevelt, did the ICC gain the power it needed to be effective. Still, the law was a historic milestone, marking the first time that the federal government had regulated an industry, and it served as a model for later attempts.
PANIC AND CONSOLIDATION
Corporate abuses, mismanagement, overbuilding, and competition pushed many railroads to the brink of bankruptcy. Their financial problems played a major role in a nationwide economic collapse. The panic of 1893 was the worst depression up to that time: by the end of 1893, around 600 banks and 15,000 businesses had failed, and by 1895, 4 million people had lost their jobs. Large investment firms such as J. P. Morgan & Company reorganized the railroads. As the 20th century dawned, seven powerful companies held sway over two-thirds of the nation's railroad tracks. j ASSESSMENT
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
In a chart like the one below, fill in effects of the rapid growth of railroads.
How did the growth of railroads affect people’s everyday lives? How did it affect farmers?
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•	transcontinental railroad • Credit Mobilier	• Interstate Commerce Act
•	George M. Pullman	• Munn v. Illinois
CRITICAL THINKING
MAKING INFERENCES
How did the Interstate Commerce Act mark a changing relationship between the federal government and private business? What were the costs and benefits of the act? Give examples to support your opinion. Think About:
•	the rights of railroad customers and workers
•	the scope of government regulations
4.	SYNTHESIZING
The federal government gave land and made loans to the railroad companies. Why was the government so eager to promote the growth of railroads?
ANALYZING MOTIVES
Reread "Another Perspective” on railroads (page 238). Why do you think that some Americans disliked this new means of transportation?
!40 Chapter 6
Big Business and Labor
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
The expansion of industry resulted in the growth of big business and prompted laborers to form unions to better their lives.
Many of the strategies used today in industry and in the labor movement, such as consolidation and the strike, have their origins in the late 19th century.
•Andrew Carnegie • laissez-faire •Social Darwinism •vertical and horizontal integration •John D.
Rockefeller •Sherman Antitrust Act
f hmhsocialstudies.com!
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the achievements and setbacks of the labor movement between 1876 and 1911.
OneAmerican’s Story
Born in Scotland to penniless parents, Andrew Carnegie came to this country in 1848, at age 12. Six years later, he worked his way up to become private secretary to the local superintendent of the Pennsylvania Railroad. One morning, Carnegie single-handedly relayed messages that unsnarled a tangle of freight and passenger trains. His boss, Thomas A. Scott, rewarded Carnegie by giving him a chance to buy stock. Carnegie's mother mortgaged the family home to make the purchase possible. Soon Carnegie received his first dividend.
A
Personal Voice Andrew carnegie “ One morning a white envelope was lying upon my desk, addressed In a big John Hancock hand, to ‘Andrew Carnegie, Esquire.’ ... All It contained was a check for ten dollars upon the Gold Exchange Bank of New York. I shall remember that check as long as I live.... It gave me the first penny of revenue from capital—something that I had not worked for with the sweat of my brow. ‘Eureka!’ I cried. ‘Here’s the goose that lays the golden eggs.’ ”
—Autobiography of Andrew Carnegie
Andrew Carnegie was one of the first industrial moguls to make his own fortune. His rise from rags to riches, along with his passion for supporting charities, made him a model of the American success story.
Nineteenth-century industrialist Andrew Carnegie gave money to build public libraries, hoping to help others write their own rags-to-riches stories.
•Samuel Gompers •American Federation of Labor (AFL)
•	Eugene V. Debs •Industrial Workers
of the World (IWW)
•	Mary Harris Jones
A
Favorable Climate^ ............... Manypeople in the late 1800s believed that a strong work ethic made one successful The business world welcomed entrepreneurs—risk takers who use their money and talents to launch new ventures. During this time period, social philosophers argued that this new definition of success could be explained scientifically.
A
New Industrial Age 241 BELIEF IN FREE MARKETS
American entrepreneurs were working within free enterprise capitalism. Free enterprise is an economic system in which private businesses run most industries. Competition determines prices and wages. By the late 1800s most business leaders believed in laissez-faire (le-say-FER) capitalism. The term laissez-faire is French for "to let do." Laissez-faire capitalism allows companies to conduct business without intervention by the government. Business leaders believed that government regulation would destroy individual self-reliance, reduce profits, and harm the economy.
SOCIAL DARWINISM
Americans understood that there were inequalities in the free enterprise system. But many thinkers believed that inequalities were part of the social order. To explain why some people prospered and others did not, economists, social philosophers, and business leaders embraced the philosophy of Social Darwinism. This philosophy adapted the ideas of the British naturalist Charles Darwin and applied them to human society. Darwin had studied plants and animals and concluded that members of a species compete for survival. Those best adapted to their environment thrive and pass their traits to the next generation. Less-suited members gradually die out. Darwin called this process natural selection.
The English philosopher Herbert Spencer used Darwin's biological theories to explain the evolution of human society. Economists found in Social Darwinism a way to justify the doctrine of laissez-faire. Stronger people, businesses, and nations would prosper. Weaker ones would fail. According to Social Darwinists, the market should not be regulated because no one had the right to interfere with this process.
MONOPOLIES AND TRUSTS
Although some business owners endorsed the "natural law" in theory, in practice most entrepreneurs did everything they could to control the competition that threatened the growth of their business empires. To gain dominance, some companies pursued mergers. A merger usually occurred when one corporation bought out the stock of another. A firm that bought out all its competitors could achieve a monopoly, or complete control over its industry's production, wages, and prices. Some corporations took a different approach to mergers: they joined with competing companies in trust agreements. Participants in a trust turned their stock over to a group of trustees—people who ran the separate companies as one large corporation. In return, the companies were entitled to dividends on profits earned by the trust. Trusts were not legal mergers, but that did not prevent them from forming. $
Fewer Control More
As businesses grew ever larger in the late 1800s, many corporate leaders amassed staggering fortunes. Some viewed these individuals as "robber barons" who profited unfairly while others saw them as "captains of industry."
CARNEGIE AND STEEL
By 1865, Carnegie was so busy managing the money he had earned in dividends that he happily left his job at the Pennsylvania Railroad. He entered the steel business in 1873 after touring a British steel mill and witnessing the awesome spectacle of the Bessemer process in action. By 1899, the Carnegie Steel MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
What
strategies enabled big businesses to eliminate competition?
Chapter 6
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
What were Andrew Carnegie’s management and business strategies?
Company manufactured more steel than all the factories in Great Britain.
Carnegie's success was due in part to management practices that he initiated and that soon became widespread. First, he continually searched for ways to make better products more cheaply. He incorporated new machinery and techniques, such as accounting systems that enabled him to track precise costs. Second, he attracted talented people by offering them stock in the company, and he encouraged competition among his assistants.
In addition to improving his own manufacturing operation,
Carnegie attempted to control as much of the steel industry as he could. He did this mainly by vertical integration, a process in which he bought out his suppliers— coal fields and iron mines, ore freighters, and railroad lines—in order to control the raw materials and transportation systems. Carnegie also attempted to buy out competing steel producers. In this process, known as horizontal integration, companies producing similar products merge. Having gained control over his suppliers and having limited his competition, Carnegie controlled almost the entire steel industry. By the time he sold his business in 1901, Carnegie's companies produced by far the largest portion of the nation's steel, m
Vertical and Horizontal Integration
RESOURCES
Raw materials, fields, forests, and farms
MANUFACTURING
Production and processing
DISTRIBUTION
Shipping and transportation, delivery to customers
HORIZONTAL
HISTORY
VIDEO
Great Minds in Business:
Andrew Carnegie
MAIN IDEA
Evaluating
5/ Do you agree with Carnegie’s defense of millionaires? Why or why not?
ROCKEFELLER AND OIL
John D. Rockefeller entered the oil business in 1863 and proved himself to be a superb business leader. His company, Standard Oil, began as a refinery. Using vertical integration, Rockefeller acquired companies that supplied his business. He bought barrel factories, oil fields, oil-storage facilities, pipelines, and railroad cars. He also practiced horizontal integration by taking over competing companies. In 1870 Rockefeller’s company processed two or three percent of the country's crude oil. Within a decade, it controlled 90 percent of the refining business. Rockefeller reaped huge profits by paying his employees extremely low wages and driving his competitors out of business by selling his oil at a lower price than it cost to produce it. Then, when he controlled the market, he hiked prices far above original levels.
A MIXED LEGACY
Alarmed at the tactics of industrialists, some Americans came to view them as robber barons. Critics argued that these tycoons profited unfairly by squeezing out competitors and using other tough tactics. However, admirers credited these entrpreneurs with using their business skills to make the American economy more productive and, in turn, stronger. Industrialists were also philanthropists. Although Rockefeller kept most of his assets, he still gave away over $500 million, establishing the Rockefeller Foundation' providing funds to found the University of Chicago, and creating a medical institute that helped find a cure for yellow fever. Andrew Carnegie donated about 90 percent of the wealth he accumulated during his lifetime; his fortune still supports the arts and learning today. "It will be a great mistake for the community to shoot the millionaires," he said, "for they are the bees that make the most honey, and contribute most to the hive even after they have gorged themselves full."£>
A
New Industrial Age 243 I
I
In this photograph, taken by Lewis Hine in 1912, a young sweatshop laborer in New York City carries piecework home.
Government and Business
For a time, the government was content to allow the laissez-faire system to continue unregulated for fear of harming the economy. However, as corporations expanded, the government grew uneasy about the power of these giants. While industrialization was raising the standard of living for all Americans, income inequality was increasing as well.
SHERMAN ANTITRUST ACT
In 1890 Congress passed the Sherman Antitrust Act. This act made it illegal to form a trust that interfered with free trade. It also prohibited monopolies and activities that hindered competition. Prosecuting companies under the Sherman Act was not easy, however, because the act didn't clearly define terms such as trust. In addition, if firms such as Standard Oil felt pressure from the government, they simply reorganized into single corporations. The Supreme Court threw out seven of the eight cases the federal government brought against trusts. Eventually, the government stopped trying to enforce the Sherman act, and the consolidation of businesses continued.
BUSINESS BOOM BYPASSES THE SOUTH
Industrial growth concentrated in the North, where natural and urban resources were plentiful. The South was still trying to recover from the Civil War, hindered by a lack of capital—money for investment. After the war, people were unwilling to invest in risky ventures. Northern businesses already owned 90 percent of the stock in the most profitable Southern enterprise, the railroads, thereby keeping the South in a stranglehold. The South remained mostly agricultural, with farmers at the mercy of railroad rates. Entrepreneurs suffered not only from excessive transportation costs, but also from high tariffs on raw materials and imported goods, and from a lack of skilled workers. The post-Reconstruction South seemed to have no way out of economic stagnation. However, growth in forestry and mining, and in the tobacco, furniture, and textile industries, offered hope. I , e
i;
Labor Unions Emerge
As business leaders merged and consolidated their forces, it seemed necessary for workers to do the same. Although Northern wages were generally higher than Southern wages, exploitation and unsafe working conditions drew workers together across regions in a nationwide labor movement. Laborers—skilled and unskilled, female and male, black and white—joined together in unions to try to improve their lot.
LONG HOURS AND DANGER
One of the largest employers, the steel mills, often demanded a seven-day workweek. Seamstresses, like factory workers in most industries, worked 12 or more hours a day, six days a week. Employees were not entitled to vacation, sick leave, unemployment compensation, or reimbursement for injuries suffered on the job. Yet injuries were common. In dirty, poorly ventilated factories, workers had to perform repetitive, mind-dulling tasks, sometimes with dangerous or faulty equipment. In 1882, an average of 675 laborers were killed in work-related accidents each week. In addition wages were so low that most families could not survive unless everyone held a job. Between 1890 and 1910, for example, the number of women working for wages
MAIN IDEA
Synthesizing
How did economic factors limit industrialization in the South?
I
doubled, from 4 million to more than 8 million. Twenty percent of the boys and 10 percent of the girls under age 15—some as young as five years old—also held full-time jobs. With little time or energy left for school, child laborers forfeited their futures to help their families make ends meet.
In sweatshops, or workshops in tenements rather than in factories, workers had little choice but to put up with the conditions. Sweatshop employment, which was tedious and required few skills, was often the only avenue open to women and children. Jacob Riis described the conditions faced by "sweaters."
A
Personal Voice Jacob riis " The bulk of the sweater’s work is done in the tenements, which the law that regulates factory labor does not reach. ... In [them] the child works unchallenged from the day he is old enough to pull a thread. There is no such thing as a dinner hour; men and women eat while they work, and the ‘day’ is lengthened at both ends far Into the night."
—How the Other Half Lives
Not surprisingly, sweatshop jobs paid the lowest wages—often as little as 27 cents for a child's 14-hour day. In 1899, women earned an average of $267 a year, nearly half of men's average pay of $498. The very next year Andrew Carnegie made $23 million—with no income tax.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing Issues 4^ How did industrial working conditions contribute to the growth of the labor movement?
Vocabulary arbitration: a
method of settling disputes in which both sides submit their differences to a mutually approved judge
EARLY LABOR ORGANIZING
Skilled workers had formed small, local unions since the late 1700s. The first large-scale national organization of laborers, the National Labor Union (NLU), was formed in 1866 by ironworker William H. Sylvis. The refusal of some NLU local chapters to admit African Americans led to the creation of the Colored National Labor Union (CNLU). Nevertheless, NLU membership grew to 640,000. In 1868, the NLU persuaded Congress to legalize an eight-hour day for government workers. NLU organizers concentrated on linking existing local unions. In 1869, Uriah Stephens focused his attention on individual workers and organized the Noble Order of the Knights of Labor. Its motto was "An injury to one is the concern of all." Membership in the Knights of Labor was officially open to all workers, regardless of race, gender, or degree of skill. Like the NLU, the Knights supported an eight-hour workday and advocated "equal pay for equal work" by men and women. They saw strikes, or refusals to work, as a last resort and instead advocated arbitration. At its height in 1886, the Knights of Labor had about 700,000 members. Although the Knights declined after the failure of a series of strikes, other unions continued to organize.
Union Movements Diverge
As labor activism spread, it diversified. Two major types of unions made great gains under forceful leaders.
CRAFT UNIONISM
One form of labor organization was craft unionism, which included skilled workers from one or more trades. Jewish immigrant Samuel Gompers led the Cigar Makers' International Union to join other craft unions in 1886. The American Federation of Labor (AFL), HISTORICAL
SPOTLIGHT
AFRICAN AMERICANS AND THE LABOR MOVEMENT
Angered by their exclusion from the NLU, African American laborers formed the Colored National Labor Union (CNLU) in 1869. Led by Isaac Meyers, a caulker from Baltimore, the CNLU emphasized cooperation between management and labor and the importance of political reform.
The CNLU disbanded in the early 1870s, but many African-American laborers found a home in the Knights of Labor, the first union to welcome blacks and whites alike. The Great Strike of 1877 brought whites and African Americans together, but the labor movement remained largely divided along racial lines.
Management often hired African Americans as strikebreakers, which intensified white unions’ resistance to accepting blacks. African Americans continued to organize on their own, but discrimination and their small numbers relative to white unions hurt black unions’ effectiveness.
A
New Industrial Age 245 In New York City’s Union Square in 1914, IWW members protest violence against striking coal miners in Colorado.
The strike is the weapon of the oppressed. ” EUGENE V. DEBS
with Gompers as its president, focused on collective bargaining, or negotiation between representatives of labor and management, to reach written agreements on wages, hours, and working conditions. Unlike the Knights of Labor, the AFL used strikes as a major tactic. Successful strikes helped the AFL win higher wages and shorter workweeks. Between 1890 and 1915, the average weekly wages in unionized industries rose from $17.50 to $24, and the average workweek fell from almost 54.5 hours to just under 49 hours.
INDUSTRIAL UNIONISM
Some labor leaders felt that unions should include all laborers—skilled and unskilled—in a specific industry. This concept captured the imagination of Eugene V. Debs, who attempted to form such an industrial union—the American Railway Union (ARU). Most of the new union's members were unskilled and semiskilled laborers, but skilled engineers and firemen joined too. In 1894, the new union won a strike for higher wages. Within two months, its membership climbed to 150,000, dwarfing the 90,000 enrolled in the four skilled railroad brotherhoods. Though the ARU, like the Knights of Labor, never recovered after the failure of a major strike, it added to the momentum of union organizing. SOCIALISM AND THE IWW
In an attempt to solve the problems faced by workers, Eugene Debs and some other labor activists eventually turned to socialism, an economic and political system based on government control of business and property and equal distribution of wealth. Socialism, carried to its extreme form— communism, as advocated by the German philosopher Karl Marx—would result in the overthrow of the capitalist system. Most socialists in late-19th-century America drew back from this goal, however, and worked within the labor movement to achieve better conditions for workers. In 1905, a group of radical unionists and socialists in Chicago organized the Industrial Workers of the World (IWW), or the Wobblies. Headed by William "Big Bill" Haywood, the Wobblies included miners, lumberers, and cannery and dock workers. Unlike the ARU, the IWW welcomed African Americans, but membership never topped 100,000. Its only major strike victory occurred in 1912. Yet the Wobblies, like other industrial unions, gave dignity and a sense of solidarity to unskilled workers. OTHER LABOR ACTIVISM IN THE WEST
In April 1903, about 1,000 Japanese and Mexican workers organized a successful strike in the sugar-beet fields of Ventura County, California. They formed the Sugar Beet and Farm Laborers' Union of Oxnard. In Wyoming, the State Federation of Labor supported a union of Chinese and Japanese miners who sought the same wages and treatment as other union miners. These small, independent unions increased both the overall strength of the labor movement and the tension between labor and management. MAIN IDEA
Contrasting
How did
craft unions and industrial unions differ?
Chapter 6
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
How did the 1877 strike and Haymarket cause the public to resent the labor movement?
Strikes Turn Violent
Industry and government responded forcefully to union activity, which they saw as a threat to the entire capitalist system.
THE GREAT STRIKE OF 1877
In July 1877, workers for the Baltimore and Ohio Railroad (B&O) struck to protest their second wage cut in two months. The work stoppage spread to other lines. Most freight and even some passenger traffic, covering over 50,000 miles, was stopped for more than a week. After several state governors asked President Rutherford B. Hayes to intervene, saying that the strikers were impeding interstate commerce, federal troops ended the strike. THE HAYMARKET AFFAIR
Encouraged by the impact of the 1877 strike, labor leaders continued to press for change. On the evening of May 4, 1886, 3,000 people gathered at Chicago's Haymarket Square to protest police brutality—a striker had been killed and several had been wounded at the McCormick Harvester plant the day before. Rain began to fall at about 10 o'clock, and the crowd was dispersing when police arrived. Then someone tossed a bomb into the police line. Police fired on the workers; seven police officers and several workers died in the chaos that followed. No one ever learned who threw the bomb, but the three speakers at the demonstration and five other radicals were charged with inciting a riot. All eight were convicted; four were hanged and one committed suicide in prison. After Haymarket, the public began to turn against the labor movement. THE HOMESTEAD STRIKE
Despite the violence and rising public anger, workers continued to strike. The writer Hamlin Garland described conditions at the Carnegie Steel Company's Homestead plant in Pennsylvania. A
Personal Voice hamlin garland “ Everywhere . . . groups of pale, lean men slouched In faded garments, grimy with the soot and grease of the mills. ... A roar as of a hundred lions, a thunder as of cannons,. . . jarring clang of falling iron. . . !99
—quoted in McClure’s Magazine
The steelworkers finally called a strike on June 29, 1892, after the company president, Henry Clay Frick, announced his plan to cut wages. Frick hired armed
The Growth of Union Membership, 1878-1904
° i«sn i«82 1884 1886 1888 1890 1892 1894 1896 1898 1900 1902 1904
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Graphs
1.	Which union’s membership increased in 1889-1890?
2.	What effect(s) did the Haymarket Riot have on union membership?
A
New Industrial Age 247 KEY PLAYERS
EUGENE V. DEBS 1855-1926
Born in Indiana, Eugene V.
Debs left home at the age of 14 to work for the railroads.
In 1875 he helped organize a local lodge of the Brotherhood of Locomotive Firemen, and after attempts to unite the local railroad brotherhoods failed, Debs organized the American Railway Union.
While in prison following the Pullman strike in 1894, Debs read the works of Karl Marx and became increasingly disillusioned with capitalism. He became a spokesperson for the Socialist Party of America and was its candidate for president five times. In 1912, he won about 900,000 votes—an amazing 6 percent of the total.
guards from the Pinkerton Detective Agency to protect the plant so that he could hire scabs, or strikebreakers, to keep it operating. In a pitched battle that left at least three detectives and nine workers dead, the steelworkers forced out the Pinkertons and kept the plant closed until the Pennsylvania National Guard arrived on July 12. The strike continued until November, but by then the union had lost much of its support and gave in to the company. It would take 45 years for steelworkers to mobilize once again.
THE PULLMAN COMPANY STRIKE
Strikes continued in other industries, however. During the panic of 1893 and the economic depression that followed, the Pullman company laid off more than 3,000 of its 5,800 employees and cut the wages of the rest by 25 to 50 percent, without cutting the cost of its employee housing. After paying their rent, many workers took home less than $6 a week. A strike was called in the spring of 1894, when the Pullman company failed to restore wages or decrease rents. Eugene Debs asked for arbitration, but Pullman refused to negotiate with the strikers. So the ARU began boycotting Pullman trains. After Pullman hired strikebreakers, the strike turned violent, and President Grover Cleveland sent in federal troops. In the bitter aftermath, Debs was jailed. Pullman fired most of the strikers, and the railroads blacklisted many others, so they could never again get rail-
road jobs.
WOMEN ORGANIZE
Although women were barred from many unions, they united behind powerful leaders to demand better working conditions, equal pay for equal work, and an end to child labor. Perhaps the most prominent organizer in the women's labor movement was Mary Harris Jones. Jones supported the Great Strike of 1877 and later organized for the United Mine Workers of America (UMW). She endured death threats and jail with the coal miners, who gave her the nickname Mother Jones. In 1903, to expose the cruelties of child labor, she led 80 mill children— many with hideous injuries—on a march to the home of President Theodore Roosevelt. Their crusade influenced the passage of child labor laws. Other organizers also achieved significant gains for women. In 1909, Pauline Newman, just 16 years old, became the first female organizer of the International Ladies' Garment Workers' Union (ILGWU). A garment worker from the age of eight, Newman also supported
MOTHER JONES 1830-1930
Mary Harris “Mother” Jones was a native of Ireland who immigrated to North America as a child. She became involved in the American labor movement after receiving assistance from the Knights of Labor. According to a reporter who followed “the mother of the laboring class” on her children’s march in 1903, “She fights their battles with a Mother’s Love.” Jones continued fighting until her death at age 100.
Jones was definitely not the kind of woman admired by industrialists. “God almighty made women,” she declared, “and the Rockefeller gang of thieves made ladies.”
Chapter 6
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
$ What factors made the Triangle Shirtwaist fire so lethal?
the "Uprising of the 20,000," a 1909 seamstresses' strike that won labor agreements and improved working conditions for some strikers.
The public could no longer ignore conditions in garment factories after a fire broke out at the Triangle Shirtwaist factory in New York City on March 25, 1911. The fire spread swiftly through the oil-soaked machines and piles of cloth, engulfing the eighth, ninth, and tenth floors. As workers attempted to flee, they discovered that the company had locked all but one of the exit doors to prevent theft. The unlocked door was blocked by fire. The factory had no sprinkler system, and the single fire escape collapsed almost immediately. In all, 146 women died; some were found huddled with their faces raised to a small window. Public outrage flared after a jury acquitted the factory owners of manslaughter. In response, the state of New York set up a task force to study factory working conditions, <j|j
MANAGEMENT AND GOVERNMENT PRESSURE UNIONS
The more powerful the unions became, the more employers came to fear them. Management refused to recognize unions as representatives of the workers. Many employers forbade union meetings, fired union members, and forced new employees to sign "yellow-dog contracts," swearing that they would not join a union.
Finally, industrial leaders, with the help of the courts, turned the Sherman Antitrust Act against labor. All a company had to do was say that a strike, picket line, or boycott would hurt interstate trade, and the state or federal government would issue an injunction against the labor action. Legal limitations made it more and more difficult for unions to be effective. Despite these pressures, workers—especially those in skilled jobs—continued to view unions as a powerful tool. By 1904, the AFL had about 1,700,000 members in its affiliated unions; by the eve of World War I, AFL membership would climb to over 2 million.
▲
The fire department’s ladders reached only to the sixth floor, two floors below the burning Triangle Shirtwaist Company.
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•Andrew Carnegie	•vertical and horizontal	•Samuel Gompers	•Industrial Workers of the
•laissez-faire	integration	•American Federation of	World (IWW)
•Social Darwinism	•John D. Rockefeller	Labor (AFL)	•Mary Harris Jones
	•Sherman Antitrust Act	• Eugene V. Debs	
main idea
USING YOUR NOTES
Make a time line of the notable achievements and setbacks of the labor movement between 1876 and 1911.
I event two I | event four ] 1 event one | |event three |
In what ways did strikes threaten industry?
CRITICAL THINKING
EVALUATING LEADERSHIP
Would you classify 19th century industrialists as robber barons or captains of industry? How does their philanthropy affect your opinion?
Think About:
• their tactics and strategies
•	their contributions to the economy
•	their attitude toward competition
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
Does the life of Andrew Carnegie support or counter the philosophy of Social Darwinism? Explain.
5.	HYPOTHESIZING
If the government had supported unions instead of management in the late 19th century, how might the lives of workers have been different?
A
New Industrial Age 249 
ASSESSMENT
VISUAL SUMMARY
A
New Industrial Age TERMS & NAMES
For each term or name below, write a sentence explaining its connection to the industrialization of the late 19th century.
LONG-TERM CAUSES
1.	Thomas Alva Edison
2.	Alexander Graham Bell
3.	George M. Pullman
4.	transcontinental railroad
5.	Interstate Commerce Act
6.	Andrew Carnegie
7.	Sherman Antitrust Act
8.	Samuel Gompers
9.	American Federation of Labor (AFL)
10. Mary Harris Jones
abundant natural resources harnessing of early power sources such as water and coal invention of the steam engine ’ construction of roads, canals, and railroads in early 1800s
IMMEDIATE CAUSES
expansion of railroads in late 1800s cheap labor supply provided by increasing immigration burst of technological innovation new management techniques and business strategies investment capital
:■
MAIN IDEAS
Use your notes and the information in the chapter to answer the following questions.
The Expansion of Industry (pages 230-233)
1.	How did the growth of the steel industry influence the development of other industries?
2.	How did inventions and developments in the late 19th century change the way people worked?
The Age of the Railroads (pages 236-240)
3.	Why did people, particularly farmers, demand regulation of the railroads in the late 19th century?
4.	Why were attempts at railroad regulation often unsuccessful?
Big Business and Labor (pages 241-249)
5.	How did the free enterprise system support industrialization?
6.	Why did the South industrialize more slowly than the North did?
7.	How did women organize to expand their economic opportunities during this period?
8.	What factors limited the success of unions?
BIG BU
IMMEDIATE EFFECTS
CRITICAL THINKING
USING YOUR NOTES
In a chart like the one shown, list what you see as the overall costs and benefits of industrialization. INDUSTRIALIZATION	
Costs	Benefits
growth of large corporations new and plentiful manufactured goods poor working conditions in factories and sweatshops
increased labor activism
LONG-TERM EFFECTS
regional economies are linked labor movement wins shorter workweek
RECOGNIZING BIAS
In 1902 George Baehr, head of the Philadelphia and Reading Railway Company, said, “The rights and interests of the labor man will be protected and cared for not by the labor agitators but by the Christian men to whom God in his infinite wisdom has given the control of the proper-ty interests of the country.” What bias does this statement reveal? How does Baehr’s view reflect Social Darwinism? DEVELOPING HISTORICAL PERSPECTIVE
What were the costs and benefits of the laissez-faire doctrine? How does the government’s response to the laissez-faire doctrine represent the changing relationship between the federal government and pm vate business? Chapter 6
<


TEXAS TEST PRACTICE
J
Use the quotation below and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 1.
“ No man, however benevolent, liberal, and wise, can use a large fortune so that it will do half as much good in the world as it would if it were divided into moderate sums and in the hands of workmen who had earned it by industry and frugality. "
B.
Hayes, from The Diary and Letters of Rutherford Birchard Hayes 1.	Which of the following people could best be described by Rutherford B. Hayes’s words benevolent, liberal, and a large fortune?
b Thomas Edison B Eugene V. Debs C Charles Darwin D Andrew Carnegie
2.	The American Federation of Labor (AFL) differed from the Knights of Labor in that the Knights of Labor focused on —
F collective bargaining and aggressive use of strikes.
G organizing only unskilled workers.
H arbitration and use of strikes as a last resort.
J winning a shorter workweek.
3.
How did the railroads both benefit from and contribute to the industrialization of the United States?
A
The railroads needed government protection, and their development helped government grow. B
The railroads used new inventions and brought people to see the inventions. C
The railroads used steel and coal and delivered both to new markets. D
The railroads needed passengers, and passengers needed to get to new industries. In the 19th century, government attempts to regulate industry in the United States included the Interstate Commerce Act (1887) and the Sherman Antitrust Act (1890). What posed the biggest obstacle to enforcement of these laws?
F the business tactics of industrialists G the use of vertical integration H the rulings of the Supreme Court J the theory of Social Darwinism
I
71 hmhsocialstudies.com
TEST PRACTICE
For additional test practice, go online for: • Diagnostic tests • Tutorials
INTERACT WITH HISTORY
'"J'WriteSmart
COLLABORATIVE LEARNI
Recall the issues that you recorded in myNotebook as you read the chapter. Consider how knowledge of the effects of railroad expansion and business consolidation might influence one’s opinion of the Industrial Age. Then write a newspaper editorial about the Great Strike of 1877 (see page 247), supporting the position of either the railroad owners or the striking workers. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your editorial.
"’J'WrlteSmart
Imagine you are a union leader in a factory. If your demands for better working conditions are not met, all of the employees will stop work and go on strike. Write a persuasive letter in which you urge your employer to adopt specific reforms to improve working conditions. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your letter.

tCEHTURY
In a small group read and discuss the
feature on pages 234-235. Consider the following question: What are the qualities of effective leadership? Choose a political or social leader from the chapter and do library or Internet research to discover how he or she embodied those characteristics. Then make a poster describing your leader’s personal qualities and how they helped him or her to lead and inspire others. Include your own assessment of which qualities might have been most important in the success of your selected leader. Add an image of the leader to the poster and display it in your classroom.
A
New Industrial Age 251 End of Chapter Skill Activity
Sequencing
DEFINING THE SKILL
Chronological order is the sequence of events in time. Chronology may be either relative or absolute. Relative chronology relates one event to another. This helps historians to see causes, effects, and other relationships between people, events, and time periods. Absolute chronology ties events to an exact time or date, pinpointing dates in one universal framework—the passage of time.
By sequencing events in chronological order you can gain greater and more accurate understanding of the relationships among them. You can even understand how a past event may influence the outcome of a pending event.
UNDERSTANDING THE SKILL
STRATEGY: FOLLOW CHRONOLOGICAL ORDER
Think about the order in which things happen to better understand absolute and relative chronology. The following paragraph is about significant events in the life of Andrew Carnegie. Carnegie and Steel	|j
Andrew Carnegie lived a true rags-to-riches story. Born in ©November, 1835 in Scotland to	|.
poor parents, Carnegie and his family immigrated to the United States in 1848 when he was ©12.	|-
In 1853, at age ©17, he took a job with the Pennsylvania Railroad. He quickly advanced and began I investing in the iron, oil, railroad, and telegraph industries. He ©soon founded his own company	I
and rose to the top of the business.	|
Carnegie held down costs by using vertical integration, buying supplies in bulk, and producing I items in large quantities. ©By ©1890, the Carnegie Steel Company dominated the American steel | industry. In © 1901 Carnegie sold the company to banker J.P Morgan for $480 million. ©After	|
retiring, Carnegie began to devote his time to philanthropy, or charity. ©At the same time, he gave | money to universities and built hundreds of public libraries.	f
© Examine all text and visuals for specific dates. Dates, times of the day, seasons of the year, and people’s ages are helpful in determining the specific sequence of events, which is known as absolute chronology.
0 Look for clue words about time. Clue words such as by, in, after, first, last, before, next, then, soon, and finally help indicate the general sequence of events, which is known as relative chronology.
© Identify events that occurred at the same time. Words such as while, meanwhile, and during signal the occurrence of simultaneous events.
STRATEGY. MAKE A TIME LINE
If the events in a passage are numerous and complex, organize them on a time line. The time line here lists the events from the passage above in chronological order. You can follow the sequence to find which events in Carnegie's life came first and which came next. Key Events in the Life of Andrew Carnegie


$
/
/•
V


z z
///
•A vp
A .<7 r<y Op P
jM


APPLYING THE SKILL
Skim Chapter 6, Section 1, pages 232-233, "Inventions Promote Change," to learn about inventors who changed the way people lived. Make a list of the important dates you find, starting with the year the typewriter was invented. Use absolute chronology and the model above to help you create your own time line of inventors arranged based on the year their inventions were introduced. Then use this information to write a short paragraph discussing the changes.
1.	Look for specific dates In the text.
In what year was the typewriter invented? In what year was the telephone unveiled?
2.	Look for clue words about time.
What clue words about time can you find in the passage? What do they tell you about the order of the events?
3.	Identify events that occurred at the same time.
What two events happened in 1876? Why do you think both these things were happening at the same time? What does this tell you about the time period?
251 SK2
myNotebook
btesfeiiTf;

Essential Question ______________
What were the economic, social, and political effects of immigration?

Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills (TEKS)
3A, 3C, 3D, 26A, 26B, 26D, 29D
SECTION 1: The New Immigrants
Main Idea Immigration from Europe, Asia, the Caribbean, and Mexico reached a new high in the late 19th and early 20th centuries.
SECTION 2: The Challenges of Urbanization
Main Idea The rapid growth of cities forced people to contend with problems of housing, transportation, water, and sanitation.
SECTION 3: Politics in the Gilded Age
Main Idea Local and national political corruption in the 19th century led to calls for reform.



T


he intersection of Orchard and Hester Streets on New York City’s Lower East Side, center of Jewish immigrant life in 1905.
V
v,*	'	ZLawk.
USA
WORLD
J18771
Rutherford B. Hayes is elected president.
|18801	Fl881! Chester	
James A.	A. Arthur suc-	: [.1884.1 Grover
Garfield is	ceeds Garfield	• Cleveland
elected	after Garfield’s	: is elected
president.	assassination.	: president.
[ 18881 Benjamin Harrison is elected president.
1880
1876] Porfirio Diaz seizes power in Mexico.
1884 j Berlin Conference meets to divide Africa among European nations.
1885
Indian National Congress forms.
1892 ’ Grover
Cleveland is elected to a second term,
1893 France establishes Indochina.



1890
Chapter 7


WRv1^]l'W^ .
ttfc...	.i,;,
Ik ,‘ii <vi’ • TV7 v---- '•*■ *" *■
j - B	H " 4 t
HISTORY
Ellis Island: Arrival
7i hmhsocialstudies.com
VIDEO
HESTER ST
*

myNotebook !
INTERACT
£>'
y
The year is 1880. New York City's swelling population has created a housing crisis. Immigrant families crowd into apartments that lack light, ventilation, and sanitary facilities. Children have nowhere to play except in the streets and are often kept out of school to work and help support their families. You are a reformer who wishes to help immigrants improve their lives. As you read the chapter and explore the issues below, use the annotation tools in your eBook to record your thoughts.
Explore the Issues
•	How can immigrants gain access to the services they need?
•	What skills do newcomers need?
•	How might immigrants respond to help from an outsider?
. W.
r' Kir. ley
o|f pied
1898 Hawaii is annexed by the United States.
:[l900]
: McKinley : is reelected.
i1903 s The Wright Brothers achieve the first successful airplane flight.
419101 The : appearance of : Hailey’s comet • causes wide-: spread panic.
[19121 Woodrow Wilson is elected president.
1900
1910
	: 1905 Workers revolt in	: 11908] Oil is	: [19121 Qing	1
: 1901 The	: gt Petersburg, Russia.	: discovered	• dynasty in China
: Commonwealth of		: in Persia.	: is overthrown.
- Australia is founded.			
19141 Panama Canal opens.
Immigrants and Urbanization 253
TEKS3C, 3D
The New Immigrants
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
Immigration from Europe, Asia, the Caribbean, and Mexico reached a new high in the late 19th and early 20th centuries.
This wave of immigration helped make the United States the diverse society it is today.
One American's
' hmhsocialstudies.com
»TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes about immigration to the United States.
In 1871, 14-year-old Fong See came from China to "Gold Mountain"—the United States. Fong See stayed, worked at menial jobs, and saved enough money to buy a business. Despite widespread restrictions against the Chinese, he became a very successful importer and was able to sponsor many other Chinese who wanted to enter the United States. Fong See had achieved the American dream. However, as his great-granddaughter Lisa See recalls, he was not satisfied.
A
Personal Voice lisa see “He had been trying to achieve success ever since he had first set foot on the Gold Mountain. His dream was very ‘American.’ He wanted to make money, have influence, be respected, have a wife and children who loved him. In 1919, when he traveled to China, he could look at his life and say he had achieved his dream. But once in China, he suddenly saw his life in a different context. In America, was he really rich? Could he live where he wanted? ... Did Americans care what he thought? . . . The answers played in his head—no, no, no. ” •	Ellis Island •Angel Island
•	melting pot
•	nativism
•Chinese
Exclusion Act
•Gentlemen’s
Agreement
—On Gold Mountain
Despite Fong See's success, he could not, upon his death in 1957, be buried next to his Caucasian wife because California cemeteries were still segregated.
Through the “Golden Door”
Driven by a sense of optimism, millions of immigrants entered the United States in the late 19th and early 20th centuries. Some, known as “birds of passage " intended to immigrate temporarily to earn money to take back home Many others believed that they would find a better life in America, free of the challenges they faced back home such as famine, land shortages, or persecution
Chapter 7
Background
From 1815 to 1848, a wave of revolutions— mostly sparked by a desire for constitutional governments— shook Europe. In 1830, for example, the Polish people rose up against their Russian rulers.
EUROPEANS
Between 1870 and 1920, approximately 20 million Europeans arrived in the United States. Before 1890, most immigrants came from countries in western and northern Europe. Beginning in the 1890s, however, increasing numbers came from southern and eastern Europe. In 1907 alone, about a million people arrived from Italy, Austria-Hungary, and Russia. Why did so many leave their homelands? Many of these new immigrants left to escape religious persecution. Whole villages of Jews were driven out of Russia by pogroms, organized attacks often encouraged by local authorities. Other Europeans left because of rising population. Between 1800 and 1900, the population in Europe doubled to nearly 400 million, resulting in a scarcity of land for farming. Farmers competed with laborers for too few industrial jobs. In the United States, jobs were supposedly plentiful. In addition, a spirit of reform and revolt had spread across Europe in the 19th century. Influenced by political movements at home, many young European men and women sought independent lives in America.
CHINESE AND JAPANESE
While waves of Europeans arrived on the shores of the East Coast, Chinese immigrants came to the West Coast in smaller numbers. Between 1851 and 1883, about 300,000 Chinese arrived. Many came to seek their fortunes after the discovery of gold in 1848 sparked the California gold rush. Chinese immigrants helped build the nation's railroads, including the first transcontinental line. When the railroads were completed, they turned to farming, mining, and domestic service. Some, like Fong See, started businesses. However, Chinese immigration was sharply limited by a congressional act in 1882. In 1884, the Japanese government allowed Hawaiian planters to recruit Japanese workers, and a Japanese emigration boom began. The United States' annexation of Hawaii in 1898 resulted in increased Japanese immigration to the West Coast. Immigration continued to increase as word of comparatively high American wages spread. The wave peaked in 1907, when 30,000 left Japan for the United States. By 1920, more than 200,000 Japanese lived on the West Coast.
»I
HISTORY
U.S.
Immigration Patterns, as of 1900 VIDEO
Italians in America: Old World, New Land
’/’T hmhsociaistudies.com
Russia 4%
Poland 3.5% Mexico China Japan _l
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1.	Movement Where did the greatest number of Italian immigrants settle?
2.	Movement From which country did the smallest percentage of immigrants come?
Settlement figures in thousands .
New York
in
3
Massachusetts
Wisconsin
CM
1.5% total

Immigrants and Urbanization 255
n
THE WEST INDIES AND MEXICO
Between 1880 and 1920, about 260,000 immigrants arrived in the eastern and southeastern United States from t e est Indies. They came from Jamaica, Cuba, Puerto Rico, and other islands. Many West Indians left their homelands because jobs were scarce and the industrial boom in the United States seemed to promise work for everyone. Mexicans, too, immigrated to the United States to find work, as well as to flee political turmoil. The 1902 National Reclamation Act, which encouraged the irrigation of arid land, created new farmland in Western states and drew Mexican farm workers northward. After 1910, political and social upheavals in Mexico prompted even more immigration. About 700,000 people 7 percent of the population of Mexico at the time—came to the U.S. over the next 20 years. &
Life in the New Land
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
What reasons did people from other parts of the world have for immigrating to the United States?
No matter what part of the globe immigrants came from, they faced many adjust-ments to an alien—and often unfriendly—culture.
A DIFFICULT JOURNEY
By the 1870s, almost all immigrants traveled by steamship. The trip across the Atlantic Ocean from Europe took approximately one week, while the Pacific crossing from Asia took nearly three weeks. Many immigrants traveled in steerage, the cheapest accommodations in a ship's cargo holds. Rarely allowed on deck, immigrants were crowded together in the gloom, unable to exercise or catch a breath of fresh air. They often had to sleep in louse-infested bunks and share toilets with many other passengers. Under these conditions, disease spread quickly, and some immigrants died before they reached their destination. For those who survived, the first glimpse of America could be breathtaking.
A
Personal Voice rosa cavalleri European governments used passports to control the number of professionals and young men of military age who left the country. ▼
“America!. . .We were so near It seemed too much to believe. Everyone stood silent—like in prayer.. . . Then we were entering the harbor. The land came so near we could almost reach out and touch It. . . . Everyone was holding their breath. Me too.... Some boats had bands playing on their decks and all of them were tooting their horns to us and leaving white trails in the water behind them. ”
—quoted in Rosa: The Life of an Italian Immigrant
ELLIS ISLAND
After initial moments of excitement, the immigrants faced the anxiety of not knowing whether they would be admitted to the United States. They had to pass inspection at immigration stations, such as the one at Castle Garden in New York, which was later moved to Ellis Island in New York Harbor. About 20 percent of the immigrants at Ellis Island were detained for a day or more before being inspected. However, only about 2 percent of those were denied entry. The processing of immigrants on Ellis Island was an ordeal that might take five hours or more. First, they had to pass a physical examination by a doctor. Anyone with a serious health problem or a contagious disease, such as tuberculosis, was promptly sent home. Those who passed the medical exam then reported to a government inspector. The inspector checked documents and questioned immigrants to
-	-	. 57
^ ‘• Rinnovasioni, modlCcaelonl o Udimaricnl
Vocabulary tuberculosis: a
bacterial infection characterized by fever and coughing, that spreads easily
Many immigrants, like these arriving at Ellis Island, were subjected to tests such as the one below. To prove their mental competence, they had to identify the four faces looking left in 14 seconds. Can you do it?
Fig, 4.—Moon Section of “V, C." lest. The subject should be able to point out the four moons that are looking to the left in fourteen seconds, if lie is directed to begin at the upper right band corner anil proceed systematically along each line, left to right.
Vocabulary felony: any one of the most serious crimes under the law, including murder, rape, and burglary
determine whether they met the legal requirements for entering the United States. The requirements included proving they had never been convicted of a felony, demonstrating that they were able to work, and showing that they had some money (at least $25 after 1909). One Irish immigrant, Mary Mullins Gordon, describes the overwhelming surroundings that newcomers encountered at Ellis Island.
Fig. 5.—The Key Section of the “V. C.” test. The time element has not been worked out for	this section, but it	is hardly	the	less
laluable. '*A” is shown the	subject and he is	asked to	find	the
nearest like it in Fig. i, “Un is shown and he is asked to find it in Fig. 3, “C" is shown and	he is asked to find	it .in JFTg.	4>,“n”
is shown and he is asked to	find it in Fig. a, an ‘
and he is asked to find it in Fig. 4.
i shown



r
main idea
Identifying Problems
ft What difficulties did Immigrants face in gaining admission to the United States?
A
Personal Voice mary mullins Gordon “When I saw Ellis Island, it’s a great big place, ... We all had to gather your bags, and the place was crowded with people and talking, and crying, . . . And we passed through some of the halls there, big open spaces there, and there was bars, and there was people behind these bars, and they were talking different languages, and I was scared to death. I thought I was in jail.57
—Ellis Island Oral History Project
From 1892 to 1924, Ellis Island was the chief immigration station in the United States. An estimated 17 million immigrants passed through its noisy, bustling facilities.
ANGEL ISLAND
While European immigrants arriving on the East Coast passed through Ellis Island, Asians—primarily Chinese—arriving on the West Coast gained admission at Angel Island in San Francisco Bay. Between 1910 and 1940, about 50,000 Chinese immigrants entered the United States through Angel Island. Processing at Angel Island stood in contrast to the procedure at Ellis Island. Immigrants endured harsh questioning and a long detention in filthy, ramshackle buildings while they waited to find out whether they would be admitted or rejected. g> COOPERATION FOR SURVIVAL
Once admitted to the country, immigrants faced the challenges of finding a place to live, getting a job, and getting along in daily life while trying to understand an unfamiliar language and culture. Many immigrants sought out people who shared their cultural values, practiced their religion, Immigrants and Urbanization
HISTORY
VIDEO
Angel Island: Ellis Island of the West
7! hmhsocialstudies.com
257
and spoke their native language. The ethnic communities were e ra s or immigrants. People pooled their money to build churches or synagogues. ey formed social clubs and aid societies. They founded orphanages and homes or the elderly and established cemeteries. They even published newspapers in their own languages.
Committed to their own cultures but also trying hard to grow into their new identities, many immigrants came to think of themselves as "hyphenated Americans. As hard as they tried to fit in, these new Polish- and Italian- and Chinese-Americans felt increasing friction as they rubbed shoulders with people born and raised in the United States. Native-born people often disliked the immigrants' unfamiliar customs and languages, and viewed them as a threat to the American way of life.
Immigration Restrictions
Vocabulary synagogue: place of meeting for worship and religious instruction in the Jewish faith
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
How did
immigrants deal with challenges they faced?
Many native-born Americans thought of their country as a melting pot, a mixture of people of different cultures and races who blended together by abandoning their native languages and customs. Many new immigrants, however, did not wish to give up their cultural identities. As immigration increased, strong antiimmigrant feelings emerged.
THE RISE OF NATIVISM
One response to the growth in immigration was nativism, or overt favoritism toward native-born Americans. Nativism gave rise to anti-immigrant groups and led to a demand for immigration restrictions. Many nativists believed that Anglo-Saxons—the Germanic ancestors of the English—were superior to other ethnic groups. These nativists did not object to immigrants from the "right" countries. Prescott F. Hall, a founder in 1894 of the Immigration Restriction League, identified desirable immigrants as "British, German, and Scandinavian stock, historically free, energetic, progressive." Nativists thought that problems were caused by immigrants from the "wrong" countries— "Slav, Latin, and Asiatic races, historically down-trodden . . . and stagnant."
Nativists sometimes objected more to immigrants' religious beliefs than to their ethnic backgrounds. Many native-born Americans were Protestants and thought that Roman Catholic and Jewish immigrants would undermine the democratic institutions established by the country's Protestant founders. The American Protective Association, a nativist group founded in 1887, launched vicious anti-Catholic attacks, and many colleges, businesses, and social clubs refused to admit Jews.
In 1897, Congress—influenced by the Immigration Restriction League—passed a bill requiring a literacy test for immigrants. Those who could not read 40 words in English or their native language would be refused entry. Although President Cleveland vetoed the bill, it was a powerful statement of public sentiment. In 1917, a similar bill would be passed into law in spite of President Woodrow Wilson's veto.
ANTI-ASIAN SENTIMENT
Nativism also found a foothold in the labor movement, particularly in the West, where native-born workers feared that jobs would go to Chinese Vocabulary
progressive:
favoring advancement toward better conditions or new ideas
immigrants, who would accept lower wages. The
depression of 1873 intensified anti-Chinese senti-
ment in California. Work was scarce, and labor
groups exerted political pressure on the govern-
ment to restrict Asian immigration. The founder of
the Workingmen's Party, Denis Kearney, headed the
anti-Chinese movement in California. He made
hundreds of speeches throughout the state, each
ending with the message, "The Chinese must go!"
In 1882, Congress slammed the door on Chinese immigration for ten years by passing the Chinese Exclusion Act. This act banned entry to all Chinese except students, teachers, merchants, tourists, and government officials. In 1892,
Congress extended the law for another ten years. In 1902, Chinese immigration was restricted indefinitely; the law was not repealed until 1943.
THE GENTLEMEN S AGREEMENT
The fears that had led to anti-Chinese agitation were extended to
Japanese and other Asian people in the early 1900s.
In 1906, the local board of education in San
Francisco segregated Japanese children by putting
them in separate schools. When Japan raised an
angry protest at this treatment of its emigrants,
President Theodore Roosevelt worked out a deal. Under the Gentlemen's Agreement of 1907-1908, Japan's government agreed to limit emigration of unskilled workers to the United States in exchange for the repeal of the San Francisco segregation order.
Although doorways for immigrants had been all but closed to Asians on the West Coast, cities in the East and the Midwest teemed with European immigrants—and with urban opportunities and challenges.

Fear and resentment of Chinese immigrants sometimes resulted in mob attacks, like the one shown here.
ASSESSMENT
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance. •Ellis Island	•melting pot	•Chinese Exclusion Act
•Angel Island	•nativism
•Gentlemen’s Agreement
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Create a diagram such as the one below. List two or more causes of each effect.
Causes 			> Effects
1.	Immigrants
2.	leave their
3.	home countries.
1.	Immigrants face
2.	hardships in the
3.	United States.
1.	Some nativists
2.	want to restrict
3.	immigration.
CRITICAL THINKING
IDENTIFYING PROBLEMS
Which group of immigrants do you think faced the greatest challenges in the United States? Why?
ANALYZING EFFECTS
What were the effects of the massive influx of immigrants to the U.S. in the late 1800s?
5.	SUMMARIZING
Describe how many immigrants felt about seeking new lives in the United States.
6.	EVALUATING
What arguments can you make against nativism and anti-immigrant feeling? Think About:
•	the personal qualities of immigrants
•	the reasons for anti-immigrant feeling
•	the contributions of immigrants to the United States
Immigrants and Urbanization 259
TRACING THEMES
Diversity and the National Identity
Before the first Europeans arrived, a variety of cultural groups coastal fishing societies, desert farmers, plains and woodland hunters—inhabited North America. With the arrival of Europeans and Africans, the cultural mix grew more complex. Although this diversity has often produced tension, it has also been beneficial. As different groups learned from one another about agriculture, technology, and social customs, American culture became a rich blend of cultures from around the world.
SPANISH NORTH AMERICA
Spanish missionaries in the Southwest tried to impose their culture upon Native Americans. However, many Native Americans retained aspects of their original cultures even as they took on Spanish ways. For example, today many Pueblo Indians of New Mexico perform ancient ceremonies, such as the Corn Dance, in addition to celebrating the feast days of Catholic saints. Later, the first cowboys—descendants of the Spanish—would introduce to white Americans cattle-ranching techniques developed in Mexico.
THE DECLARATION OF INDEPENDENCE
The signers of the Declaration of Independence were descendants of immigrants. The founders’ ancestors had come to North America in search of economic opportunity and freedom of religious expression. When the Second Continental Congress declared a “United States” in 1776, they acknowledged that the country would contain diverse regions and interests. Thus the founders placed on the presidential seal the motto “E Pluribus Unum”— “out of many, one.”
THE EMANCIPATION PROCLAMATION
At the midpoint of the Civil War, President Abraham Lincoln issued the Emancipation Proclamation, freeing all slaves in areas of the Union that were in rebellion. Although the Proclamation could not be enforced immediately, it was a strong statement of opposition to slavery, and it paved the way for African Americans’ citizenship.
ISO
Chapter 7 THE STATUE OF LIBERTY
Jewish poet Emma Lazarus wrote the famous lines inscribed at the foot of the Statue of Liberty, “Give me your tired, your poor,/Your huddled masses yearning to breathe free,. . .” The statue’s dedication took place during the most extensive wave of immigration the United States has ever known.
Many native-born Americans felt that the newcomers should fully immerse themselves in their new culture. However, most immigrants combined American language and customs with their traditional ways. As immigrants celebrated Independence Day and Thanksgiving, they introduced into American culture new celebrations, such as Chinese New Year and Cinco de Mayo.
21ST-CENTURY DIVERSITY
In 1998, three countries (Mexico, China, and India) contributed a third of the total number of immigrants to the United States. The rest of 1998’s immigrants came from countries as diverse as Vietnam, Sudan, and Bosnia.
American athletes at the 2000 Olympic Games in Sydney, Australia, reflected the increasing diversity of the U.S., pointing toward a future in which there may no longer be a majority racial or ethnic group.
Immigrants and Urbanization 261
The Challenges of Urbanization
MAIN IDEA |
f The rapid growth of cities forced people to contend with problems of housing, transportation, water, and sanitation.
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Consequently, residents of U.S. cities today enjoy vastly improved living conditions.
One American's Story;
hmhsocialstudies.com J
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes about urbanization and its problems.
Terms & Names
• urbanization	* settlement house
•Americanization	’Jane Addams
movement	‘Social Gospel
•tenement
•mass transit
In 1870, at age 21, Jacob Riis left his native Denmark for the United States. Riis found work as a police reporter, a job that took him into some of New York City's worst slums, where he was shocked at the conditions in the overcrowded, airless, filthy tenements. Riis used his talents to expose the hardships of New York City's poor.
A
Personal Voice Jacob riis “ Be a little careful, please! The hall is dark and you might stumble over the children pitching pennies back there. Not that It would hurt them; kicks and cuffs are their daily diet. They have little else. . . . Close [stuffy]? Yes! What would you have? All the fresh air that ever enters these stairs comes from the hall-door that is forever slamming. . . . Here is a door. Listen! That short hacking cough, that tiny, helpless wail—what do they mean?
... The child is dying with measles. With half a chance it might have lived; but It had none. That dark bedroom killed it.”
—How the Other Half Lives
Making a living in the late 19th and early 20th centuries was not easy. Natural and economic disasters had hit farmers hard in Europe and in the United States, and the promise of industrial jobs drew millions of people to American cities. The urban population exploded from 10 million to 54 million between 1870 and 1920. This growth revitalized the cities but also created serious problems that, as Riis observed, had a powerful impact on the new urban poor.
As many as 12 people slept in rooms such as this one in New York City, photographed by Jacob Riis around 1889.
Urban Opportunities
The technological boom in the 19 th century contributed to the growingfndus" trial strength of the United States. The result was rapid urbanization, or growth of cities, mostly in the regions of the Northeast and Midwest.
Chapter 7
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Motives
$ Why did native-born Americans start the Americanization movement?
IMMIGRANTS SETTLE IN CITIES
Most of the immigrants who streamed into the United States in the late 19th century became city dwellers because cities were the cheapest and most convenient places to live. Cities also offered unskilled laborers steady jobs in mills and factories. By 1890, there were twice as many Irish residents in New York City as in Dublin, Ireland. By 1910, immigrant families made up more than half the total population of 18 major American cities.
The Americanization movement was designed to assimilate people of wide-ranging cultures into the dominant culture. This social campaign was sponsored by the government and by concerned citizens. Schools and voluntary associations provided programs to teach immigrants skills needed for citizenship, such as English literacy and American history and government. Subjects such as cooking and social etiquette were included in the curriculum to help the newcomers learn the ways of native-born Americans. £
Despite these efforts, many immigrants did not wish to abandon their traditions. Ethnic communities provided the social support of other immigrants from the same country. This enabled them to speak their own language and practice their customs and religion. However, these neighborhoods soon became overcrowded, a problem that was intensified by the arrival of new transplants from America's rural areas.
MIGRATION FROM COUNTRY TO CITY
Rapid improvements in farming technology during the second half of the 19th century were good news for some farmers but bad news for others. Inventions such as the McCormick reaper and the steel plow made farming more efficient but meant that fewer laborers were needed to work the land. As more and more farms merged, many rural people moved to cities to find whatever work they could. Many of the Southern farmers who lost their livelihoods were African Americans. Between 1890 and 1910, about 200,000 African Americans moved north and west to cities such as Chicago and Detroit, in an effort to escape racial violence, economic hardship, and political oppression. Many found conditions only somewhat better than those they had left behind. Segregation and discrimination were often the reality in Northern cities. Job competition between blacks and white immigrants caused further racial tension.
Immigrants and Urbanization 263

I
I
I
Urban Problems
As the urban population skyrocketed, city governments faced the problems of how to provide residents with needed services and safe living conditions. HOUSING When the industrial age began, working-class families in cities had two housing options. They could either buy a house on the outskirts of town, where they would face transportation problems, or rent cramped rooms in a boardinghouse in the central city. As the urban population increased, however, new types of housing were designed. For example, row houses single-family dwellings that shared side walls with other similar houses packed many singlefamily residences onto a single block.
After working-class families left the central city, immigrants often took over their old housing, sometimes with two or three families occupying a one-family residence. As Jacob Riis pointed out, these multifamily urban dwellings, called tenements, were overcrowded and unsanitary.
In 1879, to improve such slum conditions, New York City passed a law that set minimum standards for plumbing and ventilation in apartments. Landlords began building tenements with air shafts that provided an outside window for each room. Since garbage was picked up infrequently, people sometimes dumped it into the air shafts, where it attracted vermin. To keep out the stench, residents nailed windows shut. Though established with good intent, these new tenements soon became even worse places to live than the converted single-family residences. &
Sanitation problems in big cities were overwhelming. It was not unusual to see a dead horse in the street.
TRANSPORTATION
Innovations in mass transit, transportation systems designed to move large numbers of people along fixed routes, enabled workers to go to and from jobs more easily. Street cars were introduced in San Francisco in 1873 and electric subways in Boston in 1897. By the early 20th century, mass-transit networks in many urban areas linked city neighborhoods to one another and to outlying communities. Cities struggled to repair old transit systems and to build new ones to meet the demand of expanding populations. WATER
Cities also faced the problem of supplying safe drinking water. As the urban population grew in the 1840s and 1850s, cities such as New York and Cleveland built public waterworks to handle the increasing demand. As late as the 1860s, however, the residents of many cities had grossly inadequate piped water— or none at all. Even in large cities like New York, homes seldom had indoor plumbing, and residents had to collect water in pails from faucets on the street and heat it for bathing. The necessity of improving water quality to control diseases such as cholera and typhoid fever was obvious. To make city water safer, filtration was introduced in the 1870s and chlorination in 1908. However, in the early 20th century, many city dwellers still had no access to safe water. SANITATION
As the cities grew, so did the challenge of keeping them clean. Horse manure piled up on the streets, sewage flowed through open gutters, and factories spewed foul smoke into the air. Without dependable trash collection, people dumped their garbage on the streets. Although private contractors called scavengers were hired to sweep the streets, collect garbage, and clean outhouses, they MAIN IDEA
j Identifying
Problems
$ What housing problems did urban working-class families face?
Vocabulary chlorination: a
method of purifying water by mixing it with the chemical chlorine
264 Chapter 7
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
$ How did conditions in cities affect people’s health?
often did not do the jobs properly. By 1900, many cities had developed sewer lines and created sanitation departments. However, the task of providing hygienic living conditions was an ongoing challenge for urban leaders.
CRIME
As the populations of cities increased, pickpockets and thieves flourished. Although New York City organized the first full-time, salaried police force in 1844, it and most other city law enforcement units were too small to have much impact on crime. FIRE
The limited water supply in many cities contributed to another menace: the spread of fires. Major fires occurred in almost every large American city during the 1870s and 1880s. In addition to lacking water with which to combat blazes, most cities were packed with wooden dwellings, which were like kindling waiting to be ignited. The use of candles and kerosene heaters also posed a fire hazard. In San Francisco, deadly fires often broke out during earthquakes. Jack London described the fires that raged after the San Francisco earthquake of 1906. A
Personal Voice jack London “On Wednesday morning at a quarter past five came the earthquake. A minute later the flames were leaping upward. In a dozen different quarters south of Market Street, in the working-class ghetto, and in the factories, fires started. There was no opposing the flames. . . . And the great water-mains had burst. All the shrewd contrivances and safeguards of man had been thrown out of gear by thirty seconds’ twitching of the earth-crust.”
—"The Story of an Eye-witness”
At first, most city firefighters were volunteers and not always available when they were needed. Cincinnati, Ohio, tackled this problem when it established the nation's first paid fire department in 1853. By 1900, most cities had full-time professional fire departments. The introduction of a practical automatic fire sprinkler in 1874 and the replacement of wood as a building material with brick, stone, or concrete also made cities safer.
FIRE:
Enemy of the City The Great Chicago Fire October 8-10,1871
The fire burned for over 24 hours.
An estimated 300 people died.
• 100,000 were left M	homeless.
More than 3 square miles of the city center was destroyed.
Property loss was estimated at $200 million.
17,500 buildings were destroyed.
The San Francisco Earthquake April 18,1906
The quake lasted 28 seconds; fires burned for 4 days.
An estimated 1,000 people died.
Over 200,000 wer< left homeless.
Fire swept through 5 square miles of the city.
•	Property loss was estimated at $500 million.
•	28,000 buildings were destroyed.
Immigrants and Urbanization 265
i
Reformers Mobilize	.
As problems in cities mounted, concerned Americans worked to find solutions. Social welfare reformers targeted their efforts at relieving urban poverty.
THE SETTLEMENT HOUSE
In the late 1800s, with poverty a desperate problem, some American reformers turned to Great Britain for inspiration. In 1884, London reformers had founded Toynbee Hall, the first of the settlement houses. These were community centers in slum neighborhoods that provided assistance to local residents, especially immigrants. In addition to providing aid, settlement houses taught immigrants many useful skills. They provided social activities, such as clubs and sports. They also sent visiting nurses into the homes of the sick. Most settlement house workers were middle-class, college educated women who lived among the people they served. The movement gave women new opportunities to lead, organize, and improve life for others. Settlement houses soon began appearing in U.S. cities. One of the first was Hull House in Chicago, founded by Jane Addams and Ellen Gates Starr in 1889. Addams became one of the most influential members of the settlement house movement. Hull House was located in the middle of an urban neighborhood peopled by Italian, Irish, German, Greek, Bohemian, and Russian and Polish Jewish immigrants. Through English classes and job-training programs offered at Hull House, Addams worked to provide economic opportunities for the ethnic and religious minorities who inhabited the neighborhood. Settlement houses also sought political solutions by lobbying state and local government to resolve social and economic problems. By 1910, about 400 settlement houses were operating in cities across the country. The settlement houses helped cultivate social responsibility toward the urban poor.
Many workers in the movement held strong religious views. They believed in the Social Gospel, the idea that religious faith should be expressed through good works. They believed that churches had a moral duty to help solve society's problems and preached salvation through service to the poor. Their views contrasted with Social Darwinists, who saw existence as a competitive struggle and argued that people were poor because of their own deficiencies. They criticized the Social Gospel movement because they did not believe their reforms could help.
( 2 1 ASSESSMENT
•Social Gospel
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance, •urbanization	•tenement	•settlement house
•Americanization movement	*mass transit	-Jane Addams
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Re-create the spider map below. List problems on the vertical lines. Fill in details about attempts to solve each problem__________
Solutions to \
Urban Problems J
Which solution do you think was most effective? Why?
266 Chapter 7
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	SUMMARIZING
Explain how settlement house workers expanded economic opportunities for ethnic and religious minorities.
ANALYZING ISSUES
Why would urban problems inspire followers of the Social Gospel to work toward reform?
ANALYZING EFFECTS
What effects did the migration from rural areas to the cities in the late 19th century have on urban society?
Think About:
•	why people moved to cities
•	the problems caused by rapid urban growth
•	the differences in the experiences of whites and blacks
TEKS 3A
MAIN IDEA
Politics in the Gilded Age
Local and national political corruption in the 19th century led to calls for reform.
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Political reforms paved the way for a more honest and efficient government in the 20th century and beyond.
Terms & Names
X hmhsoci’alstudies.com
IHKIIMU
NUTc5 Use the graphic organizer online to take notes about political corruption in the Gilded Age.
One American’s Story
•political machine	•James A. Garfield		
•graft	• Chester A. Arthur		
• Boss Tweed	• Pendleton Civil		
• patronage	Service Act		
•civil service	•Grover Cleveland	!	r
• Rutherford B.	• Benjamin	1 i	'T
Hayes	Harrison		
Mark Twain described the excesses of the late 19th century in a satirical novel, The Gilded Age, a collaboration with the writer Charles Dudley Warner. The title of the book has since come to represent the period from the 1870s to the 1890s. Twain mocks the greed and self-indulgence of his characters, including Philip Sterling.
A
Personal Voice MARK TWAIN
and CHARLES DUDLEY WARNER “ There are many young men like him [Philip Sterling] In American society, of his age, opportunities, education and abilities, who have really been educated for nothing and have let themselves drift, in the hope that they will find somehow, and by some sudden turn of good luck, the golden road to fortune. ... He saw people, all around him, poor yesterday, rich to-day, who had come into sudden opulence by some means which they could not have classified among any of the regular occupations of life.99
—The Gilded Age
Twain's characters find that getting rich quick is more difficult than they had thought it would be. Investments turn out to be worthless; politicians' bribes eat up their savings. The glittering exterior of the age turns out to hide a corrupt political core and a growing gap between the few rich and the many poor.
▲
A luxurious apartment building rises behind a New York City shantytown in 1889.
The Emergence of Political Machines
the”late 19th century, cities experienced rapid growth under inefficient government. In a climate influenced by dog-eat-dog Social Darwinism, cities were receptive to a new power structure, the political machine, and a new politician, the city boss.
Immigrants and Urbanization 267
THE POLITICAL MACHINE
An organized group that controlled the activities of a political party in a city, the political machine also offered services to voters and businesses in exchange for political or financial support, n t e eca es after the Civil War, political machines gained control of local government in Baltimore, New York, San Francisco, and other major cities. The machine was organized like a pyramid. At the pyramid's base were local precinct workers and captains, who tried to gain voters' support on a city block or in a neighborhood and who reported to a ward boss. At election time, the ward boss worked to secure the vote in all the precincts in the ward, or electoral district. Ward bosses helped the poor and gained their votes by doing favors or providing services. As Martin Lomasney, elected ward boss of Boston's West End in 1885, explained, "There's got to be in every ward somebody that any bloke can come to . . . and get help. Help, you understand; none of your law and your justice, but help." At the top of the pyramid was the city boss, who controlled the activities of the political party throughout the city. Precinct captains, ward bosses, and the city boss worked together to elect their candidates and guarantee the success of the machine. £
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
In what way did the structure of the political machine resemble a pyramid?
THE ROLE OF THE POLITICAL BOSS
Whether or not the boss officially served as mayor, he controlled access to municipal jobs and business licenses, and influenced the courts and other municipal agencies. Bosses like Roscoe Conkling in New York used their power to build parks, sewer systems, and waterworks, and gave money to schools, hospitals, and orphanages. Bosses could also provide government support for new businesses, a service for which they were often paid extremely well. It was not only money that motivated city bosses. By solving urban problems, bosses could reinforce voters' loyalty, win additional political support, and extend their influence.
IMMIGRANTS AND THE MACHINE
Many precinct captains and political bosses were first-generation or second-generation immigrants. Few were educated beyond grammar school. They entered politics early and worked their way up from the bottom. They could speak to immigrants in their own language and understood the challenges that newcomers faced. More important, the bosses were able to provide solutions. The machines helped immigrants with naturalization (attaining full citizenship), hous- ing, and jobs—the newcomers' most pressing needs. In return, the immigrants provided what the political bosses needed—votes. $
"Big Jim" Pendergast, an Irish-American saloonkeeper, worked his way up from precinct captain to Democratic city boss in Kansas City by aiding Italian
African-American, and Irish voters in his ward. By 1900, he controlled Missouri state politics as well.
A
Personal Voice james pendergast “ I’ve been called a boss. All there Is to it is having friends, doing things for neo-
SoInX™ ,’at" " d° **	'	Y°“ «„■, people ,„7„
l„ ™ St y0U_’°U ™ke *hem V°" *”	1 c°e-’e<l anybody
in my life. Wherever you see a man bulldozing anybody he don’t last long.”
quoted in The Pendergast Machine
▲
A corrupt 19th-century boss robs the city treasury by easily cutting government red tape, or bureaucracy.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Motives
Why did immigrants support political machines?
!68 Chapter 7
Municipal Graft and Scandal
While the well-oiled political machines provided city dwellers with services, many political bosses fell victim to corruption as their influence grew.
ELECTION FRAUD AND GRAFT
When the loyalty of voters was not enough to carry an election, some political machines turned to fraud. Using fake names, party faithfuls cast as many votes as were needed to win. Once a political machine got its candidates into office, it could take advantage of numerous opportunities for graft, the illegal use of political influence for personal gain. For example, by helping a person find work on a construction project for the city, a political machine could ask the worker to bill the city for more than the actual cost of materials and labor. The worker then "kicked back" a portion of the earnings to the machine. Taking these kickbacks, or illegal payments for their services, enriched the political machines—and individual politicians.
Political machines also granted favors to businesses in return for cash and accepted bribes to allow illegal activities, such as gambling, to flourish. Politicians were able to get away with shady dealings because the police rarely interfered. Until about 1890, police forces were hired and fired by political bosses.
Vocabulary extortion: illegal use of one’s official position to obtain property or funds
THE TWEED RING SCANDAL
William M. Tweed, known as Boss Tweed, became head of Tammany Hall, New York City's powerful Democratic political machine, in 1868. Between 1869 and 1871, Boss Tweed led the Tweed Ring, a group of corrupt politicians, in defrauding the city. One scheme, the construction of the New York County Courthouse, involved extravagant graft. The project cost taxpayers $13 million, while the actual construction cost was $3 million. The difference went into the pockets of Tweed and his followers.
Thomas Nast, a political cartoonist, helped arouse public outrage against Tammany Hall's graft, and the Tweed Ring was finally broken in
1871. Tweed was indicted on 120 counts of fraud and extortion and sentenced to 12 years in jail. His sentence was reduced to one year, but after leaving jail, Tweed was quickly arrested on another charge. While serving a second sentence, Tweed escaped. He was captured in Spain when officials identified him from a Thomas Nast cartoon. By then, political corruption had become a national issue.
▲
Boss Tweed, head of Tammany Hall.
Analyzing
Political Cartoons}
TAMMANY TIGER LOOSE”
Political cartoonist Thomas Nast ridiculed Boss Tweed and his machine in the pages of Harper's Weekly. Nast’s work threatened Tweed, who reportedly said, "I don’t care so much what the papers write about me—my constituents can’t read; but . . . they can see pictures!”
SKILLBUILDER
Analyzing Political Cartoons 1.	Under the Tammany tiger’s victim is a torn paper that reads “LAW.” What is its significance?
2.	Boss Tweed and his cronies, portrayed as noblemen, watch from the stands on the left. The cartoon’s caption reads “What are you going to do about it?” What effect do you think Nast wanted to have on his audience?
Immigrants and Urbanization 269

RUTHERFORD B. HAYES(1877-1881) "
Nobody ever left the presidency with less regret. . . than I do. ” JAMES A. GARFIELD
(1881) “Assassination can be no more guarded against than death by lightning. ”
i
CHESTER A. ARTHUR
(1881-1885) “ There doesn't seem to be anything else for an ex-president to do
but. . . raise big pumpkins. ”
!70 Chapter 7
Civil Service Replaces Patronage ^
The desire for power and money that made local politics corrupt in the industrial age also infected national politics.
PATRONAGE SPURS REFORM
Since the beginning of the 19th century, presidents had complained about the problem of patronage, or the giving of government jobs to people who had helped a candidate get elected. In Andrew Jackson's administration, this policy was known as the spoils system. People from cabinet members to workers who scrubbed the steps of the Capitol owed their jobs to political connections. As might be expected, some government employees were not qualified for the positions they filled. Moreover, political appointees, whether qualified or not, sometimes used their positions for personal gain. Reformers began to press for the elimination of patronage and the adoption of a merit system of hiring. Jobs in civil service—government administration—should go to the most qualified persons, reformers believed. It should not matter what political views they held or who recommended them. $
REFORM UNDER HAYES, GARFIELD, AND ARTHUR
Civil service reform made gradual progress under Presidents Hayes, Garfield, and Arthur. Republican president Rutherford B. Hayes, elected in 1876, could not convince Congress to support reform, so he used other means. Hayes named independents to his cabinet. He also set up a commission to investigate the nation's customhouses, which were notorious centers of patronage. On the basis of the commission's report, Hayes fired two of the top officials of New York City's customhouse, where jobs were controlled by the Republican Party. These firings enraged the Republican New York senator and political boss Roscoe Conkling and his supporters, the Stalwarts. When Hayes decided not to run for reelection in 1880, a free-for-all broke out at the Republican convention, between the Stalwarts—who opposed changes in the spoils system—and reformers. Since neither Stalwarts nor reformers could win a majority of delegates, the convention settled on an independent presidential candidate, Ohio congressman James A. Garfield. To balance out Garfield's ties to reformers, the Republicans nominated for vice-president Chester A. Arthur, one of Conkling's supporters. Despite Arthur's inclusion on the ticket, Garfield angered the Stalwarts by giving reformers most of his patronage jobs once he was elected.
On July 2, 1881, as President Garfield walked through the Washington, D.C., train station, he was shot two times by a mentally unbalanced lawyer named Charles Guiteau, whom Garfield had turned down for a job. The would-be assassin announced, "I did it and I will go to jail for it. 1 am a Stalwart and Arthur is now president." Garfield finally died from his wounds on September 19. Despite his ties to the Stalwarts, Chester Arthur turned reformer when he became president. His first message to Congress urged legislators to pass a civil service law.
The resulting Pendleton Civil Service Act of 1883 authorized a bipartisan civil service commission to make
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
How did patronage contribute to government incompetence and fraud?
appointments to federal jobs through a merit system based on candidates' performance on an examination. By 1901, more than 40 percent of all federal jobs had been classified as civil service positions, but the Pendleton Act had mixed consequences. On the one hand, public administration became more honest and efficient. On the other hand, because officials could no longer pressure employees for campaign contributions, politicians turned to other sources for donations.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
What were the positive and the negative effects of the Pendleton Civil Service Act?
Business Buys Influence
With employees no longer a source of campaign contributions, politicians turned to wealthy business owners. Therefore, the alliance between government and big business became stronger than ever.
HARRISON, CLEVELAND, AND HIGH TARIFFS
Big business hoped the government would preserve, or even raise, the tariffs that protected domestic industries from foreign competition. The Democratic Party, however, opposed high tariffs because they increased prices. In 1884, the Democratic Party won a presidential election for the first time in 28 years with candidate Grover Cleveland. As president, Cleveland tried to lower tariff rates, but Congress refused to support him. In 1888, Cleveland ran for reelection on a low-tariff platform against the former Indiana senator Benjamin Harrison, the grandson of President William Henry Harrison. Harrison's campaign was financed by large contributions from companies that wanted tariffs even higher than they were. Although Cleveland won about 100,000 more popular votes than Harrison, Harrison took a majority of the electoral votes and the presidency. He signed the McKinley Tariff Act of 1890, which raised tariffs on manufactured goods to their highest level yet.
In 1892, Cleveland was elected again—the only president to serve two non-consecutive terms. He supported a bill for lowering the McKinley Tariff but refused to sign it because it also provided for a federal income tax. The Wilson-Gorman Tariff became law in 1894 without the president's signature. In 1897, William McKinley was inaugurated president and raised tariffs once again.
The attempt to reduce the tariff had failed, but the spirit of reform was not dead. New developments in areas ranging from technology to mass culture would help redefine American society as the United States moved into the 20th century.
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•	political machine	• patronage	• James A. Garfield	• Grover Cleveland
,graft	•civil service	• Chester A. Arthur	• Benjamin Harrison
•	Boss Tweed	• Rutherford B.	Hayes	• Pendleton Civil Service Act
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
In a chart like the one shown, list examples of corruption in 19th-century politics.
CRITICAL THINKING
EVALUATING LEADERSHIP
Reread the quotation from James Pendergast on page 268. Explain whether you agree or disagree that machine politicians did not coerce people.
ANALYZING CAUSES
Why do you think tariff reform failed? Support your response with evidence from the chapter.
5.	HYPOTHESIZING
How do you think politics in the United States would have been different if the Pendleton Civil Service Act had not been passed? THINK ABOUT:
•	the act’s impact on federal workers
•	the act’s impact on political fundraising
•	Republican Party conflicts
Immigrants and Urbanization 271
i 7')
I ASSESSMENT
Increased
Immigration
Increased Machine Politics
Result
Reaction
2.
EVALUATING
In the 1860s, Horace Greeley—editor of the New York Tribune—remarked, “We cannot all live in the cities, yet nearly all seem determined to do so.” Why do you think this was true at the end of the 19th century? Do you think it is still true? Why or why not? COMPARING
How were politicians like Boss Tweed similar to industrial magnates like Carnegie and Rockefeller? IMMIGRATION AND MIGRATION
Poverty and persecution cause millions of people to leave Europe, China, Japan, the Caribbean, and Mexico for the United States.
♦
♦
POLITICS
Ellis Island	6.
Gentlemen’s Agreement	7.
Americanization movement 8. Jane Addams	9.
political machine	10.
URBANIZATION
For each term or name below, write a sentence explaining its connection to immigration and urbanization.
graft
Boss Tweed patronage
Rutherford B. Hayes Pendleton Civil Service Act
Use your notes and the information in the chapter to answer the following questions.
The New Immigrants (pages 254-259)
What trends or events in other countries prompted people to move to the United States in the late 19th and early 20th centuries?
What difficulties did many of these new immigrants face?
The Challenges of Urbanization
(pages 262-266)
Why did cities in the United States grow rapidly in the decades following the Civil War?
What problems did this rapid growth pose for cities? What solutions to urban problems did the settlement-house movement propose?
VISUAL SUMMARY IMMIGRANTS AND URBANIZATION
The influx of immigrants and migrants causes a population boom in cities.
City services, such as housing, transportation, water, and sanitation, are stretched to the limit.
Reformers try to fix urban problems through education, training, charity, and political action.
Immigrants are forced to adapt to a new language and culture. Changes in agriculture cause people to migrate from the rural U.S. to the cities in search of work.
Many immigrants and migrants face discrimination in their efforts to find jobs and housing.
Politics in the Gilded Age (pages 267-271)
6.	Why did machine politics become common in big * cities in the late 19th century?
7.	What government problems arose as a result of patronage?
8.	Summarize the views of Grover Cleveland and Benjamin Harrison on tariffs.
CRITICAL THINKING
USING YOUR NOTES
In a diagram like the one below, show one result of and one reaction against (a) the increase in immigration and (b) the increase in machine politics. Political machines develop to take advantage of the needs of immigrants and the urban poor. City politicians use fraud and graft to maintain political power. Corruption in national politics results in the call for civil service jobs to be awarded on the basis of merit.
Big business’s growing influence on politics defeats tariff reform that would aid wage-earners.
272 Chapter 7
.Jp*

TEXAS TEST PRACTICE
Use the quotation and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 1.
“The Chinese . . . ask for fair treatment. . . . Since the first restriction law was passed the United States has received as immigrants more than two million Austro-Hungarians, two million Italians and a million and a half Russians and Finns. Each of these totals is from five to seven times the whole amount of Chinese immigration of all classes during thirty years of free Immigration. ... The question is not now of the admission of laborers, but whether other Chinese who are entitled to come under both law and treaty shall receive the same courtesies as people of other nations, and shall be relieved from many harassing regulations. They must no longer be detained, photographed and examined as if they were suspected of crime. ”
—Ng Poon Chew, from The Treatment of the Exempt Classes of Chinese in the United States
1. The information in the passage supports which one of the following points of view?
A
European immigration should be restricted. B
Chinese laborers should be allowed to immigrate.
C
All immigrants are treated like criminals. D
Chinese immigrants and European immigrants should be treated the same.
Use the cartoon and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 2.
2. The cartoon suggests that Boss Tweed (the large figure at left) —
F was solely responsible for stealing the people’s money.
G did not steal the people’s money.
H had help from his associates in stealing the
people’s money.
J was loyal to his associates.

7! hmhsocialstudies.com
TEST PRACTICE
For additional test practice, go online for:
• Diagnostic tests • Tutorials
INTERACT WITH HISTORY
"VWriteSmart Think about the issues you recorded in myNotebook as you read the chapter. With what you have learned about the challenges faced by immigrants in the 19th century, consider the following question: What were the best solutions attempted by government and reformers in the 1800s? Create a pamphlet promoting the reform, improvement, or government solution you chose. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write the text for your pamphlet.
COLLABORATIVE LEARNI
■■■■■■■■maNaaaaM
\CEIJTURY
Organize into small groups and discuss
the immigrant experiences that you learned about in this chapter. Consider why people chose to immigrate; why they felt optimistic that they would find a better life in the United States; and the opportunities, challenges, and attitudes that they faced once they arrived. Then, within your group, break into two teams and debate the Americanization movement to assimilate immigrants into American culture.
"v WriteSmart
Imagine you are a senator and the Senate is about to vote on the Chinese Exclusion Act.
Prepare a persuasive speech arguing against the new law. For the first part of your speech, explain why this law is unjust and unfair to the Chinese.
For the second part, address the concerns of those in favor of the act and provide an alternate solu-tion for the issues prompting the Chinese Exclusion Act. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your speech.
Immigrants and Urbanization 273
End-of-Chapter Skill Activity
Developing Historical Inquiry
DEFINING THE SKILL
Historical inquiry entails asking questions about events and trends what caused them, what made them important, and so forth. These questions might ask how or why something happened, why someone acted in a certain way, or how different conditions might have changed an event. To decide if a historical question is reasonable, ask yourself (1) whether the answer is important or not, and (2) if enough information exists to answer it. The ability to formulate historical questions is an important step in doing research. As you examine multiple sources of evidence—firsthand accounts, documents, letters, and other records of the past—ask questions about the information each source conveys and why that information is significant. Use these questions to form a central question to research.
UNDERSTANDING THE SKILL
STRATEGY: FORMULATE HISTORICAL QUESTIONS
The diagram below shows questions a student might ask to learn more about the Tweed Ring Scandal. After asking questions, identify the central question to research and examine different sources to find answers. Q
The Tweed Ring Scandal Who were ito leaders?
t-he scandal?
What conditions ^allowed the scandal
to occur?
What did the leaders do?
What happened during the Tweed Ring Scandal?
What happened as a result of the Tweed Ring?
'Where and when did , the scandal occur? ,
Why did political machines start?
0 Central research question: What happened during the Tweed Ring Scandal?
0 Determine the topic that you would like to know more about. Consider different people, places, and events from U.S. history. Choose one idea that you would like to learn more about.
0 Decide what questions to ask and write them down. Writing questions will help guide your research and keep
°c“sed T g°T 6gin by asking about the basic facts of the event: wh<> was involved? What did they do? Where and when did the event occur? Expand your questions to include causes and effects.	*
0 Review each of your questions. Make sure your questions are specific, straightforward, and directly related to your op,c. Rewrite any questions that are vague, too broad, or biased. In this example, the student ewr her question about what caused the event so that it was more specific.	6
0 Formulate a central research question about the event to explore further. Examine all the questions and choose one or write a new one that gets at the central idea you want to research.	b and
273 SKI
uLih
STRATEGY: MAKE A CHART
Once you have decided upon a topic, decide the best way to find out more information. Use a chart to organize your research. Research Question: What happened during the Tweed Ring Scandal?		
Question	Fact	Source
Who were the leaders of the Tweed King?	•	William Marcy Tweed was “Soss” Tweed •	Other leaders: Kichard Connolly, A. Oakey Hall, and Keter Sweeny	“’Boss Tweed’: The Fellowship of the King” by Fete Hamill, New York Times, 3/27/2OOS
What did the leaders do?	•	Remanded bribes and used extortion or threats •	Stole millions of dollars •	Controlled elections	Lowermanhattan.info, News Stories Archive 3/5/2004
When and where did the scandal occur?	New York City, around 1663-1571	Inside the Apple: A Streetwise History of New York City by Michelle Nevius
What was the result of the scandal?	•	Corrupt politicians defrauded the city •	One construction project cost taxpayers $13 million, but actual costs were $3 million; Tweed and his followers pocketed the rest	“Municipal Graft and Scandal,” The Americans: United States History Since 1377, page 269
How was the scandal resolved?	•	Thomas Nast published cartoons in Harper's Weekly •	Keform lawyer Samuel J. Tilden led efforts to convict Tweed of larceny and forgery	Britannica Online Encyclopedia
applying the skill
Turn to Chapter 7, Section 2, page 266 and read the section "Reformers Mobilize." Follow the strategies to formulate historical questions about the Settlement House movement. Write a one-page essay on the topic.
1.	Determine the topic that you would like to know more about. Which aspect of the movement would you like to explore?
2.	Decide what questions to ask and write them down. What questions will allow you to learn more about the topic.
3.	Review each of your questions. Are your questions clear and concise?
4.	Formulate a central question about the event to explore further. Use your question to do research for the essay.
273 SK2
ilBiiiiSi



For most European immigrants, Ellis Island was the first stop. Between 1892 and 1954, the immigration station processed over 12 million immigrants. These immigrants went through an inspection before they were allowed to enter the United States. Those with serious health problems were sent home, as were those who did not meet various legal requirements. Others were sent home because they exceeded
immigration quotas. However, if immigrants could clear these hurdles, they were free to enter the United States and begin their new lives.
Co online to explore some of the personal stories and recollections of immigrants who made the journey to America and passed through Ellis Island. You can find a wealth of information, video clips, primary sources, activities, and more at
1	Doctors examined immigrants as they headed upstairs to the Great Hall.
2	Lines were long, but the inspection often lasted only a few minutes.
3	Immigrants who passed the inspection could exchange money, send mail or telegrams, or buy train tickets.
4	Immigrants then met relatives or loved ones.
5	Immigrants who had to stay overnight were assigned to dormitories.

J J
t ' ( ft -'	y*
•r
I. ,
CLICK THROUGH
INTER ACTIVITIES
The Golden Door
Watch the video to see how and why immigrants traveled to the United States.
Examination
Watch the video to see the physical examination that immigrants experienced at Ellis Island.
Quotas
Watch the video to see how immigration quotas affected immigrants trying to come to the United States.
Essential Question
mylMotebook
What were the significant trends in areas such as technology, education, race relations, and mass culture at the turn of the 20th century?
Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills (TEKS)
3C,5B,6A,21A, 26A.29E
SECTION 1: Science and Urban Life
Main Idea Advances in science and technology helped solve urban problems, including overcrowding.
SECTION 2: Expanding Public Education
Main Idea Reforms in public education led to a rise in national literacy and the promotion of public education.
SECTION 3: Segregation and Discrimination
Main Idea African Americans led the fight against voting restrictions and Jim Crow laws
SECTION 4: The Dawn of Mass Culture Main Idea As Americans had more time for leisure activities, a modern mass culture emerged.
World’s Columbian Exposition ^commemorating the 400th anniversary] of Columbus sailing to the Americas,,

:l4883| Construction •of the Brooklyn : Bridge Is completed.
118921 Ida B. Wells crusades against lynching.
: [1888] Electric : trolleys are first : introduced.
USAl
world!
1880
1885
1890
118781 Bicycle touring club Is founded In Europe.
: 1^8841 Fifteen-nation • conference on the division : of Africa convenes in Berlin.
118891 Barnum & Bailey Circus opens in London.
: i1896i Supreme Court 5 establishes "separate : but-equal” doctrine m : Plessyv. Ferguson, .j
274 Chapter 8
: Goo]	;	rX90x] Theodore 5	[1904 j Theodor-.
: William	5	Roosevelt	•	Roosevelt	is
: McKinley is	•	becomes	•	elected
• reelected.	:	president.	:	president.
•M99J Austrian psychoanalyst : Sigmund Freud publishes • The Interpretation of Dreams.
: j 1916 [ Woodrow • Wilson is : reelected.
1905
: 1908 Henry Ford : introduces the Model T.
: >1.908] William H. Taft elected president.
• 119121 Woodrow Wilson : is elected president.
:1914; World War I : begins in Europe.
1915
Life at the Turn of the 20th Century 275
Science and Urban Life
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
Advances in science and technology helped solve urban problems, including overcrowding.
American cities continue to depend on the results of scientific and technological research.
Louis Sullivan Daniel Burnham Frederick Law Olmsted
Orville and Wilbur Wright
George Eastman
hmhsocialstudies.com
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on important changes in city design, communications, and transportation.
MW

The Brooklyn Bridge, connecting Brooklyn to the island of Manhattan in New York City, opened in 1883. It took 14 years to build. Each day, laborers descended to work in a caisson, or watertight chamber, that took them deep beneath the East River. E. F. Farrington, a mechanic who worked on the bridge, described the working conditions.
A
Personal Voice e. f. farrington 66 Inside the caisson everything wore an unreal, weird appearance. There was a confused sensation in the head . . . What with the flaming lights, the deep shadows, the confusing noise of hammers, drills, and chains, the half-naked forms flitting about. . . one might, if of a poetic temperament, get a realizing sense of Dante’s Inferno. ” —quoted in The Great Bridge
In 1883, New Yorkers celebrated the opening of the world’s longest suspension bridge, the 1,595-foot-long Brooklyn Bridge.
Four years later, trains ran across the bridge 24 hours a day and carried more than 30 million travelers each year.
Technology and City Life
Engineering innovations, such as the Brooklyn Bridge, laid the groundwork for modern American life. Cities in every industrial area of the country expanded both outward and upward. In 1870, only 25 American cities had populations of 50,000 or more; by 1890, 58 cities could make that claim. By the turn of the 20th century, due to the increasing number of industrial jobs, four out of ten Americans made their homes in cities.
In response to these changes, technological advances began to meet the nation's needs for communication, transportation, and space. One remedy for more urban space was to build toward the sky.
276 Chapter 8
j MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
How did new technologies make the building of skyscrapers practical?
Summarizing
How did electric transit impact urban life?
Vocabulary promenade: a
public place for walking
SKYSCRAPERS
Architects were able to design taller buildings because of two factors: the invention of elevators and the development of internal steel skeletons to bear the weight of buildings. In 1890-1891, architect Louis Sullivan designed the ten-story Wainwright Building in St. Louis. He called the new breed of skyscraper a proud and soaring thing/' The tall building's appearance was graceful because its steel framework supported both floors and walls. The skyscraper became America's greatest contribution to architecture, "a new thing under the sun," according to the architect Frank Lloyd Wright, who studied under Sullivan. Skyscrapers solved the practical problem of how to make the best use of limited and expensive space. The unusual form of another skyscraper, the Flatiron Building, seemed perfect for its location at one of New York's busiest intersections. Daniel Burnham designed this slender 285-foot tower in 1902. The Flatiron Building and other new buildings served as symbols of a rich and optimistic society.
ELECTRIC TRANSIT
As skyscrapers expanded upward, changes in transportation allowed cities to spread outward. Before the Civil War, horses had drawn the earliest streetcars over iron rails embedded in city streets. In some cities during the 1870s and 1880s, underground moving cables powered streetcar lines. Electricity, however, transformed urban transportation. In 1888 Richmond, Virginia, became the first American city to electrify its urban transit. Other cities followed. By the turn of the twentieth century, intricate networks of electric streetcars—also called trolley cars—ran from outlying neighborhoods to downtown offices and department stores.
New railroad lines also fed the growth of suburbs, allowing residents to commute to downtown jobs. New York's northern suburbs alone supplied 100,000 commuters each day to the central business district.
A few large cities moved their streetcars far above street level, creating elevated or "el" trains. Other cities, like New York, built subways by moving their rail lines underground. These streetcars, elevated trains, and subways enabled cities to annex suburban developments that mushroomed along the advancing transportation routes. s#
ENGINEERING AND URBAN PLANNING
Steel-cable suspension bridges, like the Brooklyn Bridge, also brought cities' sections closer together. Sometimes these bridges provided recreational opportunities. In his design for the Brooklyn Bridge, for example, John Augustus Roebling provided an elevated promenade whose "principal use will be to allow people of leisure, and old and young invalids, to promenade over the bridge on fine days." This need for open spaces in the midst of crowded commercial cities inspired the emerging science of urban planning. City planners sought to restore a measure of serenity to the environment by designing recreational areas. Landscape architect Frederick Law Olmsted spearheaded the movement for planned urban parks.
In 1857 Olmsted, along with English-born architect Calvert Vaux, helped draw up a plan for "Greensward," which was selected to become Central Park, in New York City. Olmsted envisioned the park as a rustic haven in the center of the busy city.
The finished park featured boating and
The Flatiron Building, shown here under construction, stands at the intersection of Fifth Avenue and 23rd Street in New York City.
hn
jiii
jin


.Vr'nonij |


tennis facilities, a zoo, and bicycle paths. Olmsted hoped that the park's beauty would soothe the city's inhabitants and let them enjoy a "natural setting.
A
Personal Voice Frederick law olmsted “The main object and justification [of the park] is simply to produce a certain influence in the minds of people and through this to make life In the city healthier and happier. The character of this influence ... is to be produced by means of scenes, through observation of which the mind may be more or less lifted out of moods and habits. ”
—quoted in Frederick Law Olmsted's New York
In the 1870s, Olmsted planned landscaping for Washington, D.C., and St. Louis. He also drew the initial designs for "the Emerald Necklace," Boston's parks system. Boston's Back Bay area, originally a 450-acre swamp, was drained and developed by urban planners into an area of elegant streets and cultural attractions, including Olmsted's parks.
CITY PLANNING
By contrast, Chicago, with its explosive growth from 30,000 people in 1850 to 300,000 in 1870, represented a nightmare of unregulated expansion. Fortunately for the city, a local architect, Daniel Burnham, was intrigued History Through
Architecture

THE CHICAGO PLAN
This map from Daniel Burnham’s original plan of Chicago looks deceptively like an ordinary map today. But at the time, it was almost revolutionary in its vision, and it inspired city planners all over the country.
Qchicago’s Lakefront First, Burnham designed the “White City” to host the 1893 World’s Columbian Exposition. His greatest legacy to Chicago may have been his idea for a lakefront park system, complete with beaches, playing fields, and playgrounds.
'I 1! \	.
x' K \ • IZ
■	iir——'Jk^
■V—
i i 'w i i l._
11
F! rL'iS;' :A -1	/
""71”
{^Neighborhood Parks Though not all cities could claim a lakefront vista for recreation, most cities sprinkled neighborhood parks where their residents needed them. Urban planners provided for local parks—such as Lincoln Park in Chicago—so that “the sweet breath of plant life” would be available to everyone.
BB0E0S5F^
II J
i \r 
vi
X
$
QHarbors For Cities On the Great Lakes, the shipping business depended on accessible harbors. Burnham saw the advantage of harbors for recreation and commercial purposes, but he advocated moving the harbors away from the central business districts to free space for public use.
□The Civic Center Burnham redesigned the street pattern to create a group of long streets that would converge on a grand plaza, a practice reflected in other American cities. The convergence of major thoroughfares at a city's center helped create a unified city from a host of neighborhoods.
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Visual Sources 1.	Why did Chicago’s location make it a good choice for urban planning?
2.	How was Chicago’s importance as a shipping center maintained?
Unity was the goal of the architect of Chicago’s city center.
178 Chapter 8
J MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
Q
List three major changes in cities near the turn of the century. What effect did each have? Vocabulary internal combustion engine: an engine in which fuel is burned within the engine rather than in an external furnace
by the prospect of remaking the city. His motto was "Make no little plans. They have no magic to stir men's blood." He oversaw the transformation of a swampy area near Lake Michigan into a glistening White City for Chicago's 1893 World's Columbian Exposition. Majestic exhibition halls, statues, the first Ferris wheel, and a lagoon greeted more than 21 million visitors who came to the city.
Many urban planners saw in Burnham's White City glorious visions of future cities. Burnham, however, left Chicago an even more important legacy: an overall plan for the city, crowned by elegant parks strung along Lake Michigan. As a result, Chicago's lakefront today features curving banks of grass and sandy beaches instead of a jumbled mass of piers and warehouses.
New Technologies
New developments in communication brought the nation closer together. In addition to a railroad network that now spanned the nation, advances in printing, aviation, and photography helped to speed the transfer of information.
A REVOLUTION IN PRINTING
By 1890, the literacy rate in the United States had risen to nearly 90 percent. Publishers turned out ever-increasing numbers of books, magazines, and newspapers to meet the growing demand of the reading public. A series of technological advances in printing aided their efforts. American mills began to produce huge quantities of cheap paper from wood pulp. The new paper proved durable enough to withstand high-speed presses. The electrically powered web-perfecting press, for example, printed on both sides of a continuous paper roll, rather than on just one side. It then cut, folded, and counted the pages as they came down the line. Faster production and lower costs made newspapers and magazines more affordable. People could now buy newspapers for a penny a copy.
AIRPLANES
In the early 20th century, brothers Orville and Wilbur Wright, bicycle manufacturers from Dayton, Ohio, experimented with new engines powerful enough to keep "heavier-than-air" craft aloft. First the Wright brothers built a glider. Then they commissioned a four-cylinder internal combustion engine, chose a propeller, and designed a biplane with a 40'4" wingspan. Their first successful flight—on December 17, 1903, at Kitty Hawk, North Carolina—covered 120 feet and lasted 12 seconds. Orville later described the take-off. ORLD
STAOj? THE GARDEN CITY
Urban planning in the United States had European counterparts. In Tomorrow: A Peaceful Path to Social Reform (1898), for example, the British city planner Ebenezer Howard wrote of a planned residential community called a garden city.
Howard wanted to combine the benefits of urban life with easy access to nature. His city plan was based on concentric circles— with a town at the center and a wide circle of rural land on the perimeter. The town center included a garden, concert hall, museum, theater, library, and hospital.
The circle around the town center included a park, a shopping center, a conservatory, a residential area, and industry. Six wide avenues radiated out from the town center. In 1903, Letchworth, England served as the model for Howard’s garden city.
A
Personal Voice orville wright “After running the motor a few minutes to heat it up, I released the wire that held the machine to the track, and the machine started forward into the wind. Wilbur ran at the side of the machine ... to balance it. . . . Unlike the start on the 14th, made In a calm, the machine, facing a 27-mile wind, started very slowly. . . . One of the life-saving men snapped the camera for us, taking a picture just as the machine had reached the end of the track and had risen to a height of about two feet.”
—quoted in Smithsonian Frontiers of Flight
Orville (right) and Wilbur Wright at home in Dayton, Ohio, in 1909.
▼_________________
Life at the Turn of the 20th Century 279
Technology >
Early Airplane Engines and Their Weights
AVIATION PIONEERS
In 1892, Orville and Wilbur Wright opened a bicycle shop in Dayton, Ohio. They used the profits to fund experiments in aeronautics, the construction of aircraft. In 1903, the Wright brothers took a gasoline-powered airplane that they had designed to a sandy hill outside Kitty Hawk, North Carolina.
The airplane was powered by a 4-cylinder 12-horse-power piston engine, ► designed and constructed by the bicycle shop’s mechanic, Charles Taylor.
The piston—a solid cylinder fit snugly into a hollow cylinder that moves back and forth under pressure—was standard until jet-propelled aircraft came into service in the 1940s.
The engine is the heaviest component in airplane construction. The design of lighter engines was the most important development in early aviation history.
Date	Name of Engine	Approximate Weight
		per Unit of Horsepower
1880s	Otto	440 lbs (200 kg)
1903	Wright	13 lbs (6 kg)
1910	Gnome	3.3 lbs (1.5 kg)
V-12
Liberty 2 lbs (1 kg) 1944	Wright Cyclone	1.1 lbs (0.5 kg)
Source: The History of Invention, Trevor I. Williams
<4 On December 17, Orville Wright made the first successful flight of a powered aircraft in history. The public paid little attention. But within two years, the brothers were making 30-minute flights. By 1908, the pioneer aviators had signed a contract for production of the Wright airplane with the U.S. Army.
280 Chapter 8
8
Within two years, the Wright brothers had increased their flights to 24 miles. By 1920, convinced of the great potential of flight, the U.S. government had established the first transcontinental airmail service.
PHOTOGRAPHY EXPLOSION
Before the 1880s, photography was a professional activity. Because of the time required to take a picture and the weight of the equipment, a photographer could not shoot a moving object. In addition, photographers had to develop their shots immediately. New techniques eliminated the need to develop pictures right away. George Eastman developed a series of more convenient alternatives to the heavy glass plates previously used. Now, instead of carrying their darkrooms around with them, photographers could use flexible film, coated with gelatin emulsions, and could send their film to a studio for processing. When professional photographers were slow to begin using the new film, Eastman decided to aim his product at the masses.
In 1888, Eastman introduced his Kodak camera. The purchase price of $25 included a 100-picture roll of film. After taking the pictures, the photographer would send the camera back to Eastman's Rochester, New York, factory. For $10, the pictures were developed and returned with the camera reloaded. Easily held and operated, the Kodak prompted millions of Americans to become amateur photographers. The camera also helped to create the field of photojournalism. Reporters could now photograph events as they occurred. When the Wright brothers first flew their simple airplane at Kitty Hawk, an amateur photographer captured the first successful flight on film.
GEORGE EASTMAN 1854-1932
In 1877, when George Eastman took up photography as a hobby, he had to lug more than 100 pounds of equipment for one day's outing. To lighten his load, he replaced heavy glass plates with film that could be rolled onto a spool.
In 1888, Eastman sold his first roll-film camera. Eastman called his new camera (shown at left) the Kodak, because the made-up name was short and memorable. It was popularized by the slogan “You Press the Button, We Do the Rest.”
i
i
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance. •Louis Sullivan	•Frederick Law Olmsted	‘George Eastman
•Daniel Burnham	•Orville and Wilbur Wright

MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Using a three-column chart, such as the one below, list three important changes in city design, communication, and transportation.
City Design	Communication	Transportation
1.	1.	1.
2.	2.	2.
3.	3.	3.
Which change had the greatest impact on urban life? Why?
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	HYPOTHESIZING
If you had been an urban planner at the turn of the century, what new ideas would you have included in your plan for the ideal city?
Think About:
•	Olmsted’s plans for Central Park
•	Burnham’s ideas for Chicago
•	the concept of the garden city
4.	EVALUATING
Which scientific or technological development described in this section had the greatest impact on American culture? Use details from the text to justify your choice.
5.	SUMMARIZING
How did bridge building contribute to the growth of cities?
Life at the Turn of the 20th Century 281
TEKS 3C.5B,
Expanding Public Education
MAIN IDEA
Reforms in public education led to a rise in national literacy and the promotion of public education.
WHY ITT MATTERS NOW
The public education system is the foundation of the democratic ideals of American society.
Terms & Names
• Booker T.
Washington
•Tuskegee Normal and Industrial Institute
One American’s Story
MAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on developments in education at the turn of the 20th century.
William Torrey Harris was an educational reformer who saw the public schools as a great instrument "to lift all classes of people into . . . civilized life." As U.S. commissioner of education from 1889 to 1906, Harris promoted the ideas of great educators like Horace Mann and John Dewey—particularly the belief that schools exist for the children and not the teachers. Schools, according to Harris, should properly prepare students for full participation in community life.
A
Personal Voice william torrey Harris “ Every [educational] method must... be looked at from two points of view: first, its capacity to secure the development of rationality or of the true adjustment of the individual to the social whole; and, second, its capacity to strengthen the individuality of the pupil and avoid the danger of obliterating the personality of the child by securing blind obedience in place of Intelligent cooperation, and by mechanical memorizing in place of rational Insight. ” —quoted in Public Schools and Moral Education
E. B.
Du Bois • Niagara Movement Many other middle-class reformers agreed with Harris and viewed the public Compulsory schools as training grounds for employment and citizenship. People believed that attendance laws, economic development depended on scientific and technological knowledge. As though slow to be a result, they viewed education as a key to greater security and social status, enforced, helped Others saw the public schools as the best opportunity to assimilate the millions ,m class,ooms * of immigrants entering American society. Most people also believed that public the turn education was necessary for a stable and prosperous democratic nation.	cen
Expanding Public Education
Although most states had established public schools by the Civil War, many school-age children still received no formal schooling. The majority of students who went to school left within four years, and few went to high school
82 Chapter 8
!i
MAIN IDEA
Drawing
Conclusions
Why did
American children begin attending school at a younger age?
SCHOOLS FOR CHILDREN
Between 1865 and 1895, states passed laws requiring 12 to 16 weeks annually of school attendance by students between the ages of 8 and 14. The curriculum emphasized reading, writing, and arithmetic. However, the emphasis on rote memorization and the uneven quality of teachers drew criticism. Strict rules and physical punishment made many students miserable. One 13-year-old boy explained to a Chicago school inspector why he hid in a warehouse basement instead of going to school.
A
Personal Voice “They hits ye If yer don’t learn, and they hits ye if ye whisper, and they hits ye if ye have string in yer pocket, and they hits ye if yer seat squeaks, and they hits ye if ye don’t stan’ up in time, and they hits ye if yer late, and they hits ye if ye fer-get the page. ”
—anonymous schoolboy quoted in The One Best System
In spite of such problems, children began attending school at a younger age. Kindergartens, which had been created outside the public school system to offer childcare for employed mothers, became increasingly popular. The number of kindergartens surged from 200 in 1880 to 3,000 in 1900, and, under the guidance of William Torrey Harris, public school systems began to add kindergartens to their programs.
Although the pattern in public education in this era was one of growth, opportunities differed sharply for white and black students. In 1880, about 62 percent of white children attended elementary school, compared to about 34 percent of African-American children. Not until the 1940s would public school education become available to the majority of black children living in the South.
THE GROWTH OF HIGH SCHOOLS
In the new industrial age, the economy demanded advanced technical and managerial skills. Moreover, business leaders like Andrew Carnegie pointed out that keeping workers loyal to capitalism required society to "provide ladders upon which the aspiring can rise." By early 1900, more than half a million students attended high school. The curriculum expanded to include courses in science, civics, and social studies. And new vocational courses prepared male graduates for industrial jobs in drafting, carpentry, and mechanics, and female graduates for office work.
Expanding Education/lncreasing Literacy
Year
Students Enrolled
Literacy in English (% of Population age 10 and over)
1871
1880
1890
1900
1910
1920
7.6 million
9.9 million
12.7 million
15.5 million
17.8 million
21.6 million
80%
83%
87%
89%
92%
94%
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Graphs
1.	By how much did the illiteracy rate drop from 1871 to 1920?
2.	Does the number of immigrants during this period make the reduction more or less impressive? Why?
f =1,000,000 students
cni trees1 Statistical Abstract of the United States, 1921, HteS satetfcs of toe IHM States.
i
Life at the Turn of the 20th Century 283
RACIAL DISCRIMINATION
African Americans were mostly excluded from public secondary education. In 1890, fewer than 1 percent of black teenagers attend ed high school. More than two-thirds of these students went to private schools, which received no government financial support. By 1910, about 3 percent of African Americans between the ages of 15 and 19 attended high school, but a majority of these students still attended private schools. EDUCATION FOR IMMIGRANTS
Unlike African Americans, immigrants were encouraged to go to school. Of the nearly 10 million European immigrants settled in the United States between 1860 and 1890, many were Jewish people fleeing poverty and systematic oppression in eastern Europe. Most immigrants sent their children to America's free public schools, where they quickly became "Americanized.” Years after she became a citizen, the Russian Jewish immigrant Mary Antin recalled the large numbers of non-English-speaking immigrant children. By the end of the school year, they could recite "patriotic verses in honor of George Washington and Abraham Lincoln . . . with plenty of enthusiasm.” Some people resented the suppression of their native languages in favor of English. Catholics were especially concerned because many public school systems had mandatory readings from the (Protestant) King James Version of the Bible. Catholic communities often set up parochial schools to give their children a Catholic education.
Thousands of adult immigrants attended night school to learn English and to qualify for American citizenship. Employers often offered daytime programs to Americanize their workers. At his Model T plant in Highland Park, Michigan, Henry Ford established a "Sociology Department,” because "men of many nations must be taught American ways, the English language, and the right way to live.” Ford's ideas were not universally accepted. Labor activists often protested that Ford's educational goals were aimed at weakening the trade union movement by teaching workers not to confront management.
Vocabulary parochial school:
a school supported by a church parish
TECHNOLOGY AND SCHOOLS
In 1922,Thomas Edison predicted that motion pictures would eventually replace textbooks.
More recently, it has been predicted that computers will replace traditional classrooms and texts. Computers are used for video course sharing, in which students in many locations participate in the same class. Teachers are using electronic interactive whiteboards to help them lead and record presentations and discussions. Students are also using computers to access and share scientific data and to communicate with peers around the world.
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
Jjj What
institutions
encouraged
European
immigrants to
become
assimilated?
Expanding Higher Education
Although the number of students attending high school had increased by the turn of the century, only a minority of Americans had high school diplomas. At the same time, an even smaller minority—only 2.3 percent—of America's young people attended colleges and universities.
CHANGES IN UNIVERSITIES
Between 1880 and 1920, college enrollments more than Quadrupled. And colleges instituted major changes in curricula and admission policies. Industrial development changed the nation's educational needs. The research university emerged—offering courses in modern languages the physical sciences, and the new disciplines of psychology and sociology' Professional schools in law and medicine were established. Private colleges and uni versities required entrance exams, but some state universities began to admit students by using the high school diploma as the entrance requirement.
HIGHER EDUCATION FOR AFRICAN AMERICANS
After the Civil War thou sands of freed African Americans pursued higher education, despite their exclusion from white institutions. With the help of the Freedmen's Bureau and other groups blacks founded Howard, Atlanta, and Fisk Universities, all of which opened 284 Chapter 8
MAIN IDEA
Synthesizing
Cj Describe the state of higher education for African Americans at the turn of the century.

between 1865 and 1868. Private donors could not, however, financially support or educate a sufficient number of black college graduates to meet the needs of the segregated communities. By 1900, out of about 9 million African Americans, only 3,880 were in attendance at colleges or professional schools.
The prominent African American educator, Booker T. Washington, believed that racism would end once blacks acquired useful labor skills and
proved their economic value to society. Washington, who was born enslaved, graduated from Virginia's Hampton Institute. By 1881, he headed the Tuskegee Normal and Industrial Institute, now called Tuskegee University, in Alabama. Tuskegee aimed to equip African Americans with teaching diplomas and useful skills in agricultural, domestic, or mechanical work."No race," Washington said, "can prosper till it learns that there is as much dignity in tilling a field as in writing a poem."
By contrast, W. E. B. Du Bois, the first African American to receive a doctorate from Harvard (in 1895), strongly disagreed with Washington's gradual approach. In 1905, Du Bois founded the Niagara Movement, which insisted that blacks should seek a liberal arts education so that the African-American community would have well-educated leaders.
Du Bois proposed that a group of educated blacks, the most "talented tenth" of the community, attempt to achieve immediate inclusion into mainstream American life. "We are Americans, not only by birth and by citizenship," Du Bois argued, "but by our political ideals.. .. And the greatest of those ideals is that ALL MEN ARE CREATED EQUAL."
By the turn of the 20th century, millions of people received the education they needed to cope with a rapidly changing world. At the same time, however, racial discrimination remained a thorn in the flesh of American society.
-I
▲
Medical students and their professors work in the operating theater of the Moorland-Spingarn Research Center at Howard University.
B
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
T.
Washington E. B. Du Bois •Tuskegee Normal and Industrial Institute	’Niagara Movement
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
In a chart like the one below, list at least three developments in education at the turn of the 20th century and their major results.
Development	Result
1.	
2.	
3.	
Which educational development do you think was most important? Explain your choice.
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	HYPOTHESIZING
How might the economy and culture of the United States have been different without the expansion of public schools? Think About:
•	the goals of public schools and whether those goals have been met
•	why people supported expanding public education
•	the impact of public schools on the development of private schools
4.	COMPARING
How were the actions taken by Booker T. Washington and W. E. B. Du Bois to expand economic opportunities for racial minorities similar and different? What impact did their actions have on American society?
ANALYZING ISSUES
How did expansion of the educational system affect American children?
Life at the Turn of the 20th Century 285
TEKS 3£, 5B, 6A, 21A
Segregation and Discrimination
MAIN IDEA
WHY IIT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
African Americans led the fight against voting restrictions and Jim Crow laws.
Today, African Americans have the legacy of a century-long battle for civil rights.
•	Ida B. Wells
•	poll tax
•	grandfather clause
•	segregation
•	Jim Crow laws
•	Plessy v. Ferguson
•	debt peonage
^^^^^0neAmerican'sSt6r)rj^^^S
! hmhsocialstudies.com
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on important events in race relations at the turn of the 20th century.
Born into slavery shortly before emancipation, Ida B. Wells moved to Memphis in the early 1880s to work as a teacher. She later became an editor of a local paper. Racial justice was a persistent theme in Wells's reporting. The events of March 9, 1892 turned that theme into a crusade. Three African-American businessmen, friends of Wells, were lynched— illegally executed without trial. Wells saw lynching for what it was.
A
Personal Voice ida b. wells “Thomas Moss, Calvin McDowell, and Lee Stewart had been lynched in Memphis . . . [where] no lynching had taken place before. . . . This is what opened my eyes to what lynching really was. An excuse to get rid of Negroes who were acquiring wealth and property and thus keep the race terrorized.”
—quoted in Crusade for Justice
Ida B. Wells moved north to continue her fight against lynching by writing, lecturing, and organizing for civil rights.
African Americans were not the only group to experience violence and racial discrimination. Native Americans, Mexican residents, and Chinese immigrants also encountered bitter forms of oppression, particularly in the American West.
African Americans Fight Legal Discrimination
As African Americans exercised their newly won political and social rights during Reconstruction, they faced hostile and often violent opposition from whites. African Americans eventually fell victim to laws restricting their civil rights but never stopped fighting for equality. For at least ten years after the end of Reconstruction in 1877, African Americans in the South continued to vote and occasionally to hold political office. By the turn of the 20th century, however, Southern states had adopted a broad system of legal policies of racial discrimination and devised methods to weaken African-American political power.
286 Chapter 8
VOTING RESTRICTIONS
All Southern states imposed new voting restrictions and denied legal equality to African Americans. Some states, for example, limited the vote to people who could read, and required registration officials to administer a literacy test to test reading. Blacks trying to vote were often asked more difficult questions than whites, or given a test in a foreign language. Officials could pass or fail applicants as they wished.
Another requirement was the poll tax, an annual tax that had to be paid before qualifying to vote. Black as well as white sharecroppers
were often too poor to pay the poll tax. To reinstate white voters who may have failed the literacy test or could not pay the poll tax, several Southern states added the grandfather clause to their constitutions. The clause stated that even if a man failed the literacy test or could not afford the poll tax, he was still entitled to vote if he, his father, or his grandfather had been eligible to vote before January 1, 1867. The date is important because before that time, freed slaves did not have the right to vote. The grandfather clause therefore did not allow them to vote.
This theater in Leland, Mississippi, was segregated under the Jim Crow laws.
Vocabulary minstrel: one
of a troupe of entertainers in blackface presenting a comic variety show
P MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
How did the Plessy v. Ferguson ruling affect the civil rights of African Americans?
JIM CROW LAWS
During the 1870s and 1880s, the Supreme Court failed to overturn the poll tax or the grandfather clause, even though the laws undermined all federal protections for African Americans' civil rights. At the same time that blacks lost voting rights, Southern states passed racial segregation laws to separate white and black people in public and private facilities. These laws came to be known as Jim Crow laws after a popular old minstrel song that ended in the words "Jump, Jim Crow." Racial segregation was put into effect in schools, hospitals, parks, and transportation systems throughout the South. PLESSY v. FERGUSON Eventually a legal case reached the U.S. Supreme Court to test the constitutionality of segregation. In 1896, in Plessy v. Ferguson, the Supreme Court ruled that the separation of races in public accommodations was legal and did not violate the Fourteenth Amendment. The decision established the doctrine of "separate but equal," which allowed states to maintain segregated facilities for blacks and whites as long as they provided equal service. The decision permitted legalized racial segregation for almost 60 years. (See Plessy v. Ferguson, page 290.) A;
Turn-of-the-Century Race Relations
African Americans faced not only formal discrimination but also informal rules and customs, called racial etiquette, that regulated relationships between whites and blacks. Usually, these customs belittled and humiliated African Americans, enforcing their second-class status. For example, blacks and whites never shook hands, since shaking hands would have implied equality. Blacks also had to yield the sidewalk to white pedestrians, and black men always had to remove their hats for whites.
Life at the Turn of the 20th Century 287
; I
Some moderate reformers, like Booker T. Washington, earned support from whites. Washington suggested that whites and blacks work together for social progress.
A
Personal Voice booker t. Washington “To those of the white race ... I would repeat what I say to my own race. . . . Cast down your bucket among these people who have, without strikes and labour wars, tilled your fields, cleared your forests, builded your railroads and cities, and brought forth treasures from the bowels of the earth. ... In all things that are purely social we can be as separate as the fingers, yet one as the hand In all things essential to mutual progress.9 9
—Atlanta Exposition address, 1895
Washington hoped that improving the economic skills of African Americans would pave the way for long-term gains. People like Ida B. Wells and W. E. B. Du Bois, however, thought that the problems of inequality were too urgent to postpone.
VIOLENCE
African Americans and others who did not follow the racial etiquette could face severe punishment or death. All too often, blacks who were accused of violating the etiquette were lynched. Between 1882 and 1892, more than 1,400 African-American men and women were shot, burned, or hanged without trial in the South. Lynching peaked in the 1880s and 1890s but continued well into the 20th century. DISCRIMINATION IN THE NORTH
Most African Americans lived in the segregated South, but by 1900, a number of blacks had moved to Northern cities. Many blacks migrated to Northern cities in search of better-paying jobs and social equality. But after their arrival, African Americans found that there was racial discrimination in the North as well. African Americans found themselves forced into segregated neighborhoods. They also faced discrimination in the workplace. Labor unions often discouraged black membership, and employers hired African-American labor only as a last resort and fired blacks before white employees. Sometimes the competition between African Americans and working-class whites became violent, as in the New York City race riot of 1900. Violence erupted after a young black man, believing that his wife was being mistreated by a white policeman, killed the policeman. Word of the killing spread, and whites retaliated by attacking blacks. Northern blacks, however, were not alone in facing discrimination. Non-whites in the West also faced oppression. &
Discrimination in the West
HISTORICAL
SPOTLIGHT
WASHINGTON VS. DU BOIS
Booker T. Washington argued for a gradual approach to racial equality—suggesting that "it is at the bottom of life we must begin, and not at the top.”
Ten years later, W. E. B. Du Bois denounced this view of gradual equality. Du Bois demanded full social and economic equality for African Americans, declaring that “persistent manly agitation is the way to liberty.”
In 1909 the Niagara Movement, founded by Du Bois in 1905, became the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People (NAACP), with Du Bois as the editor of its journal, The Crisis. He wrote, “We refuse to surrender. . . leadership ... to cowards and trucklers. We are men; we will be treated as men.” The NAACP continues the fight for racial equality today.
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
£) What were Booker T. Washington’s views about establishing racial equality?
MAIN IDEA
Contrasting
& How did conditions for African Americans in the North differ from their circumstances in the South?
Western communities were home to people of many backgrounds working anc living side by side. Native Americans still lived in the Western territories claimec by the United States. Asian immigrants went to America's Pacific Coast in search of wealth and work. Mexicans continued to inhabit the American Southwest African Americans were also present, especially in former slave-holding areas such as Texas. Still, racial tensions often made life difficult.
MEXICAN WORKERS
In the late 1800s, the tail,cads hired more Mexicans that members of any other ethnic group to construct rail lines in the Southwest 188 Chapter 8
Mexican track workers for the Southern Pacific railroad posed for this group photo taken sometime between 1910 and 1915.
Vocabulary peon: a worker bound in servitude to a landlord creditor
Mexicans were accustomed to the region's hot, dry climate. But the work was grueling, and the railroads made them work for less money than other ethnic groups.
Mexicans were also vital to the development of mining and agriculture in the Southwest. When the 1902 National Reclamation Act gave government assistance for irrigation projects, many southwest desert areas bloomed. Mexican workers became the major labor force in the agricultural industries of the region.
Some Mexicans, however, as well as African Americans in the Southwest, were forced into debt peonage, a system that bound laborers into slavery in order to work off a debt to the employer. Not until 1911 did the Supreme Court declare involuntary peonage a violation of the Thirteenth Amendment.
EXCLUDING THE CHINESE
By 1880, more than 100,000 Chinese immigrants lived in the United States. White people's fear of job competition with the Chinese immigrants often pushed the Chinese into segregated schools and neighborhoods. Strong opposition to Chinese immigration developed, and not only in the West. (See Chinese Exclusion Act, page 259.) Racial discrimination posed terrible legal and economic problems for nonwhites throughout the United States at the turn of the century. More people, however, whites in particular, had leisure time for new recreational activities, as well as money to spend on a growing arrray of consumer products.
ASSESSMENT
i S:
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
B.
Wells • grandfather clause *Jim Crow laws *debt peonage • poll tax	• segregation	• Plessy v. Ferguson
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Review the section, and find five key events to place on a time line as shown.
1890 Event Event 1900
Event Event Event
Which of these events do you think was most important? Why?
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING CAUSES AND EFFECTS
Why were race relations a significant social issue in the late 19th century? How did they affect the lives of African Americans?
4.	COMPARING
What did some African-American leaders do to fight discrimination?
5.	CONTRASTING
How did the challenges and opportunities for Mexicans in the United States differ from those for African Americans? Think About:
•	the types of work available to each group
•	the effects of government policies on each group
•	the effect of the legal system on each group
i
I
Life at the Turn of the 20th Century 289
PLESSY v. FERGUSON (1896)
ORIGINS OF THE CASE
In 1892, Homer Plessy took a seat in the "Whites Only" car of a train and refused to move. He was arrested, tried, and convicted in the District Court of New Orleans for breaking Louisiana's segregation law. Plessy appealed, claiming that he had been denied equal protection under the law. The Supreme Court handed down its decision on May 18, 1896. THE RULING
The Court ruled that separate-but-equal facilities for blacks and whites did not violate the Constitution. LEGAL REASONING
Plessy claimed that segregation violated his right to equal protection under the law.
Moreover he claimed that, being "of mixed descent," he was entitled to "every recog-
nition, right, privilege and immunity secured to the citizens of the United States of
the white race."
Justice Henry B. Brown, writing for the majority, ruled:
“The object of the [Fourteenth] amendment was . . . undoubtedly to enforce the absolute equality of the two races before the law, but... it could not have been intended to abolish distinctions based upon color, or to enforce social, as distinguished from political equality, or a commingling of the two races upon terms unsatisfactory to either. Laws permitting, and even requiring, their separation In places where they are liable to be brought Into contact do not necessarily Imply the Inferiority of either race to the other.99
In truth, segregation laws did perpetrate an unequal and inferior status for African Americans. Justice John Marshall Harlan understood this fact and dissented from the majority opinion. He wrote, "In
Justice John Marshall Harlan
respect of civil rights, all citizens are equal before the law." He condemned the majority for letting "the seeds of race hate . . . be planted under the sanction of law." He also warned that "The thin disguise of 'equal' accommodations . . . will not mislead any one, nor atone for the wrong this day done."
LEGAL SOURCES
LEGISLATION
U.S. CONSTITUTION,
FOURTEENTH AMENDMENT
(1868) “No state shall . . . deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the laws.”
LOUISIANA ACTS 1890, NO.
Ill "... that all railway companies carrying passengers in their coaches in this State, shall provide equal but separate accommodations for the white, and colored races.”
RELATED CASES
CIVIL RIGHTS CASES
(1883) The Court ruled that the Fourteenth Amendment could not be used to prevent private citizens from discriminating against others on the basis of race.
WILLIAMS v. MISSISSIPPI (1898)
The Court upheld a state literacy requirement for voting that, in effect, kept African Americans from the polls.
CUMMING v. BOARD OF EDUCATION
OF RICHMOND COUNTY
(1899) The Court ruled that the federal government cannot
prevent segregation in local school facilities because
education is a local, not federal, issue.
Chapter 8
i
i
[white]
[colored
▲ One result of Jim Crow laws was separate drinking fountains for whites and African Americans.
WHY IT MATTERED
In the decades following the Civil War [1861-1865], Southern state legislatures passed laws that aimed to limit civil rights for African Americans. The Black Codes of the 1860s, and later Jim Crow laws, were intended to deprive African Americans of their newly won political and social rights granted during Reconstruction.
Plessy was one of several Supreme Court cases brought by African Americans to protect their rights against segregation. In these cases, the Court regularly ignored the Fourteenth Amendment and upheld state laws that denied blacks their rights. Plessy was the most important of these cases because the Court used it to establish the separate-but-equal doctrine.
As a result, city and state governments across the South—and in some other states—maintained their segregation laws for more than half of the 20th century. These laws limited African Americans' access to most public facilities, including restaurants, schools, and hospitals. Without exception, the facilities reserved for whites were superior to those reserved for nonwhites. Signs reading "Colored Only" and "Whites Only" served as constant reminders that facilities in segregated societies were separate but not equal.
HISTORICAL IMPACT
It took many decades to abolish legal segregation. During the first half of the 20th century, the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People (NAACP) led the legal fight to overturn Plessy. Although they won a few cases over the years, it was not until 1954 in Brown v. Board of Education that the Court overturned any part of Plessy. In that case, the Supreme Court said that separate-but-equal was unconstitutional in public education, but it did not completely overturn the separate-but-equal doctrine.
In later years, the Court did overturn the separate-but-equal doctrine, and it used the Brown decision to do so. For example, in 1955, Rosa Parks was convicted for violating a Montgomery, Alabama, law for segregated seating on buses. A federal court overturned the conviction, finding such segregation unconstitutional. The case was appealed to the Supreme Court, which upheld without comment the lower court's decision. In doing so in this and similar cases, the Court signaled that the reasoning behind Plessy no longer applied.
▲ As secretary of the Montgomery chapter of the NAACP, Rosa Parks had protested segregation through everyday acts long before Sepember 1955.
THINKING CRITICALLY
CONNECT TO TODAY
1. Analyzing Primary Sources Read the part of the Fourteenth Amendment reprinted in this feature. Write a paragraph explaining what you think “equal protection of the laws” means. Use evidence to support your ideas.
wwrui
CONNECT TO HISTORY
2. Visit the links for Historic Decisions of the Supreme Court to research and read Justice Harlan’s entire dissent in Plessy v. Ferguson. Based on his position, what view might Harlan have taken toward laws that denied African Americans the right to vote? Write a paragraph or two expressing what Harlan would say about those laws.
hmhsocialstudies.com
INTERNET ACTIVITY
Life at the Tum of the 20th Century 291
The Dawn of Mass Culture
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
As Americans had more time for leisure activities, a modern mass culture emerged.
Today, the United States has a worldwide impact on mass culture.
OneAmerican'sStory
! hmhsocialstudies.com
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the development of mass culture.
•Joseph Pulitzer
•	William Randolph Hearst
•	Ashcan school
•	Mark Twain
•	rural free delivery (RFD)
▲
The sprawling amusement center at Coney Island became a model for urban amusement parks,
Along the Brooklyn seashore, on a narrow sandbar just nine miles from busy Manhattan, rose the most famous urban amusement center, Coney Island. In 1886, its main developer,
George Tilyou, bragged, "If Paris is France, then Coney Island ... is the world." Indeed, tens of thousands of visitors mobbed Coney Island after work each evening and on Sundays and holidays. When Luna Park, a spectacular amusement park on Coney Island, opened in May 1903, a reporter described the scene.
A
Personal Voice bruce blen “ [Inside the park was] an enchanted, storybook land of trellises, columns, domes, minarets, lagoons, and lofty aerial flights. And everywhere was life—a pageant of happy people; and everywhere was color—a wide harmony of orange and white and gold. ... It was a world removed—shut away from the sordid clatter and turmoil of the streets. ” —quoted in Amusing the Million
Coney Island offered Americans a few hours of escape from the hard work week. A schoolteacher who walked fully
dressed into the ocean explained her unusual behavior by saying, "It has been a hard year at school, and when I saw the big crowd here, everyone with the brakes off, the spirit of the place got the better of me." The end of the 19th century saw the rise of a "mass culture" in the United States.
American Leisure
Middle-class Americans from all over the country shared experiences as new leisure activities, nationwide advertising campaigns, and the rise of a consumer culture began to level regional differences. As the 19th century drew to a close, many Americans fought off city congestion and dull industrial work by enjoying amusement parks, bicycling, new forms of theater, and spectator sports.
292 Chapter 8
AMUSEMENT PARKS
To meet the recreational needs of city dwellers, Chicago, New York City, and other cities began setting aside precious green space for outdoor enjoyment. Many cities built small playgrounds and playing fields throughout their neighborhoods for their citizens' enjoyment. Some amusement parks were constructed on the outskirts of cities. Often built by trolley-car companies that sought more passengers, these parks boasted picnic grounds and a variety of rides.
The roller coaster drew daredevil customers to Coney Island in 1884, and the first Ferris wheel drew enthusiastic crowds to the World's Columbian Exposition in Chicago in 1893. Clearly, many Americans were ready for new and innovative forms of entertainment—and a whole panorama of recreational activities soon became available.
Eight hours for work, eight hours for rest, eight hours for what we will"
THE CARPENTERS’ UNION, WORCESTER, MASSACHUSETTS
MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
$ How did the mass production of bicycles change women’s lives?
BICYCLING AND TENNIS
With their huge front wheels and solid rubber tires, the first American bicycles challenged their riders. Because a bump might toss the cyclist over the handlebars, bicycling began as a male-only sport. However, the 1885 manufacture of the first commercially successful "safety bicycle," with its smaller wheels and air-filled tires, made the activity more popular. And the Victor safety bicycle, with a dropped frame and no crossbar, held special appeal to women. Abandoning their tight corsets, women bicyclists donned shirtwaists (tailored blouses) and "split" skirts in order to cycle more comfortably. This attire soon became popular for daily wear. The bicycle also freed women from the scrutiny of the ever-present chaperone. The suffragist Susan B. Anthony declared, "I think [bicycling] has done more to emancipate women than anything else in the world. ... It gives women a feeling of freedom and self-reliance." Fifty thousand men and women had taken to cycles by 1888. Two years later 312 American firms turned out 10 million bikes in one year. 41
Americans took up the sport of tennis as enthusiastically as they had taken up cycling. The modern version of this sport originated in North Wales in 1873. A year later, the United States saw its first tennis match. The socialite Florence Harriman recalled that in the 1880s her father returned from England with one of New York's first tennis sets. At first, neighbors thought the elder Harriman had installed the nets to catch birds.
Hungry or thirsty after tennis or cycling? Turn-of-the-century enthusiasts turned to new snacks with recognizable brand names. They could munch on a Hershey chocolate bar, first sold in 1900, and wash down the chocolate with a Coca-Cola®. An Atlanta pharmacist originally formulated the drink as a cure for headaches in 1886. The ingredients included extracts from Peruvian coca leaves as well as African cola nuts.
Bicycling and other new sports became fads in the late 1800s.
The Negro Leagues were first formed in 1920.
SPECTATOR SPORTS
Americans not only participated in new sports, but became avid fans of spectator sports, especially boxing and baseball. Though these two sports had begun as popular informal activities, by the turn of the 20th century they had become profitable businesses. Fans who couldn't attend an important boxing match jammed barbershops and hotel lobbies to listen to telegraphed transmissions of the contest's highlights. BASEBALL
New rules transformed baseball into a professional sport. In 1845, Alexander J. Cartwright, an amateur player, organized a club in New York City and set down regulations that used aspects of an English sport called rounders. Five years later, 50 baseball clubs had sprung up in the United States, and New York alone boasted 12 clubs in the mid-1860s. In 1869, a professional team named the Cincinnati Red Stockings toured the country. Other clubs soon took to the road, which led to the formation of the National League in 1876 and the American League in 1900. In the first World Series, held in 1903, the Boston Pilgrims beat the Pittsburgh Pirates. African-American baseball players, who were excluded from both leagues because of racial discrimination, formed their own clubs and two leagues—the Negro National League and the Negro American League.
The novelist Mark Twain called baseball "the very symbol . . . and visible expression of the drive and push and rush and struggle of the raging, tearing, booming nineteenth century." By the 1890s, baseball had a published game schedule, official rules, and a standard-sized diamond.
The Spread of Mass Culture
As increasing numbers of Americans attended school and learned to read, the cultural vistas of ordinary Americans expanded. Art galleries, libraries, books, and museums brought new cultural opportunities to more people. Other advances fostered mass entertainment. New media technology led to the release of hundreds of motion pictures. Mass-production printing techniques gave birth to thousands of books, magazines, and newspapers.
MASS CIRCULATION NEWSPAPERS
Looking for ways to captivate readers' attention, American newspapers began using sensational headlines. For example, to introduce its story about the horrors of the Johnstown, Pennsylvania flood of 1889, in which more than 2,000 people died, one newspaper used the headline "THE VALLEY OF DEATH." Joseph Pulitzer, a Hungarian immigrant who had bought the New York World in 1883, pioneered popular innovations, such as a large Sunday edition,
MAIN IDEA
Drawing
Conclusions
Why do you think sports were so popular among Americans at the turn of the century?
294 Chapter 8
i
MAIN IDEA
Drawing
Conclusions
How did the World and the Journal attract readers?
comics, sports coverage, and women's news. Pulitzer's paper emphasized "sin, sex, and sensation" in an attempt to surpass his main competitor, the wealthy William Randolph Hearst, who had purchased the New York Morning Journal in 1895. Hearst, who already owned the San Francisco Examiner, sought to outdo Pulitzer by filling the Journal with exaggerated tales of personal scandals, cruelty, hypnotism, and even an imaginary conquest of Mars.
The escalation of their circulation war drove both papers to even more sensational news coverage. By 1898, the circulation of each paper had reached more than one million copies a day.
PROMOTING FINE ARTS
By 1900, at least one art gallery graced every large city. Some American artists, including Philadelphian Thomas Eakins, began to embrace realism, an artistic school that attempted to portray life as it is really lived. Eakins had studied anatomy with medical students and used painstaking geometric perspective in his work.
By the 1880s, Eakins was also using photography to make realistic studies of people and animals.
In the early 20th century, the Ashcan school of American art, led by Eakins's student Robert Henri, painted urban life and working people with gritty realism and no frills. Both Eakins and the Ashcan school, however, soon were challenged by the European development known as abstract art, a direction that most people found difficult to understand.
In many cities, inhabitants could walk from a new art gallery to a new public library, sometimes called "the poor man's university." By 1900, free circulating libraries in America numbered in the thousands.
History Through
THE CHAMPION SINGLE SCULLS (MAX SCHMITT IN A SINGLE SCULL)
(1871) This painting by Thomas Eakins is an example of the realist movement—an artistic school that aimed at portraying people and environments as they really are.
What realistic details do you see portrayed in this painting?
Life at the Turn of the 20th Century 295
POPULAR FICTION
As literacy rates rose, scholars debated the role of literature in society. Some felt that literature s ou up 1 America's literary tastes, which tended toward crime tales and Western adventures. Most people preferred to read light fiction. Such books sold for a mere ten cents, hence their name, "dime novels." Dime novels typically told glorified adventure tales of the West and featured heroes like Edward Wheeler's Deadwood Dick. Wheeler published his first Deadwood Dick novel in 1877 and in less than a decade produced over 30 more.
Some readers wanted a more realistic portrayal of American life. Successful writers of the era included Sarah Orne Jewett, Theodore Dreiser, Stephen Crane, Jack London, and Willa Cather. Most portrayed characters less polished than the upper-class men and women of Henry James's and Edith Wharton's novels. Samuel Langhorne Clemens, the novelist and humorist better known as Mark Twain, inspired a host of other young authors when
he declared his independence of "literature and all that bosh." Yet, some of his books have become classics of American literature. The Adventures of Huckleberry Finn, for example, remains famed for its rendering of life along the Mississippi River.
Although art galleries and libraries attempted to raise cultural standards, many Americans had scant interest in high culture—and others did not have access to it. African Americans, for example, were excluded from visiting many museums and other white-controlled cultural institutions.
Highly popular dime novels often featured
adventure stories.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
What factors contributed to the popularity of dime novels?
New Ways to Sell Goods
Along with enjoying new leisure activities, Americans also changed the way they shopped. Americans at the turn of the 20th century witnessed the beginnings of the shopping center, the development of department and chain stores, and the birth of modern advertising.
URBAN SHOPPING
Growing city populations made promising targets for enterprising merchants. The nation's earliest form of a shopping center opened in Cleveland, Ohio, in 1890. The glass-topped arcade contained four levels of jewelry, leather goods, and stationery shops. The arcade also provided band music on Sundays so that Cleveland residents could spend their Sunday afternoons strolling through the elegant environment and gazing at the window displays. Retail shopping districts formed where public transportation could easily bring shoppers from outlying areas. To anchor these retail shopping districts, ambitious merchants started something quite new, the modern department store.
THE DEPARTMENT STORE
Marshall Field of Chicago first brought the department store concept to America. While working as a store clerk, Field found that paying close attention to women customers could increase sales considerably. In 1865, Field opened his own store, featuring several floors of specialized departments. Field's motto was "Give the lady what she wants.” Field also pioneered the bargain basement, selling bargain goods that were "less expensive but reliable." i nt chain store Department stores prided themselves on offering a variet of personal services. New chain stores-retail stores offering the same merchar dise under the same ownership-sold goods for less by buying in quantity an limiting personal service. In the 1870s, F. W. Woolworth found that if he offere an item at a very low price, "the consumer would purchase it on the spur of th
Vocabulary consumer- a
person who purchases goods or services for direct use or ownership
596 Chapter 8
r
moment" because "it was only a nickel." By 1911, the Woolworth chain boasted 596 stores and sold more than a million dollars in goods a week.
ADVERTISING
An explosion in advertising also heralded modern consumerism. Expenditures for advertising were under $10 million a year in 1865 but increased tenfold, to $95 million, by 1900. Patent medicines grabbed the largest number of advertising lines, followed by soaps and baking powders. In addition to newspapers and magazines, advertisers used ingenious methods to push products. Passengers riding the train between New York and Philadelphia in the 1870s might see signs for Dr. Drake's Plantation Bitters on barns, houses, billboards, and even rocks. CATALOGS AND RFD
Montgomery Ward and Sears Roebuck brought retail merchandise to small towns. Ward's catalog, launched in 1872, grew from a single sheet the first year to a booklet with ordering instructions in ten languages. Richard Sears started his company in 1886. Early Sears catalogs stated that the company received "hundreds of orders every day from young and old who never [before] sent away for goods." By 1910, about 10 million Americans shopped by mail. The United States Post Office boosted mail-order businesses. In 1896 the Post Office introduced a rural free delivery (RFD) system that brought packages directly to every home. The turn of the 20th century saw prosperity that caused big changes in Americans' daily lives. At the same time, the nation's growing industrial sector faced problems that called for reform.
i
CATALOG SHOPPING
Catalogs were a novelty when Sears and Montgomery Ward arrived on the scene. However, by the mid-1990s, more than 13 billion catalogs filled the mailboxes of Americans.
Today, the world of mail-order business is changing. After over 100 years of operation, Montgomery Ward filed for bankruptcy on December 28, 2000.
Online shopping is challenging mail-order commerce today.
Online retail sales grew from $500 million in 1998 to nearly $89 billion in 2007. What do online shoppers order? Computer equipment, computer software, and electronic appliances make up about 25 percent of online spending.
1.	TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance. •Joseph Pulitzer	-Ashcan school	‘rural free delivery (RFD)
•William Randolph Hearst ‘Mark Twain
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Re-create the spider diagram below. Add examples to each category.
Why is mass culture often described as a democratic phenomenon?
CRITICAL THINKING
3. SUMMARIZING
How did American methods of selling goods change at the turn of the 20th century?
Think About:
•	how city people did their shopping
•	how rural residents bought goods
•	how merchants advertised their products
ANALYZING VISUAL SOURCES
This cartoon shows the masters of the “new journalism.” According to the cartoonist, where were Pulitzer and Hearst leading American journalism?
Life at the Turn of the 20th Century 297
DAILY LIFE
(1877-1917) Going to the Show
As Americans moved from rural areas to cities, they looked for new ways to spend their weekend and evening leisure time. Live theatrical performances brought pleasure to cities and small towns alike. Stars, popular performers who could attract large audiences, compensated for the less-talented supporting actors. Audiences could choose from a wide range of music, drama, circus, and the latest in entertainment—moving pictures.
VAUDEVILLE THEATER
Performances that included song, dance, juggling, slapstick comedy, and sometimes chorus lines of female performers were characteristic of vaudeville. Promoters sought large audiences with varied backgrounds. Writing in Scribner's Magazine in October 1899, actor Edwin Milton Royle hailed vaudeville theater as “an American invention” that offered something to attract nearly everyone.
Until the 1890s, African-American performers filled roles mainly in minstrel shows that featured exaggerated imitations of African-American music and dance and reinforced racist stereotypes of blacks. By the turn of the century, however, minstrel shows had largely been replaced by more sophisticated musicals, and many black performers entertained in vaudeville.
M1
1 4 ’
'c
Bill “Bojangles” Robinson was a popular tap dancer.
THE CIRCUS
The biggest spectacle of all was often the annual visit of the Barnum & Bailey Circus, which its founders, P T. Barnum and Anthony Bailey, touted as “The Greatest Show on Earth.” Established in 1871, the circus arrived by railroad and staged a parade through town to advertise the show.
1 Chapter J
A shorter workweek allowed many Americans more time for leisure activities, and they certainly took advantage of it.
• In 1890, an average of 60,000 fans attended professional baseball games daily.
A LOOK AT THE FACTS
•	In 1893, a crowd of 50,000 attended the Princeton-Yale football game.
A
Trip to Chinatown, one of the popular new musical comedies, ran for an amazing 650 performances in the 1890s. •	In 1900, 3 million phonograph records of Broadway-produced musical comedies were sold.
•	The love of the popular musicals contributed to the sale of $42 million worth of musical instruments in 1900.
THE SILVER SCREEN
The first films, one-reel, ten-minute sequences, consisted mostly of vaudeville skits or faked newsreels. In 1903, the first modern film—an eight-minute silent feature called The Great Train Robbery— debuted in five-cent theaters called nickelodeons. By showing a film as often as 16 times a day, entrepreneurs could generate greater profits than by a costly stage production. By 1907, an estimated 3,000 nickelodeons dotted the country.
ragtime music
A blend of African-American spirituals and European musical forms, ragtime originated in the 1880s in the saloons of the South. African-American pianist and composer Scott Joplin’s ragtime compositions made him famous in the first decade of the 1900s. Ragtime led later to jazz, rhythm and blues, and rock ‘n’ roll. These forms of popular American culture spread worldwide, creating new dances and fashions that „ emulated the image of “loud, loose, American rebel.’
• By 1900, almost 500 men’s social clubs existed. Nine hundred college fraternity and sorority chapters had over 150,000 members.
20th Centu\
CHAPTER
ASSESSMENT
TERMS & NAMES
For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its connection to late 19th-century American life.
1.	Louis Sullivan
2.	Orville and Wilbur Wright
3.	Booker T. Washington
W. E. B.
Du Bois 5.	Niagara Movement
6.	Ida B. Wells
7.	Jim Crow laws
8.	Plessyv. Ferguson
9.	debt peonage 10. rural free delivery
MAIN IDEAS
Use your notes and the information in the chapter to answer the following questions.
Science and Urban Life (pages 276-281)
1.	How did new technology promote urban growth around the turn of the century?
2.	In what ways did methods of communication improve in the late 19th and early 20th centuries?
Expanding Public Education
(pages 282-285)
3.	How did late 19th century public schools change?
4.	Why did some immigrants oppose sending their children to public schools?
Segregation and Discrimination
(pages 286-289)
5.	Analyze the effects of the P/essy v. Ferguson Supreme Court decision.
6.	How did Mexicans help make the Southwest prosperous in the late 19th century?
Dawn of Mass Culture (pages 292-297)
7.	What leisure activities flourished at the turn of the 20th century?
8.	What innovations in retail methods changed the way Americans shopped during this time period?
CRITICAL THINKING
USING YOUR NOTES
Create a table similar to the one shown, listing at least six important trends at the turn of the century, along with a major impact of each. Trend	Impact
1.	
2.	
3.	
4.	
5.	
6.	
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
How had changes in technology affected urban life by the turn of the 20th century? INTERPRETING GRAPHS
Look at the graph of Expanding Education/lncreasing Literacy on page 283, Which year reported the greatest gain in the literacy rate? What do you think were the implications on society of a more literate population? 300 Chapter 8

TEXAS TEST PRACTICE
Use the quotation below and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 1.
“We boast of the freedom enjoyed by our people above all other peoples. But It Is difficult to reconcile that boast with a state of the law which, practically, puts the brand of servitude and degradation upon a large class of our fellow-citizens, our equals before the law. ”
—Justice John Marshall Harlan in the dissenting opinion in Plessyv. Ferguson
1.	Justice Harlan used this reasoning for what purpose?
A to celebrate American democracy B to justify segregation
C to denounce the “separate-but-equal” argument D to demonstrate that equality before the law is
not practical
2.	Which of the following was not an outcome of expanding public education in the early 20th century?
F the establishment of public high schools and colleges
G the growth of equal education for all H a rise in the literacy rate J the founding of kindergartens
3.	The turn of the 20th century brought shorter work hours and more leisure time to many urban Americans. Which of the following bar graphs correctly reflects these factors?
B
Public Parks
1902 1908 1919
Public Parks
Public Parks
1902 1908 1919
Public Parks
1902 1908 1919
71 hmhsocialstudies.com
TEST PRACTICE
For additional test practice, go online for:
• Diagnostic tests • Tutorials
INTERACT WITH HISTORY
'"VWriteSmart Recall the issues that you recorded in myNotebook as you read the chapter. Now that you know more about the role of technology in people’s lives, would you change any of your responses? Discuss your ideas with a small group. Then make a cause-and-effect chart about one technological innovation of the era and its lasting impact on society. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write a paragraph summarizing your group’s discussion.
MULTIMEDIA ACTIVITY
XCBJTVRY
Visit the links for Chapter Assessment to find out more about the World’s Columbian Exposition held in Chicago in 1893. In a small group, make a list of the “famous firsts,” such as the first elevated railway, introduced at the exposition. Illustrate your list, adding pictures and informative captions, on a colorful poster for display in the classroom.
7i hmhsocialstudies.com
"VWriteSmart
Imagine you are a newspaper editor in 1896.
Write an editorial explaining what you think of the Supreme Court ruling in Plessyv. Ferguson. Be sure to address the “separate but equal” argument. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your editorial.
Life at the Turn of the 20th Century
End-of-Chapter Skill Activity
Evaluating Sources
DEFINING THE SKILL
Historians must constantly evaluate sources to determine their credibility. When you evaluate sources, you examine them critically to assess their validity based on language, corroboration with other sources, and information about the author. Credible sources help historians produce an accurate and reliable historical account. Historians use several criteria for evaluating sources, including the author; the context of where, when, and why a source was created; the level of bias; and the distance of the author from the event.
UNDERSTANDING THE SKILL
STRATEGY: EVALUATE A SOURCE
The following is an excerpt of a speech by Booker T. Washington. The speech shows the emotion, point of view, and bias of the author. Examine the language, facts, and author when evaluating the source. Address by© BookerT. Washington, Principal,Tuskegee Normal and Industrial Institute,Tuskegee, Alabama
© This speech was given in front of a primarily white audience during a time when ! racial relations in the South were strained and social and economic opportunities i for African Americans were limited.
I "One third of the population of the South is of the Negro race. No enterprise seeking the material, civil or moral welfare of this section can disregard this element of our population and reach the highest success....
To those of my race who depend on bettering their condition in a foreign land, or who underestimate the importance of cultivating friendly relations
! with the southern white man who is their next door neighbor, I would say cast down your bucket where you are, cast it down in making friends in every manly way of the people of all races whom we are surrounded... .©No race can prosper till it learns that there is as much dignity in tilling a field as in writing a poem. It is at the bottom of life we must begin and not at the top. Nor should we permit our grievances to overshadow our opportunities.
To those of the white race who look to the incoming of those of foreign birth and strange tongue and habits for the prosperity of the South, were I permitted, I would repeat what I say to my own race.'Cast down your bucket where you are.'Cast it down among the 8,000,000 Negroes whose habits you know, whose loyalty and love you have tested in days when to have proved treacherous meant the ruin of your firesides.... Casting down your bucket among my people, helping and encouraging them as you are doing on these grounds, and to education of head, hand, and heart, you will find that they will buy your
S surplus land, make blossom the waste places in your fields, and run your ! factories. While doing this you can be sure in the future, as you have been in i the past, that you and your families will be surrounded by the most patient,
faithful, law-abiding and unresentful people that the world has seen.. .©In I all things that are purely social we can be as separate as the fingers, yet one as
the hand in all things essential to mutual progress.
©—Address at the Opening of the Atlanta Exposition, September 18,1895
© Identify and learn the background of the author of the source. Quotations almost always include the name of the speaker or writer. This title also gives context information.
© Consider when, in relation to the event, the source was created. Sources tend to be more reliable if the author was close in time and place to a given event Is the source a primary source written by someone who witnessed or was involved in a historical event or a secondary source produced by someone who was not actually there? Why was this speech created and where was it given?
© Look at the language the author uses. What does this tell you about the author’s point of view or frame of reference? What bias does it show?
© Consider If the information can be corroborated and determine the usefulness of the source. Identify facts that can be confirmed or disproved by another source. Alternate sources can confirm where and when this speech was given, but the content is largely based on Washington’s opinions.
301
STRATEGY. MAKE A CHART
Summarize the information from the source in a chart. Source	Address at the Opening of the Atlanta Exposition, September 18,1895
Author	looker T. Washington, Principal, Tuskegee Normal and Industrial Institute, Tuskegee, Alabama
Historical Context	Prejudice and legal discrimination were rampant in the South. Washington looked for solutions to problems with racial relations that both sides might support.
Language	•	urged African Americans to value agricultural and industrial work •	asked whites to provide such opportunities to African Americans •	believed African Americans should accept segregation for the moment
Corroboration of Facts	The date, location, and speech itself can be confirmed by other sources. The content of the speech is filled with unconfirmed opinions and ideas, not facts.
Usefulness of Source	It is a valuable source to provide insight into Washington and his views on race relations but should be combined with other sources for a complete picture of race relations during the period.
APPLYING THE SKILL
Turn to Chapter 8, pages 290-291 and read the "Historic Decisions of the Supreme Court" feature. Reread the quote by Justice Henry B. Brown and evaluate it to determine if it is a credible source. Follow the steps above and make a chart to organize your information.
1.	Identify and learn the background of the author of the source.
Who was Henry B. Brown? What do you know about the author?
2.	Consider when, In relation to the event, the source was created.
What is the historical context for this source? What other national events may have influenced the justices on the Supreme Court? When, where, and why was the source created?
3.	Look at the language the author uses.
What do words and phrases such as undoubtedly and it could not have been intended tell you about the author’s point of view or frame of reference? What bias does it show?
4.	Consider If the Information can be corroborated and determine the usefulness
of the source.	,	,	. ...
What source could confirm or disprove the facts or ideas about this Supreme Court case? How useful is this source? Does it have any limitations? If so, what?
301 SK2


UNIT
' ' ';K • - (*\
’■ »jF'‘ <
7<

